http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/11/arts/music/11rock.html?ex=1336536000&en=f3bcd6549aa389ce&ei=5088&partner=rssnyt&emc=rss New York Night Life - Brooklyn - Alternative Music - Parties the Beaten Beat Michael Falco Deacon mans the keyboard at a loft party in Ridgewood, Queens, one of many sites that have emerged to replace the flashier Manhattan nightclub scene. Brooklyn in particular has become a major music nexus. 2007 ON Monday night inside the GlassLands Gallery, a converted warehouse in Williamsburg, Brooklyn, 100 or so people, alerted by MySpace pages and music blogs, gathered for a concert by the Yeah Yeah Yeahs. For an hour, the singer Karen O yelped and shrieked and pranced around a makeshift stage in a paint-splattered gold bodysuit, often wading into the audience a few feet away. At the end of the night the band took requests; to close the set, as her band mates played on, Ms. O paraded most of the crowd toward an alley behind the building, a musical moment as intimate as a reigning rock star can have. Off the Radar The Demimonde Doesn’t Vanish, It Just Changes Location “We hardly play small venues anymore, but this one is definitely special and personal,” Ms. O said afterward. “My favorite kind of party to be at or show to see is a house show. This is as close as you get.” Amid the teeter-totter energy that currently defines New York’s music scene — where the lamented demise of one club is offset by the splashier opening of another — many artists can be found outside that playground entirely, performing at off-the-beaten-path locales like warehouses, rooftops, apartments or inside a Brooklyn oil silo. Music fans with limited funds and a taste for adventure look forward to the summer concert season, which is about to turn the city’s parks and other public spaces into musical free-for-alls. But there are already many places to see bands for little money, without sellout crowds, ticket surcharges or security pat-downs. (Yes, Virginia, there’s even cheap beer.) And the lineups are diverse. Experimental music did not die with the closing of Tonic, nor did grungy rock with the fall of CBGB. With a little planning and an active MetroCard you might catch the next Arcade Fire performing in a parking lot. “Anything is a venue,” said the promoter Todd Patrick, known professionally as Todd P. For six years he has made it his mission to program music in far-flung places, from divey bars in Greenpoint to Lutheran churches to private lofts. Now New York’s alt-location guru, he has recently expanded to work with bands on the verge of stardom (Animal Collective, which he booked in 2005) and even nationally known acts (Oneida, Trans Am) at large clubs like Studio B in Brooklyn, winning the attention of the music industry. But Mr. Patrick’s hallmark remains the cheap, on-the-fly, do-it-yourself concert, promoted through his Web site ( ), his e-mail list (13,000 strong) and MySpace, blog and newspaper and magazine listings. Essentially a one-man band, Mr. Patrick, 31, has interns who work the door (ticket prices rarely go above $10) and stamp hands (he only does all-ages shows) while he helps set up. “Because the idea is about D.I.Y., I like to show the strings,” he said. “I want people to come to the show and see me build the P.A. system, see that there’s nothing glossy about what we’re doing. I think alternative venues are a great way of doing that. It just kind of throws it off. If a club is the quote-unquote appropriate place to see music, why do people have so much more fun in a warehouse?” Last weekend was typical: On Saturday night he booked shows at two unexpected spaces, an Ecuadorian restaurant across from a low-income housing project in Bushwick, Brooklyn, and a loft apartment in Ridgewood, Queens. Both drew several hundred people to outer-borough neighborhoods not typically known as destinations. The restaurant, Don Pedro, had a full menu of ceviche, $3 bottles of Negra Modelo and a small stage in a brick-walled back room where Cass McCombs, a singer with a Lou Reed croon, performed to a packed house. William Alberque, 36, a Defense Department analyst visiting from Washington and a longtime fan of Mr. McCombs’s, said he preferred seeing him anywhere but a rock club. “The D.I.Y. spirit is wonderful,” he said. “It’s just you and the band, five feet away. You buy into what’s happening so much more. It gives you musical butterflies.” At the loft there was even less distance (and more butterflies). The headliner, Dan Deacon, a sensitive electro-party rocker from Baltimore, performed on a patch of carpet in the middle of the room. No stage or bouncer separated him from his audience, which swarmed around, fists pumping, creating a heaving, dancing, steaming mosh pit. Even the walls vibrated. by David Bowie, Shows That He&#8217;d Attend Kitty Carlisle Hart, a New York Blend of Actress, Singer and Arts Advocate, Dies at 96 Classical Music Looks Toward China With Hope For 'Blue-Collar' Musicians, A 'Factory' All Their Own Incredible Flying Granny Nanny Psychiatrists, Children and Drug Industry&#8217;s Role The Minimalist: A No-Frills Kitchen Still Cooks The Curious Cook: The Five-Second Rule Explored, or How Dirty Is That Bologna? Cope With Squeeze Highway Debris, Long an Eyesore, Grows as Hazard Narcotic Maker Guilty of Deceit Over Marketing Fisher Is a Father First, and a Jazz Player Later Genes Take Charge, and Diets Fall by the Wayside Weeks Later': The Satire Is Biting, and So Are the Zombies to Support Abortion Rights G.O.P. Moderates Warn Bush Iraq Must Show Gains Prenatal Test Puts Down Syndrome in Hard Focus Chevron Seen Settling Case on Iraq Oil President Open to Benchmarks in Iraq Measure Gonzales Seems Confident He Will Stay, Officials Say Kansas Tornado Renews Debate on Guard at War Facebook to Offer Free Classifieds 6 Men Arrested in a Terror Plot Against Ft. Dix A Sweet So Sour: Kool-Aid Dills complete guide to summer movies, including critics' picks and a release schedule 5 actors to watch this summer Up close with indie star Parker Posey "The Simpsons Movie" trailer Monterey, Where Kids and Sea Lions Play Vendors’ Removal Restores a Gem In the Big House ... Just Visiting Haberman: The Right to a Defense
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/11/arts/design/11mott.html?ex=1336536000&en=f0341512041cb00e&ei=5088&partner=rssnyt&emc=rss The Glittering A-List of Black History Your Motto Be Resistance' The Glittering A-List of Black History 2007 “Let Your Motto Be Resistance: African American Portraits” at the International Center of Photography is a praise song in pictures, a shoutout to history. It’s also a fancy-dress inaugural party for the yet-to-be-built National Museum of African American History and Culture in Washington. As such, it is a little too fancy, too heavy on glitz, too short on grit. Still, what a party it is. J. Fernandez/National Portrait Gallery The coffin of the Rev. Dr. Martin Luther King Jr. surrounded by mourners, including his children, in the show &#147;Let Your Motto Be Resistance.&#148; Estate of Linda McCartney/National Portrait Gallery Jimi Hendrix in 1967, one of the glamorous shots in the exhibition. The guest list includes an abbreviated Who’s Who of charismatic black statesmen, from Frederick Douglass to Malcolm X. In terms of entertainment, the event is beyond compare. and Bill (Bojangles) Robinson dance. Sarah Vaughan, Leontyne Price and Odetta share a stage, with Sidney Bechet on sax, and Hazel Scott, looking divine, at the keyboard. You’d look divine too if you had James VanDerZee behind the camera, or Berenice Abbott or Edward Weston or Addison N. Scurlock or any of the other great photographers responsible for the 100 vintage-print portraits here, all from the archives of the Smithsonian’s National Portrait Gallery. There are more artists and writers than usual at such an affair. You’ll recognize Horace Pippin, Edmonia Lewis and a beaming Lorraine Hansberry, by name if not by face. And a few people you may be meeting for the first time. Ernest Everett Just (1883-1941), a pioneering biologist who spent much of his career in Europe after he was stonewalled by the American scientific establishment. And Henry Highland Garnet (1815-1882), a Maryland slave who escaped north, became an abolitionist firebrand and delivered the phrase that gives the show its title: “Strike for your lives and liberties. Rather die freemen than live to be slaves. Let your motto be resistance! Resistance! Resistance!” As you look around the gallery, you can imagine some of the portraits reacting to his call. Elizabeth Catlett (in a wonderful likeness by Mariana Yampolsky), A. Philip Randolph, , Sojourner Truth and a young, blanket-swaddled James Baldwin seem to hear it and they’re on the alert. Mr. Garnet’s words aren’t party words. They are stark, preaching, move-now words. Which brings us back to the kind of party this is. It is, as I said, a housewarming in advance, and a buzz-builder, for a national African-American museum. When that museum goes up on the National Mall — 2015 is the target date — an essential aspect of American history will have its official monument. America and African America are one and the same. They’re inseparable. If this show can be taken as a preview of exhibitions to come, what will that history look like? Obviously, it will have glamour to burn, to judge by the lush, burnished portraits chosen by the guest curator, Deborah Willis, a professor of photography at Roland Hayes, who sang like an angel, looks like an angel in a 1934 light-and-shadow likeness attributed to Johan Hagemeyer. floats like a butterfly for Philippe Halsman’s Vogue-savvy eye. One after another, people glow or glower. Everyone is a star, an inspiration, a certified member of W. E. B. DuBois’s Talented Tenth. This Hall of Fame approach to cultural history delivers thrills, no question. But it also has a too easy, been-there air. The show feels like a throwback to another era, to a kind of exhibition that might have been mounted 20 years ago at the Studio Museum in Harlem , an institution that was until recently deeply invested in black pride, devoted to ethnic uplift. That devotion was effective in its time. Among many other things, it encouraged the upward mobility of what has since become an economically and politically powerful black middle class. But is uplift on the same terms, for the same ends, the right framework for viewing African-American, or any other American, history in 2007? Is Bright and Beautiful the model to follow? The show doesn’t entirely adhere to the model. Wall texts make clear that almost every person portrayed had to fight bitter odds for a seat in front of the camera. Each likeness was, consciously or by default, an effort to cast the African-American image, distorted by racism, in acceptably positive, mainstream terms. Three images, set by side by side at the start of the show, make life-and-death stakes clear. In a 1956 picture the Rev. Dr. Martin Luther King Jr. — just a year after he had successfully used passive resistance as a tactical tool in Montgomery, Ala. — stands in the sunshine beside his smiling wife, Coretta, holding their infant daughter, Yolanda Denise, in his arms. In 1968 the same daughter, now in her teens, looks down at her murdered father in his coffin as her 5-year-old sister, Bernice, reacts with open-mouthed shock to the sight. A year later Stephen Shames catches the 25-year-old Angela Davis standing at a microphone, her mouth open to deliver a speech. Passive resistance is over; active resistance has begun. Significantly, some of the best things in the show are action shots: the Supremes — Diana, Mary and Flo — in a recording session; Stokely Carmichael and a white-suited Adam Clayton Powell Jr. cracking up at a joke; impassively hawking broadsides on the street; Marian Anderson singing as a skinny young These portraits are close to snapshots; their subjects look like regular people, Americans who happen to be black, in the middle of their accomplished lives. African America has, of course, a distinctive history, of profound pain and amazing grace. But the figures in these on-the-fly images are also part of a larger fabric: We the People. They are us; we are them. And with all our shared flaws and heroisms, we make up one mercurial, complicated, crazy quilt of a crew. Many of the young artists seen at the Studio Museum these days are intensely interested in complications, in giving “black” and “white” hard critical scrutiny, in consigning racial pride, along with all other essentialisms, to the shelf. Such artists resist the old, easy-chair version of history that this crowd-pleaser of a show comes too close to emulating. I hope the National Museum of African American History and Culture will resist it too, when it finally gets the home it should have had years ago at the heart of the nation. “Let Your Motto Be Resistance: African American Portraits” continues through Sept. 9 at the International Center of Photography, 1133 Avenue of the Americas, at 43rd Street; (212) 857-0000, icp.org. It opens at the National Portrait Gallery in Washington on Oct. 9. Art: A Movement, or at Least a Moment A Young Man With an Eye, and Friends Up a Tree Unfamiliar Perspectives on Familiar Images International Center of Photography Incredible Flying Granny Nanny Psychiatrists, Children and Drug Industry&#8217;s Role The Minimalist: A No-Frills Kitchen Still Cooks The Curious Cook: The Five-Second Rule Explored, or How Dirty Is That Bologna? Cope With Squeeze Highway Debris, Long an Eyesore, Grows as Hazard Narcotic Maker Guilty of Deceit Over Marketing Fisher Is a Father First, and a Jazz Player Later Genes Take Charge, and Diets Fall by the Wayside Weeks Later': The Satire Is Biting, and So Are the Zombies to Support Abortion Rights G.O.P. Moderates Warn Bush Iraq Must Show Gains Prenatal Test Puts Down Syndrome in Hard Focus Chevron Seen Settling Case on Iraq Oil President Open to Benchmarks in Iraq Measure Gonzales Seems Confident He Will Stay, Officials Say Kansas Tornado Renews Debate on Guard at War Facebook to Offer Free Classifieds 6 Men Arrested in a Terror Plot Against Ft. Dix A Sweet So Sour: Kool-Aid Dills complete guide to summer movies, including critics' picks and a release schedule 5 actors to watch this summer Up close with indie star Parker Posey "The Simpsons Movie" trailer Monterey, Where Kids and Sea Lions Play Vendors’ Removal Restores a Gem In the Big House ... Just Visiting Haberman: The Right to a Defense
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/11/arts/design/11kirs.html Lincoln Kirstein - Whitney Museum of American Art Kirstein' Kirstein’s Lust for Art and Artists 2007 Tucked away on the top floor of the Whitney Museum of American Art is another centenary tribute, in a season of them, to the man who brought to the United States. Lincoln Kirstein (1907-1996) is best remembered for founding with Balanchine the and American School of Ballet. But as a friend of his put it, he had “more arms than Shiva.” show of artists Kirstein championed is at the Whitney and includes a portait of himself by Pavel Tchelitchew. 'The Worlds of Lincoln Kirstein,' by Martin Duberman: A Paragon of the Arts, as Both Man and Titan 'The Worlds of Lincoln Kirstein,' by Martin Duberman: The Outsider Insider Dance: Recalling Kirstein, Endearing Monster Metropolitan Museum of Art A portrait of Lincoln Kirstein as a college student, by Walker Evans. This charming exhibition is about a few of the visual artists he championed. The son of a prominent Boston merchant prince, Kirstein became involved with art during his undergraduate days at when he edited Hound and Horn and helped run the Society for Contemporary Art. Over the years he organized shows, collected art, wrote books and criticism and gave struggling artists saving doses of money. During the middle decades of the last century Kirstein particularly relished attacking the Museum of Modern Art, with which he had collaborated early on but then came to oppose. Pure abstraction was ridiculous, he thought. It had no standards. Against Mondrian and Pollock, Kirstein endorsed, among others, the artists in the show here. They are the sculptors Elie Nadelman and Gaston Lachaise and the painters Paul Cadmus, who was Kirstein’s brother-in-law, and Pavel Tchelitchew, the flamboyant, socially connected Russian expatriate and set designer who became Kirstein’s good friend. The show also includes Walker Evans. Kirstein, long before most others, recognized photography as an art and Evans as a genius. With the exception of Evans, Kirstein’s taste clearly hasn’t won the day, but victory is not everything in matters of artistic rank. Impassioned contrarians like Kirstein have enriched the debate over American art since the 19th century, battling complacency and more than occasionally calling the bluff of avant-gardists who don’t have very good explanations for what they’re doing. It’s a pity that this show doesn’t venture further. At the Society for Contemporary Art Kirstein exhibited Calder and Noguchi. He pioneered writing about and film. At the Modern in the early 1930s he put together a show of mural paintings by Ben Shahn, Stuart Davis, Hugo Gellert and others, which provoked a ruckus with the museum board because much of the art was left-wing. It flopped with critics but deserves a fresh look, if only to recall Kirstein’s polemical zeal and fleeting Bolshevism. A decade later he roamed South America hunting for Latin American art for the Modern. It would be fascinating to unearth what he brought back. Lucian Freud started but never finished Kirstein’s portrait because they got into a fistfight. It should be seen alongside the portraits by Evans, Lachaise and Tchelitchew that the Whitney includes. That wasn’t all. Kirstein wrote about an obscure 19th-century British-American painter named William Rimmer. He married a painter, Fidelma Cadmus. And he enthused over Andrew Wyeth, Jamie Wyeth, George Tooker, Jared French, Henry Koerner and many others whom he truly believed would be remembered after , Beckmann and Dalí were relegated to storage. It hasn’t happened yet. “As for personal favorites, we all have them,” Kirstein once wrote to Lloyd Goodrich, who ran the Whitney during the 1940s. “My attitude is merely against the idea of improvisation, decoration, fragmentation and stylization.” Goodrich wrote back, “By too sweeping condemnation you can do great harm to artists and to the public’s relation to all living art.” They were both exaggerating. Kirstein couldn’t hold back in private. It wasn’t his nature. To his brother-in-law, a gentle soul, he wrote after seeing Cadmus’s painting called “Lust,” of a monstrous woman wrapped in a giant condom: “I do not understand your aching agony about the flesh. I suppose it partly comes from hating being queer” and from the “curdled Catholicism of your nasty youth. I think it is a romantic and immature attitude.” Kirstein, whose own sexuality was fluid, went on: “I don’t think anything as impermanent as flesh is corrupt. Lust isn’t so bad, it lasts no time at all and is not destructive.” How refreshing. Kirstein may be excused for resorting to a language of equivocation and innuendo in public. Explaining, in a book on Cadmus, the splay-legged sailors and naked men sharing a bathroom, he wrote, “As for sexual factors, he has without ostentation or polemic long celebrated somatic health in boys and young men for its symbolic range of human possibility.” Whatever. It was a different era. He liked Cadmus because representational art demanded measurable skill; it depended (here was the link to ballet) on established modes for exhibiting the human body. Out of it came the whole “symbolic range of human possibility.” So Cadmus leaned on Renaissance models. Lachaise looked at Egyptian statues when he sculptured Kirstein’s portrait as a naked man striding. (It’s in the show.) Tchelitchew’s dexterous but rather mysterious style, which is sometimes called visionary but is basically surreal, harked back to Leonardo. And Nadelman contrived urban-folk sculpture that celebrated traditional handicraft. “Lincoln Kirstein” continues through Aug. 27 at the Whitney Museum of American Art, 945 Madison Avenue, at 75th Street; (212) 570-3676, whitney.org. OF THE TIMES; A Paragon of the Arts, as Both Man and Titan Saint-Gaudens Group To Honor Kirstein Whitney Museum of American Art complete guide to summer movies, including critics' picks and a release schedule 5 actors to watch this summer Up close with indie star Parker Posey "The Simpsons Movie" trailer Monterey, Where Kids and Sea Lions Play Vendors’ Removal Restores a Gem In the Big House ... Just Visiting Haberman: The Right to a Defense
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/11/arts/music/11rock.html New York Night Life - Brooklyn - Alternative Music - Parties the Beaten Beat Michael Falco Deacon mans the keyboard at a loft party in Ridgewood, Queens, one of many sites that have emerged to replace the flashier Manhattan nightclub scene. Brooklyn in particular has become a major music nexus. 2007 ON Monday night inside the GlassLands Gallery, a converted warehouse in Williamsburg, Brooklyn, 100 or so people, alerted by MySpace pages and music blogs, gathered for a concert by the Yeah Yeah Yeahs. For an hour, the singer Karen O yelped and shrieked and pranced around a makeshift stage in a paint-splattered gold bodysuit, often wading into the audience a few feet away. At the end of the night the band took requests; to close the set, as her band mates played on, Ms. O paraded most of the crowd toward an alley behind the building, a musical moment as intimate as a reigning rock star can have. Off the Radar The Demimonde Doesn’t Vanish, It Just Changes Location “We hardly play small venues anymore, but this one is definitely special and personal,” Ms. O said afterward. “My favorite kind of party to be at or show to see is a house show. This is as close as you get.” Amid the teeter-totter energy that currently defines New York’s music scene — where the lamented demise of one club is offset by the splashier opening of another — many artists can be found outside that playground entirely, performing at off-the-beaten-path locales like warehouses, rooftops, apartments or inside a Brooklyn oil silo. Music fans with limited funds and a taste for adventure look forward to the summer concert season, which is about to turn the city’s parks and other public spaces into musical free-for-alls. But there are already many places to see bands for little money, without sellout crowds, ticket surcharges or security pat-downs. (Yes, Virginia, there’s even cheap beer.) And the lineups are diverse. Experimental music did not die with the closing of Tonic, nor did grungy rock with the fall of CBGB. With a little planning and an active MetroCard you might catch the next Arcade Fire performing in a parking lot. “Anything is a venue,” said the promoter Todd Patrick, known professionally as Todd P. For six years he has made it his mission to program music in far-flung places, from divey bars in Greenpoint to Lutheran churches to private lofts. Now New York’s alt-location guru, he has recently expanded to work with bands on the verge of stardom (Animal Collective, which he booked in 2005) and even nationally known acts (Oneida, Trans Am) at large clubs like Studio B in Brooklyn, winning the attention of the music industry. But Mr. Patrick’s hallmark remains the cheap, on-the-fly, do-it-yourself concert, promoted through his Web site ( ), his e-mail list (13,000 strong) and MySpace, blog and newspaper and magazine listings. Essentially a one-man band, Mr. Patrick, 31, has interns who work the door (ticket prices rarely go above $10) and stamp hands (he only does all-ages shows) while he helps set up. “Because the idea is about D.I.Y., I like to show the strings,” he said. “I want people to come to the show and see me build the P.A. system, see that there’s nothing glossy about what we’re doing. I think alternative venues are a great way of doing that. It just kind of throws it off. If a club is the quote-unquote appropriate place to see music, why do people have so much more fun in a warehouse?” Last weekend was typical: On Saturday night he booked shows at two unexpected spaces, an Ecuadorian restaurant across from a low-income housing project in Bushwick, Brooklyn, and a loft apartment in Ridgewood, Queens. Both drew several hundred people to outer-borough neighborhoods not typically known as destinations. The restaurant, Don Pedro, had a full menu of ceviche, $3 bottles of Negra Modelo and a small stage in a brick-walled back room where Cass McCombs, a singer with a Lou Reed croon, performed to a packed house. William Alberque, 36, a Defense Department analyst visiting from Washington and a longtime fan of Mr. McCombs’s, said he preferred seeing him anywhere but a rock club. “The D.I.Y. spirit is wonderful,” he said. “It’s just you and the band, five feet away. You buy into what’s happening so much more. It gives you musical butterflies.” At the loft there was even less distance (and more butterflies). The headliner, Dan Deacon, a sensitive electro-party rocker from Baltimore, performed on a patch of carpet in the middle of the room. No stage or bouncer separated him from his audience, which swarmed around, fists pumping, creating a heaving, dancing, steaming mosh pit. Even the walls vibrated. by David Bowie, Shows That He&#8217;d Attend Kitty Carlisle Hart, a New York Blend of Actress, Singer and Arts Advocate, Dies at 96 Classical Music Looks Toward China With Hope For 'Blue-Collar' Musicians, A 'Factory' All Their Own complete guide to summer movies, including critics' picks and a release schedule 5 actors to watch this summer Up close with indie star Parker Posey "The Simpsons Movie" trailer Monterey, Where Kids and Sea Lions Play Vendors’ Removal Restores a Gem In the Big House ... Just Visiting Haberman: The Right to a Defense
http://movies2.nytimes.com/2007/05/11/movies/11late.html 28 Weeks Later - Movies - Review REVIEW | '28 WEEKS LATER' MORE ON '28 Weeks Later' The Satire Is Biting, and So Are the Zombies Emily Beecham in &#34;28 Weeks Later,&#34; directed by Juan Carlos Fresnadillo. 2007 Nothing satisfies the appetite for allegory quite like a movie about flesh-eating zombies. Somehow the genre, at least as practiced by its masters, has the capacity to illuminate some brute facts about the human condition and its contemporary dysfunctions. There are not many recent movies that match, for example, the social criticism undertaken by George Romero in his “Living Dead” cycle. of a Scene: '28 Weeks Later' Movie Minutes: '28 Weeks Later' A group of Londoners run through a tunnel as London is being firebombed in &#34;28 Weeks Later.&#34; and its new sequel, directed by Juan Carlos Fresnadillo, may not quite be in Mr. Romero’s league, but at their best they come close to his signature blend of grisly horror, emotional impact and biting satire. There is, of course, plenty of literal biting as well, since the virus-crazed creatures known as infecteds crave the flesh and blood of their erstwhile fellow citizens. And also their metaphorical flesh and blood. The first movie, set in the early days of a pandemic that nearly wiped out the population of Britain, followed a small band of strangers who came together to form a makeshift tribe. This time, after the first wave of the virus seems to have run its course, the focus is on families and comrades split apart and set against one another by paranoia, moral confusion and the endless conflict between the survival instinct and the call of duty. If “28 Days Later” was, in part, about the emergence of solidarity in the midst of crisis, “28 Weeks Later” is about the breakdown that occurs in what seems to be the aftermath. The DVD of Mr. Boyle’s film has two alternate endings, one slightly more comforting than the other. The hopeful conclusion (the one originally released in American theaters) turns out to be a slender thread leading to Mr. Fresnadillo’s more hectic and somewhat grimmer sequel. The story (written by Rowan Joffe, Mr. Fresnadillo, E. L. Lavigne and Jesus Olmo, with Mr. Boyle and his frequent collaborator, Alex Garland, on hand as executive producers) begins with a terrible failure of nerve. Fleeing a zombie attack, Don (a gaunt, appropriately anxious ) abandons his wife, Alice ( ), to a gruesome and apparently inevitable fate. A few months later, he is safe in the Green Zone, an island of security in London overseen by occupying American troops led by General Stone (Idris Elba). There, he is reunited with his children, Andy (Mackintosh Muggleton) and Tammy (Imogen Poots), who had been on a school trip to Spain during the initial outbreak. He lies to them about their mother’s fate, and his dishonesty is punished in due course. That bit about American soldiers patrolling the Green Zone — see what I mean about allegory? — may make “28 Weeks Later” sound heavy-handedly topical. But as in any good science fiction fable, the analogies it offers to contemporary reality are speculative rather than obvious. The initial benevolence of the occupation is clear enough: a shattered country needs to be put back together, its remaining population protected and reassured. It is only when things spin out of control that the inherent brutality of the situation becomes clear, but here again the movie poses intractable conundrums rather than scoring easy points. To the soldiers and the survivors alike, there are only bad choices, and doing what seems like the right thing — firebombing an open city or rescuing children from the bombs — can turn out to have horrendous consequences. Mr. Fresnadillo’s first movie, the Spanish-language thriller showed him to be a filmmaker with technical agility and a decidedly philosophical bent. Here the thinking is done on the run, as the collapse of order unfolds through scenes of panic and chaos. These are often too frenetically edited and murkily lighted to be truly scary, and the higher dose of gore — infecteds chopped up by helicopter blades; bodies exploding in blood as bullets fly into them — is not enough to increase the horror. The real terror comes at quieter moments, when aerial shots survey the echoing emptiness of London, or when Tammy and Andy sneak out of the Green Zone into the surrounding desolation. “London’s mine,” Andy exclaims, and the claustrophobic suspense of the film is occasionally leavened by a sense of adventure. The threat of death brings out noble impulses as well as selfish ones. Don’s cowardice stands in contrast to the selflessness of some of the American soldiers: Scarlet (Rose Byrne), a medical officer; Doyle (Jeremy Renner), a sniper whose conscience gets the better of him; and, more reluctantly, Flynn (Harold Perrineau), a chopper pilot with pictures of his kids taped above the windshield. “28 Weeks Later” is not for the faint of heart or the weak of stomach. It is brutal and almost exhaustingly terrifying, as any respectable zombie movie should be. It is also bracingly smart, both in its ideas and in its techniques. The last shot brought a burst of laughter at the screening I attended, a reaction that seemed to me both an acknowledgment of Mr. Fresnadillo’s wit and a defense against his merciless rigor. Anyway, I was glad the person next to me was laughing, rather than chewing through my neck. That level of horror will have to wait for the next sequel. “28 Weeks Later” is rated R (Under 17 requires accompanying parent or adult guardian). Rabid zombies feast on living flesh, which causes their potential victims to utter an occasional obscenity. Directed by Juan Carlos Fresnadillo; written by Rowan Joffe, Mr. Fresnadillo, E. L. Lavigne and Jesus Olmo; director of photography, Enrique Chediak; edited by Chris Gill; music by John Murphy; production designer, Mark Tildesley; produced by Enrique López-Lavigne, Andrew Macdonald and Allon Reich; released by Fox Atomic. Running time: 91 minutes. (Don), Rose Byrne (Scarlet), Jeremy Renner (Doyle), Harold Perrineau (Flynn), (Alice), Mackintosh Muggleton (Andy), Imogen Poots (Tammy), Idris Elba (General Stone) and Emily Beecham (Karen). (1 of 66) &#x00bb; Report a Problem Post (4.6 stars, 10 votes) SHOWTIMES AND TICKETS The Incredible Flying Granny Nanny Psychiatrists, Children and Drug Industry&#8217;s Role The Minimalist: A No-Frills Kitchen Still Cooks The Curious Cook: The Five-Second Rule Explored, or How Dirty Is That Bologna? Cope With Squeeze Highway Debris, Long an Eyesore, Grows as Hazard Narcotic Maker Guilty of Deceit Over Marketing Fisher Is a Father First, and a Jazz Player Later Genes Take Charge, and Diets Fall by the Wayside Weeks Later': The Satire Is Biting, and So Are the Zombies to Support Abortion Rights G.O.P. Moderates Warn Bush Iraq Must Show Gains Prenatal Test Puts Down Syndrome in Hard Focus Chevron Seen Settling Case on Iraq Oil President Open to Benchmarks in Iraq Measure Gonzales Seems Confident He Will Stay, Officials Say Kansas Tornado Renews Debate on Guard at War Facebook to Offer Free Classifieds 6 Men Arrested in a Terror Plot Against Ft. Dix A Sweet So Sour: Kool-Aid Dills It Old Skool complete guide to summer movies, including critics' picks and a release schedule 5 actors to watch this summer Up close with indie star Parker Posey "The Simpsons Movie" trailer Monterey, Where Kids and Sea Lions Play Vendors’ Removal Restores a Gem In the Big House ... Just Visiting Haberman: The Right to a Defense
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/11/arts/design/11kirs.html?ex=1336536000&en=ec29ca20bd72f036&ei=5088&partner=rssnyt&emc=rss Lincoln Kirstein - Whitney Museum of American Art Kirstein' Kirstein’s Lust for Art and Artists 2007 Tucked away on the top floor of the Whitney Museum of American Art is another centenary tribute, in a season of them, to the man who brought to the United States. Lincoln Kirstein (1907-1996) is best remembered for founding with Balanchine the and American School of Ballet. But as a friend of his put it, he had “more arms than Shiva.” show of artists Kirstein championed is at the Whitney and includes a portait of himself by Pavel Tchelitchew. 'The Worlds of Lincoln Kirstein,' by Martin Duberman: A Paragon of the Arts, as Both Man and Titan 'The Worlds of Lincoln Kirstein,' by Martin Duberman: The Outsider Insider Dance: Recalling Kirstein, Endearing Monster Metropolitan Museum of Art A portrait of Lincoln Kirstein as a college student, by Walker Evans. This charming exhibition is about a few of the visual artists he championed. The son of a prominent Boston merchant prince, Kirstein became involved with art during his undergraduate days at when he edited Hound and Horn and helped run the Society for Contemporary Art. Over the years he organized shows, collected art, wrote books and criticism and gave struggling artists saving doses of money. During the middle decades of the last century Kirstein particularly relished attacking the Museum of Modern Art, with which he had collaborated early on but then came to oppose. Pure abstraction was ridiculous, he thought. It had no standards. Against Mondrian and Pollock, Kirstein endorsed, among others, the artists in the show here. They are the sculptors Elie Nadelman and Gaston Lachaise and the painters Paul Cadmus, who was Kirstein’s brother-in-law, and Pavel Tchelitchew, the flamboyant, socially connected Russian expatriate and set designer who became Kirstein’s good friend. The show also includes Walker Evans. Kirstein, long before most others, recognized photography as an art and Evans as a genius. With the exception of Evans, Kirstein’s taste clearly hasn’t won the day, but victory is not everything in matters of artistic rank. Impassioned contrarians like Kirstein have enriched the debate over American art since the 19th century, battling complacency and more than occasionally calling the bluff of avant-gardists who don’t have very good explanations for what they’re doing. It’s a pity that this show doesn’t venture further. At the Society for Contemporary Art Kirstein exhibited Calder and Noguchi. He pioneered writing about and film. At the Modern in the early 1930s he put together a show of mural paintings by Ben Shahn, Stuart Davis, Hugo Gellert and others, which provoked a ruckus with the museum board because much of the art was left-wing. It flopped with critics but deserves a fresh look, if only to recall Kirstein’s polemical zeal and fleeting Bolshevism. A decade later he roamed South America hunting for Latin American art for the Modern. It would be fascinating to unearth what he brought back. Lucian Freud started but never finished Kirstein’s portrait because they got into a fistfight. It should be seen alongside the portraits by Evans, Lachaise and Tchelitchew that the Whitney includes. That wasn’t all. Kirstein wrote about an obscure 19th-century British-American painter named William Rimmer. He married a painter, Fidelma Cadmus. And he enthused over Andrew Wyeth, Jamie Wyeth, George Tooker, Jared French, Henry Koerner and many others whom he truly believed would be remembered after , Beckmann and Dalí were relegated to storage. It hasn’t happened yet. “As for personal favorites, we all have them,” Kirstein once wrote to Lloyd Goodrich, who ran the Whitney during the 1940s. “My attitude is merely against the idea of improvisation, decoration, fragmentation and stylization.” Goodrich wrote back, “By too sweeping condemnation you can do great harm to artists and to the public’s relation to all living art.” They were both exaggerating. Kirstein couldn’t hold back in private. It wasn’t his nature. To his brother-in-law, a gentle soul, he wrote after seeing Cadmus’s painting called “Lust,” of a monstrous woman wrapped in a giant condom: “I do not understand your aching agony about the flesh. I suppose it partly comes from hating being queer” and from the “curdled Catholicism of your nasty youth. I think it is a romantic and immature attitude.” Kirstein, whose own sexuality was fluid, went on: “I don’t think anything as impermanent as flesh is corrupt. Lust isn’t so bad, it lasts no time at all and is not destructive.” How refreshing. Kirstein may be excused for resorting to a language of equivocation and innuendo in public. Explaining, in a book on Cadmus, the splay-legged sailors and naked men sharing a bathroom, he wrote, “As for sexual factors, he has without ostentation or polemic long celebrated somatic health in boys and young men for its symbolic range of human possibility.” Whatever. It was a different era. He liked Cadmus because representational art demanded measurable skill; it depended (here was the link to ballet) on established modes for exhibiting the human body. Out of it came the whole “symbolic range of human possibility.” So Cadmus leaned on Renaissance models. Lachaise looked at Egyptian statues when he sculptured Kirstein’s portrait as a naked man striding. (It’s in the show.) Tchelitchew’s dexterous but rather mysterious style, which is sometimes called visionary but is basically surreal, harked back to Leonardo. And Nadelman contrived urban-folk sculpture that celebrated traditional handicraft. “Lincoln Kirstein” continues through Aug. 27 at the Whitney Museum of American Art, 945 Madison Avenue, at 75th Street; (212) 570-3676, whitney.org. OF THE TIMES; A Paragon of the Arts, as Both Man and Titan Saint-Gaudens Group To Honor Kirstein Whitney Museum of American Art Incredible Flying Granny Nanny Psychiatrists, Children and Drug Industry&#8217;s Role The Minimalist: A No-Frills Kitchen Still Cooks The Curious Cook: The Five-Second Rule Explored, or How Dirty Is That Bologna? Cope With Squeeze Highway Debris, Long an Eyesore, Grows as Hazard Narcotic Maker Guilty of Deceit Over Marketing Fisher Is a Father First, and a Jazz Player Later Genes Take Charge, and Diets Fall by the Wayside Weeks Later': The Satire Is Biting, and So Are the Zombies to Support Abortion Rights G.O.P. Moderates Warn Bush Iraq Must Show Gains Prenatal Test Puts Down Syndrome in Hard Focus Chevron Seen Settling Case on Iraq Oil President Open to Benchmarks in Iraq Measure Gonzales Seems Confident He Will Stay, Officials Say Kansas Tornado Renews Debate on Guard at War Facebook to Offer Free Classifieds 6 Men Arrested in a Terror Plot Against Ft. Dix A Sweet So Sour: Kool-Aid Dills complete guide to summer movies, including critics' picks and a release schedule 5 actors to watch this summer Up close with indie star Parker Posey "The Simpsons Movie" trailer Monterey, Where Kids and Sea Lions Play Vendors’ Removal Restores a Gem In the Big House ... Just Visiting Haberman: The Right to a Defense
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/11/arts/design/11poir.html?ex=1336536000&en=0c9d801cf8a47cf4&ei=5088&partner=rssnyt&emc=rss Poiret: King of Fashion - Art - Review King of Fashion' What to Wear to a Revolution Anna Marie Kellen/Galliera, Musee de la Mode de la Ville de Paris Paul Poiret&#146;s 1905 R&#233;v&#233;rend Coat, embellished with Chinese roundels. 2007 “Poiret: King of Fashion,” the Metropolitan Museum of Art ’s sumptuous survey of the designs of the French couturier Paul Poiret (1879-1944), will transform your understanding of the origin of modern fashion. Its radiant hand-painted silk backdrops may also increase your appreciation of the art of set design; they magically create an immersive beauty out of almost nothing. Ray Trust/Artists Rights Society (ARS)/ADAGP A 1923 Man Ray photograph of Peggy Guggenheim wearing a dress by Poiret. Poiret’s achievement is not as visible today as that of Coco Chanel, who built on some of his ideas and discarded others. His fashion house closed in 1929, and he spent his remaining years impoverished. But Poiret was for a while a revolutionary in revolutionary times and also a canny impresario. His radically streamlined, unstructured, often stridently colored clothes freed women from corsets while evoking exotic, non-Western cultures and a fierce disregard for social convention. He introduced these corset-free garments in 1906, the year before committed his decidedly uninhibited (and unstaid) “Demoiselles d’Avignon” to canvas. But with his love of the exotic, his brilliant use of color and pattern, and his penchant for simplified, almost rudimentary form, Poiret most resembles Poiret functioned as a kind of one-man cultural scene. He collected art, gave lavish costume parties and made astute use of the press while laying the groundwork for fashion design as a modern art and a modern business. His clients included , Nancy Cunard, Isadora Duncan, Colette and Helena Rubinstein. Man Ray photographed Peggy Guggenheim in a Poiret gown and turban. Edward Steichen’s first fashion photographs were taken of models in Poiret’s atelier. He was the first designer to understand the value of designing for well-known actresses both onstage and off. He was also the first to create his own line of perfume, named Rosine, for his eldest daughter, and the first to open an interior design store, Atelier Martine, named for his second daughter but inspired by the Weiner Werkstätte. His innovations included the chemise, harem pants and pantaloons and the popular lampshade skirt. When he visited the United States in 1913, he found himself called the king of fashion and discovered the underside of modern fashion success: His lampshade skirt was being copied far and wide. Organized by Harold Koda and Andrew Bolton, who are curator in charge and curator of the Met’s , “Poiret: King of Fashion” conveys quite a bit of his complex genius and his contradictory relationship with modernity. It displays 50 garments on mannequins (by Beyond Design) whose ovoid faces and cryptic features evoke Brancusi and Modigliani. The silk backdrops, which are the work of Jean-Hugues de Chatillon, a French set designer who served as the exhibition’s creative consultant, accent the show’s spaciousness with indelibly Parisian vistas of leafy parks, chic theaters and luxurious drawing rooms. All told you may have the sensation of drifting through a series of extraordinarily beautiful fashion illustrations, an art that Poiret cultivated to his advantage. Poiret’s liberation of the female body was in part inspired by the gamine build and independent spirit of his wife and muse, Denise, whom he married in 1905. In other ways it was born of necessity. Although he was initiated into the couturier business between 1898 and 1903, working as a designer for Jacques Doucet and then the House of Worth, Poiret never trained in the exacting crafts of couture tailoring or dressmaking. His design ideas began with the flat, rectangle of the fabric itself, as did the Japanese kimonos and North African caftans he admired. They then evolved through draping, not tailoring, into garments with a minimum of seams that pretty much hung from the shoulders. Poiret drew from a broad range of sources. Early in the show there is a trio of nightgowns, based on the Classical Greek gown known as the chiton, that are precursors to the 1950s negligee and the early 21st-century socialite party dress. To one side of these are two white high-waisted dresses that hark back to the severe yet demure gowns of post-Revolution France, displayed with an Atelier Martine chair that has bubbly hand-painted fabric. Nearby is evidence of Poiret’s attraction to a more ornate form of non-Western dress: a gauzy harem outfit studded with enormous beads of turquoise celluloid that Denise might have worn to their most famous fete, “The Thousand and Second Night” costume party on June 24, 1911. But turn around and you will see a stark simplicity that may take you aback: a gown that resembles nothing so much as a 1960s abstract painting. Wrapped gracefully around a mannequin, it has no sleeves or collar to speak of, just four broad, alternating bands of stylishly darkened red and blue. “Poiret: King of Fashion” is at the Metropolitan Museum of Art, Fifth Avenue at 82nd Street, (212) 535-7710, through Aug. 5. Face; Shock of the Few CRITIC'S NOTEBOOK; The Reckoning: Ralph Rucci At F.I.T. The Low Life And High Life, Hand in Hand Metropolitan Museum of Art Incredible Flying Granny Nanny Psychiatrists, Children and Drug Industry&#8217;s Role The Minimalist: A No-Frills Kitchen Still Cooks The Curious Cook: The Five-Second Rule Explored, or How Dirty Is That Bologna? Cope With Squeeze Highway Debris, Long an Eyesore, Grows as Hazard Narcotic Maker Guilty of Deceit Over Marketing Fisher Is a Father First, and a Jazz Player Later Genes Take Charge, and Diets Fall by the Wayside Weeks Later': The Satire Is Biting, and So Are the Zombies to Support Abortion Rights G.O.P. Moderates Warn Bush Iraq Must Show Gains Prenatal Test Puts Down Syndrome in Hard Focus Chevron Seen Settling Case on Iraq Oil President Open to Benchmarks in Iraq Measure Gonzales Seems Confident He Will Stay, Officials Say Kansas Tornado Renews Debate on Guard at War Facebook to Offer Free Classifieds 6 Men Arrested in a Terror Plot Against Ft. Dix A Sweet So Sour: Kool-Aid Dills complete guide to summer movies, including critics' picks and a release schedule 5 actors to watch this summer Up close with indie star Parker Posey "The Simpsons Movie" trailer Monterey, Where Kids and Sea Lions Play Vendors’ Removal Restores a Gem In the Big House ... Just Visiting Haberman: The Right to a Defense
http://movies2.nytimes.com/2007/05/11/movies/11late.html?ex=1336536000&en=08b42f416e1ef2fc&ei=5088&partner=rssnyt&emc=rss 28 Weeks Later - Movies - Review REVIEW | '28 WEEKS LATER' MORE ON '28 Weeks Later' The Satire Is Biting, and So Are the Zombies Emily Beecham in &#34;28 Weeks Later,&#34; directed by Juan Carlos Fresnadillo. 2007 Nothing satisfies the appetite for allegory quite like a movie about flesh-eating zombies. Somehow the genre, at least as practiced by its masters, has the capacity to illuminate some brute facts about the human condition and its contemporary dysfunctions. There are not many recent movies that match, for example, the social criticism undertaken by George Romero in his “Living Dead” cycle. of a Scene: '28 Weeks Later' Movie Minutes: '28 Weeks Later' A group of Londoners run through a tunnel as London is being firebombed in &#34;28 Weeks Later.&#34; and its new sequel, directed by Juan Carlos Fresnadillo, may not quite be in Mr. Romero’s league, but at their best they come close to his signature blend of grisly horror, emotional impact and biting satire. There is, of course, plenty of literal biting as well, since the virus-crazed creatures known as infecteds crave the flesh and blood of their erstwhile fellow citizens. And also their metaphorical flesh and blood. The first movie, set in the early days of a pandemic that nearly wiped out the population of Britain, followed a small band of strangers who came together to form a makeshift tribe. This time, after the first wave of the virus seems to have run its course, the focus is on families and comrades split apart and set against one another by paranoia, moral confusion and the endless conflict between the survival instinct and the call of duty. If “28 Days Later” was, in part, about the emergence of solidarity in the midst of crisis, “28 Weeks Later” is about the breakdown that occurs in what seems to be the aftermath. The DVD of Mr. Boyle’s film has two alternate endings, one slightly more comforting than the other. The hopeful conclusion (the one originally released in American theaters) turns out to be a slender thread leading to Mr. Fresnadillo’s more hectic and somewhat grimmer sequel. The story (written by Rowan Joffe, Mr. Fresnadillo, E. L. Lavigne and Jesus Olmo, with Mr. Boyle and his frequent collaborator, Alex Garland, on hand as executive producers) begins with a terrible failure of nerve. Fleeing a zombie attack, Don (a gaunt, appropriately anxious ) abandons his wife, Alice ( ), to a gruesome and apparently inevitable fate. A few months later, he is safe in the Green Zone, an island of security in London overseen by occupying American troops led by General Stone (Idris Elba). There, he is reunited with his children, Andy (Mackintosh Muggleton) and Tammy (Imogen Poots), who had been on a school trip to Spain during the initial outbreak. He lies to them about their mother’s fate, and his dishonesty is punished in due course. That bit about American soldiers patrolling the Green Zone — see what I mean about allegory? — may make “28 Weeks Later” sound heavy-handedly topical. But as in any good science fiction fable, the analogies it offers to contemporary reality are speculative rather than obvious. The initial benevolence of the occupation is clear enough: a shattered country needs to be put back together, its remaining population protected and reassured. It is only when things spin out of control that the inherent brutality of the situation becomes clear, but here again the movie poses intractable conundrums rather than scoring easy points. To the soldiers and the survivors alike, there are only bad choices, and doing what seems like the right thing — firebombing an open city or rescuing children from the bombs — can turn out to have horrendous consequences. Mr. Fresnadillo’s first movie, the Spanish-language thriller showed him to be a filmmaker with technical agility and a decidedly philosophical bent. Here the thinking is done on the run, as the collapse of order unfolds through scenes of panic and chaos. These are often too frenetically edited and murkily lighted to be truly scary, and the higher dose of gore — infecteds chopped up by helicopter blades; bodies exploding in blood as bullets fly into them — is not enough to increase the horror. The real terror comes at quieter moments, when aerial shots survey the echoing emptiness of London, or when Tammy and Andy sneak out of the Green Zone into the surrounding desolation. “London’s mine,” Andy exclaims, and the claustrophobic suspense of the film is occasionally leavened by a sense of adventure. The threat of death brings out noble impulses as well as selfish ones. Don’s cowardice stands in contrast to the selflessness of some of the American soldiers: Scarlet (Rose Byrne), a medical officer; Doyle (Jeremy Renner), a sniper whose conscience gets the better of him; and, more reluctantly, Flynn (Harold Perrineau), a chopper pilot with pictures of his kids taped above the windshield. “28 Weeks Later” is not for the faint of heart or the weak of stomach. It is brutal and almost exhaustingly terrifying, as any respectable zombie movie should be. It is also bracingly smart, both in its ideas and in its techniques. The last shot brought a burst of laughter at the screening I attended, a reaction that seemed to me both an acknowledgment of Mr. Fresnadillo’s wit and a defense against his merciless rigor. Anyway, I was glad the person next to me was laughing, rather than chewing through my neck. That level of horror will have to wait for the next sequel. “28 Weeks Later” is rated R (Under 17 requires accompanying parent or adult guardian). Rabid zombies feast on living flesh, which causes their potential victims to utter an occasional obscenity. Directed by Juan Carlos Fresnadillo; written by Rowan Joffe, Mr. Fresnadillo, E. L. Lavigne and Jesus Olmo; director of photography, Enrique Chediak; edited by Chris Gill; music by John Murphy; production designer, Mark Tildesley; produced by Enrique López-Lavigne, Andrew Macdonald and Allon Reich; released by Fox Atomic. Running time: 91 minutes. (Don), Rose Byrne (Scarlet), Jeremy Renner (Doyle), Harold Perrineau (Flynn), (Alice), Mackintosh Muggleton (Andy), Imogen Poots (Tammy), Idris Elba (General Stone) and Emily Beecham (Karen). (1 of 66) &#x00bb; Report a Problem Post (4.6 stars, 10 votes) SHOWTIMES AND TICKETS The Incredible Flying Granny Nanny Psychiatrists, Children and Drug Industry&#8217;s Role The Minimalist: A No-Frills Kitchen Still Cooks The Curious Cook: The Five-Second Rule Explored, or How Dirty Is That Bologna? Cope With Squeeze Highway Debris, Long an Eyesore, Grows as Hazard Narcotic Maker Guilty of Deceit Over Marketing Fisher Is a Father First, and a Jazz Player Later Genes Take Charge, and Diets Fall by the Wayside Weeks Later': The Satire Is Biting, and So Are the Zombies to Support Abortion Rights G.O.P. Moderates Warn Bush Iraq Must Show Gains Prenatal Test Puts Down Syndrome in Hard Focus Chevron Seen Settling Case on Iraq Oil President Open to Benchmarks in Iraq Measure Gonzales Seems Confident He Will Stay, Officials Say Kansas Tornado Renews Debate on Guard at War Facebook to Offer Free Classifieds 6 Men Arrested in a Terror Plot Against Ft. Dix A Sweet So Sour: Kool-Aid Dills It Old Skool complete guide to summer movies, including critics' picks and a release schedule 5 actors to watch this summer Up close with indie star Parker Posey "The Simpsons Movie" trailer Monterey, Where Kids and Sea Lions Play Vendors’ Removal Restores a Gem In the Big House ... Just Visiting Haberman: The Right to a Defense
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/11/arts/design/11mott.html The Glittering A-List of Black History Your Motto Be Resistance' The Glittering A-List of Black History 2007 “Let Your Motto Be Resistance: African American Portraits” at the International Center of Photography is a praise song in pictures, a shoutout to history. It’s also a fancy-dress inaugural party for the yet-to-be-built National Museum of African American History and Culture in Washington. As such, it is a little too fancy, too heavy on glitz, too short on grit. Still, what a party it is. J. Fernandez/National Portrait Gallery The coffin of the Rev. Dr. Martin Luther King Jr. surrounded by mourners, including his children, in the show &#147;Let Your Motto Be Resistance.&#148; Estate of Linda McCartney/National Portrait Gallery Jimi Hendrix in 1967, one of the glamorous shots in the exhibition. The guest list includes an abbreviated Who’s Who of charismatic black statesmen, from Frederick Douglass to Malcolm X. In terms of entertainment, the event is beyond compare. and Bill (Bojangles) Robinson dance. Sarah Vaughan, Leontyne Price and Odetta share a stage, with Sidney Bechet on sax, and Hazel Scott, looking divine, at the keyboard. You’d look divine too if you had James VanDerZee behind the camera, or Berenice Abbott or Edward Weston or Addison N. Scurlock or any of the other great photographers responsible for the 100 vintage-print portraits here, all from the archives of the Smithsonian’s National Portrait Gallery. There are more artists and writers than usual at such an affair. You’ll recognize Horace Pippin, Edmonia Lewis and a beaming Lorraine Hansberry, by name if not by face. And a few people you may be meeting for the first time. Ernest Everett Just (1883-1941), a pioneering biologist who spent much of his career in Europe after he was stonewalled by the American scientific establishment. And Henry Highland Garnet (1815-1882), a Maryland slave who escaped north, became an abolitionist firebrand and delivered the phrase that gives the show its title: “Strike for your lives and liberties. Rather die freemen than live to be slaves. Let your motto be resistance! Resistance! Resistance!” As you look around the gallery, you can imagine some of the portraits reacting to his call. Elizabeth Catlett (in a wonderful likeness by Mariana Yampolsky), A. Philip Randolph, , Sojourner Truth and a young, blanket-swaddled James Baldwin seem to hear it and they’re on the alert. Mr. Garnet’s words aren’t party words. They are stark, preaching, move-now words. Which brings us back to the kind of party this is. It is, as I said, a housewarming in advance, and a buzz-builder, for a national African-American museum. When that museum goes up on the National Mall — 2015 is the target date — an essential aspect of American history will have its official monument. America and African America are one and the same. They’re inseparable. If this show can be taken as a preview of exhibitions to come, what will that history look like? Obviously, it will have glamour to burn, to judge by the lush, burnished portraits chosen by the guest curator, Deborah Willis, a professor of photography at Roland Hayes, who sang like an angel, looks like an angel in a 1934 light-and-shadow likeness attributed to Johan Hagemeyer. floats like a butterfly for Philippe Halsman’s Vogue-savvy eye. One after another, people glow or glower. Everyone is a star, an inspiration, a certified member of W. E. B. DuBois’s Talented Tenth. This Hall of Fame approach to cultural history delivers thrills, no question. But it also has a too easy, been-there air. The show feels like a throwback to another era, to a kind of exhibition that might have been mounted 20 years ago at the Studio Museum in Harlem , an institution that was until recently deeply invested in black pride, devoted to ethnic uplift. That devotion was effective in its time. Among many other things, it encouraged the upward mobility of what has since become an economically and politically powerful black middle class. But is uplift on the same terms, for the same ends, the right framework for viewing African-American, or any other American, history in 2007? Is Bright and Beautiful the model to follow? The show doesn’t entirely adhere to the model. Wall texts make clear that almost every person portrayed had to fight bitter odds for a seat in front of the camera. Each likeness was, consciously or by default, an effort to cast the African-American image, distorted by racism, in acceptably positive, mainstream terms. Three images, set by side by side at the start of the show, make life-and-death stakes clear. In a 1956 picture the Rev. Dr. Martin Luther King Jr. — just a year after he had successfully used passive resistance as a tactical tool in Montgomery, Ala. — stands in the sunshine beside his smiling wife, Coretta, holding their infant daughter, Yolanda Denise, in his arms. In 1968 the same daughter, now in her teens, looks down at her murdered father in his coffin as her 5-year-old sister, Bernice, reacts with open-mouthed shock to the sight. A year later Stephen Shames catches the 25-year-old Angela Davis standing at a microphone, her mouth open to deliver a speech. Passive resistance is over; active resistance has begun. Significantly, some of the best things in the show are action shots: the Supremes — Diana, Mary and Flo — in a recording session; Stokely Carmichael and a white-suited Adam Clayton Powell Jr. cracking up at a joke; impassively hawking broadsides on the street; Marian Anderson singing as a skinny young These portraits are close to snapshots; their subjects look like regular people, Americans who happen to be black, in the middle of their accomplished lives. African America has, of course, a distinctive history, of profound pain and amazing grace. But the figures in these on-the-fly images are also part of a larger fabric: We the People. They are us; we are them. And with all our shared flaws and heroisms, we make up one mercurial, complicated, crazy quilt of a crew. Many of the young artists seen at the Studio Museum these days are intensely interested in complications, in giving “black” and “white” hard critical scrutiny, in consigning racial pride, along with all other essentialisms, to the shelf. Such artists resist the old, easy-chair version of history that this crowd-pleaser of a show comes too close to emulating. I hope the National Museum of African American History and Culture will resist it too, when it finally gets the home it should have had years ago at the heart of the nation. “Let Your Motto Be Resistance: African American Portraits” continues through Sept. 9 at the International Center of Photography, 1133 Avenue of the Americas, at 43rd Street; (212) 857-0000, icp.org. It opens at the National Portrait Gallery in Washington on Oct. 9. Art: A Movement, or at Least a Moment A Young Man With an Eye, and Friends Up a Tree Unfamiliar Perspectives on Familiar Images International Center of Photography complete guide to summer movies, including critics' picks and a release schedule 5 actors to watch this summer Up close with indie star Parker Posey "The Simpsons Movie" trailer Monterey, Where Kids and Sea Lions Play Vendors’ Removal Restores a Gem In the Big House ... Just Visiting Haberman: The Right to a Defense
http://www.nytimes.com/pages/arts/index.html Arts the Beaten Beat Michael Falco Deacon mans the keyboard at a loft party in Ridgewood, Queens, one of many sites that have emerged to replace the flashier Manhattan nightclub scene. Brooklyn in particular has become a major music nexus. Away from the bright lights of New York’s music scene, many artists are finding new performance spaces in strange, intimate locales. Harlem’s Cultural Anchor in a Sea of Ideas By FELICIA R. LEE As the Schomburg Center unveils its $11 million facelift, Harlem itself is also undergoing one of its periodic renaissances. Audio Slide Show: Fact vs. Fiction Weeks Later' The Satire Is Biting, and So Are the Zombies By A. O. SCOTT “28 Weeks Later” is brutal and almost exhaustingly terrifying. It is also bracingly smart, both in its ideas and in its techniques. Kirstein' Kirstein’s Lust for Art and Artists This charming exhibition is about a few of the visual artists championed by Mr. Kirstein, who founded with Balanchine the and American School of Ballet. King of Fashion' What to Wear to a Revolution The Metropolitan Museum of Art’s sumptuous survey of the designs of the French couturier Paul Poiret will transform your understanding of the origin of modern fashion. Nature, Nature, Burning Bright (High-Def Cameras Frame Thy Fearful Symmetry) Even the most selective library would be ruinously incomplete without the boxed set of “Planet Earth,” cable’s most highly rated natural history program of all time. A Loving Look at a Cinematic Tough Guy: Gangster, Hit Man, Gunslinger A retrospective of Lee Marvin’s work at the Film Society of Lincoln Center showcases an actor of diverse skills, but it’s his bad characters that remain the most memorable. Theater Review | 'Memory' From Wales, Tales of Berlin Then and Bethlehem Now If this flawed but compelling drama, part of the Brits Off Broadway festival, adds up to less than the sum of its parts, it is still engrossing throughout. Music Review | Arcade Fire From Little Clubs to Big Halls, an Indie Band Evolves The concert was the third of three sold-out and it proved that bigness suits this band. Compiled by LAWRENCE VAN GELDER Ken Burns agrees to add Hispanic veterans’ stories to his PBS film on World War II, Kim Cattrall and Daniel Radcliffe will star in a new film and more culture news. No Rain or Love, Till a Guy Promises Both Disillusioned Diva With Glimmers of Soul Melly Still on ‘Coram Boy’ You Go to a Fight, and a Boston Pops Concert Breaks Out Puffing Away That PG Rating 'Animal, Vegetable, Miracle,' by Barbara Kingsolver: Because It’s Good for You, That’s Why Fine Art Fair: Intimate Nooks Filled With Unexpected Treasures Dance Review | Urban Bush Women: Channeling Group Dynamics Fueled by the Power of Funk Music Review | Lisa Gerrard: The Somber Sound of Nondenominational Mysticism Music Review | Anat Cohen Quartet: A Musical World Traveler Who Likes to Mix Things Up Theater Review | 'Couples': Blissful and Benighted: Dispatches From the War of the Sexes Spare Times: For Children About': The Cold Male Gaze A Sense of Purpose Takes Flight Hip Hop Project': Beats With a Meaning Salon': Cutting Hair and Cutting Remarks The Broad Scope of Broadway Revisiting the True Story of a Battered Wife’s Revenge Ex': Chasing an Old Flame, Taking No Prisoners Realism, Both Magic and Downright Mean Rule': Hey, California Girl, Don’t Mess With Grandma Inside Art: Guggenheim Foundation Takes Steps to Preserve Its Artistic Legacy The Glittering A-List of Black History 'Troublesome Young Men,' by Lynne Olson: In Churchill’s Rise to Power, a Rough Path of Rebellion 'The Joy of Drinking,' by Barbara Holland: Against Moderation Feeling the Burn, and the Triumph, After Some Gritty Labors Stomp, Sneeze, Grunt, Gasp and All That Body Language A Loving Look at a Cinematic Tough Guy: Gangster, Hit Man, Gunslinger From Little Clubs to Big Halls, an Indie Band Evolves Verizon Drops Pop Singer From Ads Nature, Nature, Burning Bright (High-Def Cameras Frame Thy Fearful Symmetry) From Wales, Tales of Berlin Then and Bethlehem Now from the past 7 days enter keyword or date e.g. April 21, 2001 Your Motto Be Resistance' The Glittering A-List of Black History This exhibit is a little too fancy, too heavy on glitz, too short on grit. Still, what a party it is. By THE NEW YORK TIMES Reviews of exhibits by Myron Stout and Lisi Raskin, and of the show “Sugar Buzz.” Who uses YouTube? People like paul99503. Go to Blog » The Times's pop music critics discuss the latest albums and music events of the week. Download an MP3 Version Find your comprehensive television listings with this Longer editions of selected event listings in the New York area this week are now available online. The Week in Arts Where Are All the Black Swans? Speaking Love With Kurt and Lotte May 6 - May 12 FIND IT IN NYC MOST POPULAR - ARTS Weeks Later': The Satire Is Biting, and So Are the Zombies Music: Off the Beaten Beat Harlem&#8217;s Cultural Anchor in a Sea of Ideas Video Games: Finding Fellowship (Hairy Feet Optional) Film: A Loving Look at a Cinematic Tough Guy: Gangster, Hit Man, Gunslinger Rule': Hey, California Girl, Don&#8217;t Mess With Grandma Books of the Times: Because It&#8217;s Good for You, That&#8217;s Why Nature, Nature, Burning Bright (High-Def Cameras Frame Thy Fearful Symmetry) King of Fashion': What to Wear to a Revolution Lesley Blanch, 102, a Writer, Traveler and Adventure-Seeker, Dies Mama, Don't You Cry, A New Yellow Wiggle Will Sing Blasts Bush Over Film - Trip Probe Cuba: Michael Moore Victim of Censorship Spielberg Joins Hollywood Chorus on Darfur Flea Ready for Summer, Teaching Kids Music Execs Silent As Rap Debate Rages Calif. Judge Hails Mel Gibson's Progress A complete guide to summer movies, including critics' picks and a release schedule 5 actors to watch this summer Up close with indie star Parker Posey "The Simpsons Movie" trailer Pinus Insignis, at Osborne Post a job online today! Buy, sell or rent a home. Looking to buy a new car? Browse movie reviews from 1913. Get the latest business news Get closer to film, music, art and plays. $3.15 a week.
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/11/arts/design/11poir.html Poiret: King of Fashion - Art - Review King of Fashion' What to Wear to a Revolution Anna Marie Kellen/Galliera, Musee de la Mode de la Ville de Paris Paul Poiret&#146;s 1905 R&#233;v&#233;rend Coat, embellished with Chinese roundels. 2007 “Poiret: King of Fashion,” the Metropolitan Museum of Art ’s sumptuous survey of the designs of the French couturier Paul Poiret (1879-1944), will transform your understanding of the origin of modern fashion. Its radiant hand-painted silk backdrops may also increase your appreciation of the art of set design; they magically create an immersive beauty out of almost nothing. Ray Trust/Artists Rights Society (ARS)/ADAGP A 1923 Man Ray photograph of Peggy Guggenheim wearing a dress by Poiret. Poiret’s achievement is not as visible today as that of Coco Chanel, who built on some of his ideas and discarded others. His fashion house closed in 1929, and he spent his remaining years impoverished. But Poiret was for a while a revolutionary in revolutionary times and also a canny impresario. His radically streamlined, unstructured, often stridently colored clothes freed women from corsets while evoking exotic, non-Western cultures and a fierce disregard for social convention. He introduced these corset-free garments in 1906, the year before committed his decidedly uninhibited (and unstaid) “Demoiselles d’Avignon” to canvas. But with his love of the exotic, his brilliant use of color and pattern, and his penchant for simplified, almost rudimentary form, Poiret most resembles Poiret functioned as a kind of one-man cultural scene. He collected art, gave lavish costume parties and made astute use of the press while laying the groundwork for fashion design as a modern art and a modern business. His clients included , Nancy Cunard, Isadora Duncan, Colette and Helena Rubinstein. Man Ray photographed Peggy Guggenheim in a Poiret gown and turban. Edward Steichen’s first fashion photographs were taken of models in Poiret’s atelier. He was the first designer to understand the value of designing for well-known actresses both onstage and off. He was also the first to create his own line of perfume, named Rosine, for his eldest daughter, and the first to open an interior design store, Atelier Martine, named for his second daughter but inspired by the Weiner Werkstätte. His innovations included the chemise, harem pants and pantaloons and the popular lampshade skirt. When he visited the United States in 1913, he found himself called the king of fashion and discovered the underside of modern fashion success: His lampshade skirt was being copied far and wide. Organized by Harold Koda and Andrew Bolton, who are curator in charge and curator of the Met’s , “Poiret: King of Fashion” conveys quite a bit of his complex genius and his contradictory relationship with modernity. It displays 50 garments on mannequins (by Beyond Design) whose ovoid faces and cryptic features evoke Brancusi and Modigliani. The silk backdrops, which are the work of Jean-Hugues de Chatillon, a French set designer who served as the exhibition’s creative consultant, accent the show’s spaciousness with indelibly Parisian vistas of leafy parks, chic theaters and luxurious drawing rooms. All told you may have the sensation of drifting through a series of extraordinarily beautiful fashion illustrations, an art that Poiret cultivated to his advantage. Poiret’s liberation of the female body was in part inspired by the gamine build and independent spirit of his wife and muse, Denise, whom he married in 1905. In other ways it was born of necessity. Although he was initiated into the couturier business between 1898 and 1903, working as a designer for Jacques Doucet and then the House of Worth, Poiret never trained in the exacting crafts of couture tailoring or dressmaking. His design ideas began with the flat, rectangle of the fabric itself, as did the Japanese kimonos and North African caftans he admired. They then evolved through draping, not tailoring, into garments with a minimum of seams that pretty much hung from the shoulders. Poiret drew from a broad range of sources. Early in the show there is a trio of nightgowns, based on the Classical Greek gown known as the chiton, that are precursors to the 1950s negligee and the early 21st-century socialite party dress. To one side of these are two white high-waisted dresses that hark back to the severe yet demure gowns of post-Revolution France, displayed with an Atelier Martine chair that has bubbly hand-painted fabric. Nearby is evidence of Poiret’s attraction to a more ornate form of non-Western dress: a gauzy harem outfit studded with enormous beads of turquoise celluloid that Denise might have worn to their most famous fete, “The Thousand and Second Night” costume party on June 24, 1911. But turn around and you will see a stark simplicity that may take you aback: a gown that resembles nothing so much as a 1960s abstract painting. Wrapped gracefully around a mannequin, it has no sleeves or collar to speak of, just four broad, alternating bands of stylishly darkened red and blue. “Poiret: King of Fashion” is at the Metropolitan Museum of Art, Fifth Avenue at 82nd Street, (212) 535-7710, through Aug. 5. Face; Shock of the Few CRITIC'S NOTEBOOK; The Reckoning: Ralph Rucci At F.I.T. The Low Life And High Life, Hand in Hand Metropolitan Museum of Art complete guide to summer movies, including critics' picks and a release schedule 5 actors to watch this summer Up close with indie star Parker Posey "The Simpsons Movie" trailer Monterey, Where Kids and Sea Lions Play Vendors’ Removal Restores a Gem In the Big House ... Just Visiting Haberman: The Right to a Defense
http://www.nytimes.com/pages/arts/index.html?partner=rssnyt Arts the Beaten Beat Michael Falco Deacon mans the keyboard at a loft party in Ridgewood, Queens, one of many sites that have emerged to replace the flashier Manhattan nightclub scene. Brooklyn in particular has become a major music nexus. Away from the bright lights of New York’s music scene, many artists are finding new performance spaces in strange, intimate locales. Harlem’s Cultural Anchor in a Sea of Ideas By FELICIA R. LEE As the Schomburg Center unveils its $11 million facelift, Harlem itself is also undergoing one of its periodic renaissances. Audio Slide Show: Fact vs. Fiction Weeks Later' The Satire Is Biting, and So Are the Zombies By A. O. SCOTT “28 Weeks Later” is brutal and almost exhaustingly terrifying. It is also bracingly smart, both in its ideas and in its techniques. Kirstein' Kirstein’s Lust for Art and Artists This charming exhibition is about a few of the visual artists championed by Mr. Kirstein, who founded with Balanchine the and American School of Ballet. King of Fashion' What to Wear to a Revolution The Metropolitan Museum of Art’s sumptuous survey of the designs of the French couturier Paul Poiret will transform your understanding of the origin of modern fashion. Nature, Nature, Burning Bright (High-Def Cameras Frame Thy Fearful Symmetry) Even the most selective library would be ruinously incomplete without the boxed set of “Planet Earth,” cable’s most highly rated natural history program of all time. A Loving Look at a Cinematic Tough Guy: Gangster, Hit Man, Gunslinger A retrospective of Lee Marvin’s work at the Film Society of Lincoln Center showcases an actor of diverse skills, but it’s his bad characters that remain the most memorable. Theater Review | 'Memory' From Wales, Tales of Berlin Then and Bethlehem Now If this flawed but compelling drama, part of the Brits Off Broadway festival, adds up to less than the sum of its parts, it is still engrossing throughout. Music Review | Arcade Fire From Little Clubs to Big Halls, an Indie Band Evolves The concert was the third of three sold-out and it proved that bigness suits this band. Compiled by LAWRENCE VAN GELDER Ken Burns agrees to add Hispanic veterans’ stories to his PBS film on World War II, Kim Cattrall and Daniel Radcliffe will star in a new film and more culture news. No Rain or Love, Till a Guy Promises Both Disillusioned Diva With Glimmers of Soul Melly Still on ‘Coram Boy’ You Go to a Fight, and a Boston Pops Concert Breaks Out Puffing Away That PG Rating 'Animal, Vegetable, Miracle,' by Barbara Kingsolver: Because It’s Good for You, That’s Why Fine Art Fair: Intimate Nooks Filled With Unexpected Treasures Dance Review | Urban Bush Women: Channeling Group Dynamics Fueled by the Power of Funk Music Review | Lisa Gerrard: The Somber Sound of Nondenominational Mysticism Music Review | Anat Cohen Quartet: A Musical World Traveler Who Likes to Mix Things Up Theater Review | 'Couples': Blissful and Benighted: Dispatches From the War of the Sexes Spare Times: For Children About': The Cold Male Gaze A Sense of Purpose Takes Flight Hip Hop Project': Beats With a Meaning Salon': Cutting Hair and Cutting Remarks The Broad Scope of Broadway Revisiting the True Story of a Battered Wife’s Revenge Ex': Chasing an Old Flame, Taking No Prisoners Realism, Both Magic and Downright Mean Rule': Hey, California Girl, Don’t Mess With Grandma Inside Art: Guggenheim Foundation Takes Steps to Preserve Its Artistic Legacy The Glittering A-List of Black History 'Troublesome Young Men,' by Lynne Olson: In Churchill’s Rise to Power, a Rough Path of Rebellion 'The Joy of Drinking,' by Barbara Holland: Against Moderation Feeling the Burn, and the Triumph, After Some Gritty Labors Stomp, Sneeze, Grunt, Gasp and All That Body Language A Loving Look at a Cinematic Tough Guy: Gangster, Hit Man, Gunslinger From Little Clubs to Big Halls, an Indie Band Evolves Verizon Drops Pop Singer From Ads Nature, Nature, Burning Bright (High-Def Cameras Frame Thy Fearful Symmetry) From Wales, Tales of Berlin Then and Bethlehem Now from the past 7 days enter keyword or date e.g. April 21, 2001 Your Motto Be Resistance' The Glittering A-List of Black History This exhibit is a little too fancy, too heavy on glitz, too short on grit. Still, what a party it is. By THE NEW YORK TIMES Reviews of exhibits by Myron Stout and Lisi Raskin, and of the show “Sugar Buzz.” Who uses YouTube? People like paul99503. Go to Blog » The Times's pop music critics discuss the latest albums and music events of the week. Download an MP3 Version Find your comprehensive television listings with this Longer editions of selected event listings in the New York area this week are now available online. The Week in Arts Where Are All the Black Swans? Speaking Love With Kurt and Lotte May 6 - May 12 FIND IT IN NYC MOST POPULAR - ARTS Weeks Later': The Satire Is Biting, and So Are the Zombies Music: Off the Beaten Beat Harlem&#8217;s Cultural Anchor in a Sea of Ideas Video Games: Finding Fellowship (Hairy Feet Optional) Film: A Loving Look at a Cinematic Tough Guy: Gangster, Hit Man, Gunslinger Rule': Hey, California Girl, Don&#8217;t Mess With Grandma Books of the Times: Because It&#8217;s Good for You, That&#8217;s Why Nature, Nature, Burning Bright (High-Def Cameras Frame Thy Fearful Symmetry) King of Fashion': What to Wear to a Revolution Lesley Blanch, 102, a Writer, Traveler and Adventure-Seeker, Dies Mama, Don't You Cry, A New Yellow Wiggle Will Sing Blasts Bush Over Film - Trip Probe Cuba: Michael Moore Victim of Censorship Spielberg Joins Hollywood Chorus on Darfur Flea Ready for Summer, Teaching Kids Music Execs Silent As Rap Debate Rages Calif. Judge Hails Mel Gibson's Progress A complete guide to summer movies, including critics' picks and a release schedule 5 actors to watch this summer Up close with indie star Parker Posey "The Simpsons Movie" trailer Hair Pulling Feat 1925 Buy, sell or rent a home. Which gadget is getting all the buzz? Get closer to film, music, art and plays. $3.15 a week. Plan what to see, eat and do. Tell us your nursing story. Inspiration & lessons. What movie should you see?
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/11/arts/design/11harl.html?ex=1336536000&en=de4176d49d104719&ei=5088&partner=rssnyt&emc=rss Schomburg Center for Research in Black Culture - Harlem Cultural Anchor in a Sea of Ideas 2007 could almost see the ghosts among the new furniture and modern recessed lighting. It was a few days before the staff at the Schomburg Center for Research in Black Culture, at 135th Street and Boulevard in Harlem, finished hanging two exhibitions and stripping the paper off the doors at its bigger, brighter new entrance. Amid the sounds of hammers and drills, they prepared for tomorrow’s public celebration of the center’s two-year, $11 million renovation. Washington/The 1925 sign from the New York Public Library&#146;s Negro division. Ruby Washington/The new facade at the Schomburg Center for Research in Black Culture. The Schomburg is as much a monument to an idea as it is a building. So those ghosts, workaday and luminous, inhabit a space of many incarnations, tracing its roots back to the 135th Street New York Public Library branch that opened there in 1905. Predominantly Jewish then, Harlem was mostly black by 1924. Over the years, Alex Haley researched “Roots” at the Schomburg; James Baldwin and both found it a refuge; a young honed his craft there. By the time it officially became the Schomburg in 1972, taking its name from Arturo Alfonso Schomburg, the Puerto Rican-born black bibliophile who donated his collection, it was a one-stop connection with the global black experience. Its wonders include a rare recording of a Marcus Garvey speech, documents signed by Toussaint L’Ouverture, a signed first edition of Phillis Wheatley’s poetry, daguerreotypes of African-Americans from the 1830s, Benjamin Banneker’s almanacs. Its exhibitions have tracked black migration and displayed the contents of Malcolm X’s pocket when he was gunned down at the Audubon Ballroom. “The center has increasingly become one of the cultural anchors of the greater Harlem community, one of the top three tourist destinations, along with the Apollo and the Studio Museum in Harlem ,” said Howard Dodson, the Schomburg director. “The kind of change that’s taking place in Harlem is of political, social and historical interest to the center, and we’ll be here to document it. We are not going anywhere.” As the Schomburg unveils its facelift, Harlem itself is also undergoing one of its periodic renaissances. There’s new real estate development, new stores and restaurants, new places to imbibe culture. The association with Harlem has been the constant for the Schomburg trove of more than five million items: art, manuscripts, films, photographs. The center has been a place for community meetings and for local politicians, for schoolchildren and eminent researchers like the historian John Hope Franklin. Thelma Golden, the director and chief curator of the Studio Museum, is among those who see the renovated Schomburg as an emblem of a Harlem at the top of its game. Hundreds of thousands of tourists pour into Harlem annually to shop in the stores on 125th Street, sit in the pews of the historic Abyssinian Baptist Church or revel in the serendipity of finding new cafes or dowager buildings. “The Schomburg stands as a bearer of the idea that our history and culture are important,” said Ms. Golden, who is African-American. “The renovation will reinvent the sense of the institution as living, breathing space. All the cultural institutions in Harlem are going through a period of incredible growth, and it’s not just about physical renovation.” A walk through Harlem makes vivid its embrace of many worlds. There are the tiny African braiding shops, mom-and-pop restaurants with an African or Caribbean flavor, as well as Citarella and Starbucks amid the cacophony of 125th Street, the area’s commercial spine. It is dotted with stores like Old Navy, as well as the Apollo and the Studio Museum. The streets are cleaner and safer than they have been in years. With its hilly topography and low-slung buildings framing the sky, these days Harlem is also a beehive of brownstone renovation and new construction. A few blocks from the Schomburg, condominiums are going up on either side of the street. Take a side street and you may glimpse decrepit apartment buildings or well-tended row houses shrouded in quiet. The new incarnation of the Schomburg Center, designed by the firm Dattner Architects, has more open spaces, light wood and glass, and is intended to be both more inviting and more distinctive than the old building. The center is part of the New York Public Library; the renovation was primarily financed by the city, with additional state support. The other day Mr. Dodson ticked off his plans for the center’s new resources, which include the latest technology. They include working with the Overtown community in Miami to develop an African diaspora heritage trail and helping officials in Liberia and South Africa to develop archives. Closer to home, the Schomburg is involved with the African Burial Ground project. In 1991 workers excavating the foundation for a new building uncovered human remains, which turned out to be from the site where historians say 15,000 slaves were buried from 1640 to 1795 on nearly seven acres near what is now City Hall Park and the Municipal Building. President Bush has proclaimed part of the space a national monument. On May 19 the papers donated by the family of Malcolm X will go on display at the Schomburg. 100 articles a month from The Archive - get it now with TimesSelect REVIEW; The Personal Evolution Of a Civil Rights Giant Malcolm X the Thinker, Brought Into Focus Black Migration, Both Slave And Free An Artist Talked and a World Listens Schomburg Center for Research in Black Culture Incredible Flying Granny Nanny Psychiatrists, Children and Drug Industry&#8217;s Role The Minimalist: A No-Frills Kitchen Still Cooks The Curious Cook: The Five-Second Rule Explored, or How Dirty Is That Bologna? Cope With Squeeze Highway Debris, Long an Eyesore, Grows as Hazard Narcotic Maker Guilty of Deceit Over Marketing Fisher Is a Father First, and a Jazz Player Later Genes Take Charge, and Diets Fall by the Wayside Weeks Later': The Satire Is Biting, and So Are the Zombies to Support Abortion Rights G.O.P. Moderates Warn Bush Iraq Must Show Gains Prenatal Test Puts Down Syndrome in Hard Focus Chevron Seen Settling Case on Iraq Oil President Open to Benchmarks in Iraq Measure Gonzales Seems Confident He Will Stay, Officials Say Kansas Tornado Renews Debate on Guard at War Facebook to Offer Free Classifieds 6 Men Arrested in a Terror Plot Against Ft. Dix A Sweet So Sour: Kool-Aid Dills complete guide to summer movies, including critics' picks and a release schedule 5 actors to watch this summer Up close with indie star Parker Posey "The Simpsons Movie" trailer Monterey, Where Kids and Sea Lions Play Vendors’ Removal Restores a Gem In the Big House ... Just Visiting Haberman: The Right to a Defense
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/11/arts/design/11harl.html Schomburg Center for Research in Black Culture - Harlem Cultural Anchor in a Sea of Ideas 2007 could almost see the ghosts among the new furniture and modern recessed lighting. It was a few days before the staff at the Schomburg Center for Research in Black Culture, at 135th Street and Boulevard in Harlem, finished hanging two exhibitions and stripping the paper off the doors at its bigger, brighter new entrance. Amid the sounds of hammers and drills, they prepared for tomorrow’s public celebration of the center’s two-year, $11 million renovation. Washington/The 1925 sign from the New York Public Library&#146;s Negro division. Ruby Washington/The new facade at the Schomburg Center for Research in Black Culture. The Schomburg is as much a monument to an idea as it is a building. So those ghosts, workaday and luminous, inhabit a space of many incarnations, tracing its roots back to the 135th Street New York Public Library branch that opened there in 1905. Predominantly Jewish then, Harlem was mostly black by 1924. Over the years, Alex Haley researched “Roots” at the Schomburg; James Baldwin and both found it a refuge; a young honed his craft there. By the time it officially became the Schomburg in 1972, taking its name from Arturo Alfonso Schomburg, the Puerto Rican-born black bibliophile who donated his collection, it was a one-stop connection with the global black experience. Its wonders include a rare recording of a Marcus Garvey speech, documents signed by Toussaint L’Ouverture, a signed first edition of Phillis Wheatley’s poetry, daguerreotypes of African-Americans from the 1830s, Benjamin Banneker’s almanacs. Its exhibitions have tracked black migration and displayed the contents of Malcolm X’s pocket when he was gunned down at the Audubon Ballroom. “The center has increasingly become one of the cultural anchors of the greater Harlem community, one of the top three tourist destinations, along with the Apollo and the Studio Museum in Harlem ,” said Howard Dodson, the Schomburg director. “The kind of change that’s taking place in Harlem is of political, social and historical interest to the center, and we’ll be here to document it. We are not going anywhere.” As the Schomburg unveils its facelift, Harlem itself is also undergoing one of its periodic renaissances. There’s new real estate development, new stores and restaurants, new places to imbibe culture. The association with Harlem has been the constant for the Schomburg trove of more than five million items: art, manuscripts, films, photographs. The center has been a place for community meetings and for local politicians, for schoolchildren and eminent researchers like the historian John Hope Franklin. Thelma Golden, the director and chief curator of the Studio Museum, is among those who see the renovated Schomburg as an emblem of a Harlem at the top of its game. Hundreds of thousands of tourists pour into Harlem annually to shop in the stores on 125th Street, sit in the pews of the historic Abyssinian Baptist Church or revel in the serendipity of finding new cafes or dowager buildings. “The Schomburg stands as a bearer of the idea that our history and culture are important,” said Ms. Golden, who is African-American. “The renovation will reinvent the sense of the institution as living, breathing space. All the cultural institutions in Harlem are going through a period of incredible growth, and it’s not just about physical renovation.” A walk through Harlem makes vivid its embrace of many worlds. There are the tiny African braiding shops, mom-and-pop restaurants with an African or Caribbean flavor, as well as Citarella and Starbucks amid the cacophony of 125th Street, the area’s commercial spine. It is dotted with stores like Old Navy, as well as the Apollo and the Studio Museum. The streets are cleaner and safer than they have been in years. With its hilly topography and low-slung buildings framing the sky, these days Harlem is also a beehive of brownstone renovation and new construction. A few blocks from the Schomburg, condominiums are going up on either side of the street. Take a side street and you may glimpse decrepit apartment buildings or well-tended row houses shrouded in quiet. The new incarnation of the Schomburg Center, designed by the firm Dattner Architects, has more open spaces, light wood and glass, and is intended to be both more inviting and more distinctive than the old building. The center is part of the New York Public Library; the renovation was primarily financed by the city, with additional state support. The other day Mr. Dodson ticked off his plans for the center’s new resources, which include the latest technology. They include working with the Overtown community in Miami to develop an African diaspora heritage trail and helping officials in Liberia and South Africa to develop archives. Closer to home, the Schomburg is involved with the African Burial Ground project. In 1991 workers excavating the foundation for a new building uncovered human remains, which turned out to be from the site where historians say 15,000 slaves were buried from 1640 to 1795 on nearly seven acres near what is now City Hall Park and the Municipal Building. President Bush has proclaimed part of the space a national monument. On May 19 the papers donated by the family of Malcolm X will go on display at the Schomburg. REVIEW; The Personal Evolution Of a Civil Rights Giant Malcolm X the Thinker, Brought Into Focus Black Migration, Both Slave And Free An Artist Talked and a World Listens Schomburg Center for Research in Black Culture complete guide to summer movies, including critics' picks and a release schedule 5 actors to watch this summer Up close with indie star Parker Posey "The Simpsons Movie" trailer Monterey, Where Kids and Sea Lions Play Vendors’ Removal Restores a Gem In the Big House ... Just Visiting Haberman: The Right to a Defense
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/12/arts/music/12OPER.html?ex=1336622400&en=41fe0ed15d8f8e59&ei=5088&partner=rssnyt&emc=rss Washington National Opera - simulcast - schools - universities From Washington, Opera for the College Crowd 2007 Students wandering into some college auditoriums on Sept. 23 may receive a few unexpected lessons on subjects like the nature of Bohemian love, consumptive heroines and life in a garret. The Washington National Opera said it planned to simulcast a live matinee performance of Puccini’s “Bohème” to 14 college campuses and 2 high schools. The feed to the institutions will piggyback on an outdoor broadcast at the Washington Monument, an annual event begun two years ago. led the way with regular live and recorded broadcasts. But the has taken a different tack. The Met sends its broadcasts to movie theaters around the country, which charge $18 a ticket. The campus simulcasts will be free. Two local movie theaters will also have free showings. “We are convinced that it’s very important to try to make opera more accessible,” said , the Washington Opera’s president. “We’ve got to reach out and try to find young opera lovers.” He said the other main goal was to spark interest among donors and foundations to contribute money to the opera company. “There is a fund-raising effort behind this,” said Mr. Feinberg, who from 2001 to 2004 was the special master of the Sept. 11 Victim Compensation Fund. “Whether it will pay off, I do not know.” The overall cost of the simulcast is about $500,000, which will be provided by extra fund-raising, and will cover the expenses of the colleges and schools in showing the opera. A similar simulcast, of a new production of Verdi’s “Rigoletto,” is planned for the spring. , the Washington Opera’s general director, praised the Met general manager, Peter Gelb, for introducing the widespread simulcasts. But they took pains to set their own project apart, noting that their showings were free and aimed at attracting young people to opera. “We are so happy to make this simulcast free not only to our university partners across the country, but also to local students and anyone who wants a taste of top-quality opera,” Mr. Domingo said in a statement released by his assistant. The company named the institutions involved as Bryn Mawr, Princeton, Tulane, , Temple, Rice, the University of North Carolina , Union College, Brockton High School in Massachusetts and Lowell High School in San Francisco. Separately, the Washington Opera said it had an agreement with XM Satellite Radio to transmit old performances over a 23-week period, although XM said the contract had yet to be signed. XM’s rival, Sirius, broadcasts Met performances. of 14) The End of The Great Big American Voice MUSIC; You'll Never Guess Who's Playing At the D.M.V. MUSIC; The Juilliard Effect: Ten Years Later Bronx Journal; So Class, How Do You Make a Cello? Fatten Up a Violin of 14) &#x00bb; The Incredible Flying Granny Nanny The Curious Cook: The Five-Second Rule Explored, or How Dirty Is That Bologna? The Minimalist: A No-Frills Kitchen Still Cooks Highway Debris, Long an Eyesore, Grows as Hazard Cope With Squeeze Psychiatrists, Children and Drug Industry&#8217;s Role The Critical Years: Middle School Manages Distractions of Adolescence Genes Take Charge, and Diets Fall by the Wayside Fisher Is a Father First, and a Jazz Player Later Your Money: A Contrarian on Retirement Says Wait to Support Abortion Rights G.O.P. Moderates Warn Bush Iraq Must Show Gains Bush in Accord With Democrats on Trade Deals President Open to Benchmarks in Iraq Measure Gonzales Seems Confident He Will Stay, Officials Say Facebook to Offer Free Classifieds Role of F.B.I. Informer Draws Praise and Questions On Carrier in Gulf, Cheney Issues Warning to Iran Romney Works to Put Skeptics' Doubts to Rest new Broadway show Legally Blonde delivers "a nonstop sugar rush" Angela Lansbury in "Deuce" A trashy Tupperware lady hits the stage David Mamet to return to the theater of politics One Says ‘9/11.’ No One Needs To. Father and Son, Just Two More Soccer Fans The Rings of Giuliani
http://theater2.nytimes.com/2007/05/12/theater/reviews/12stai.html?ex=1336622400&en=47acb7a7c3b939c7&ei=5088&partner=rssnyt&emc=rss Stairway to Paradise - Encores! - Theater - Review REVIEW | STAIRWAY TO PARADISE MORE ON 'Stairway to Paradise' Mining a Rich Vein of Sequins in Revues 2007 Encores! has built its own jukebox, and it gleams like gold. “Stairway to Paradise,” which runs through Monday at City Center, is an anthology of truly olden oldies, songs the theatergoing masses heard in musical revues in the first half of the 20th century. And yes, I know, it all sounds too quaint and camp and, well, dusty, for words. Krulwich/The Chamberlin and Kristin Chenoweth performing at City Center. Sara Krulwich/The Chenoweth, with tambourine, and Capathia Jenkins, right foreground, in the Encores! production of &#147;Stairway to Paradise&#148; at City Center. Sara Krulwich/The Jones in &#147;Stairway to Paradise,&#148; which offers songs from 50 years of musical revues. But the radiant surprise of “Stairway to Paradise,” which was conceived by Jack Viertel (the artistic director of Encores!) and directed by Jerry Zaks, is how much fresher it feels than contemporary Broadway blockbusters that use more recent pop songbooks. “Mamma Mia!” (the Abba musical) and “Jersey Boys” (the Four Seasons story) — the two mighty survivors of the jukebox trend — coast on happy associations for audiences who grew up necking, dancing and driving to such music. With Top 40 numbers strung together in skeletal, self-conscious plots, these are shows that wink through sweet-stinging tears, while whispering: “Ah, weren’t we innocent then? Weren’t we sexy?” Since it seems unlikely that anyone who sees “Stairway to Paradise” was around when a number like “The Maiden With the Dreamy Eyes” was first performed in 1901, much of this show could be nostalgic in only an abstract way. But pure nostalgia has never been what the Encores! series of concert musicals is about. At their best, these shows capture a strong whiff of the original appeal of vintage works, minus pinching and distorting quotation marks. And Mr. Zaks has steered a top-of-the-line cast — including , Kevin Chamberlin, Christopher Fitzgerald, Ruthie Henshall and Capathia Jenkins — into personally stamped performances that dispel any lingering scent of mothballs. From its besequined and beplumed early years (the age of the Ziegfeld Follies) to its street-smart twilight (the wisecracking New Faces series), the Broadway revue format celebrated by “Stairway to Paradise” was above all a showcase for distinctive talents, even if talent, in some cases, meant nothing more than the ability to look fabulous wearing a four-story headdress. So “Stairway” pays tribute to the long-stemmed beauties who once slinked across palatial stages like animated floral arrangements, to comic songsters who made their ethnicity a clown’s costume and to velvet-voiced canaries with bared ivory shoulders. But there’s nothing of the slapdash scrapbook about “Stairway.” It is a very careful assemblage, in roughly chronological order, that creates a portrait of what made America (or its sophisticated city cousins, in any case) laugh, dance, swoon and occasionally cry over a period of 50 years. Without pressing the point, the show charts an eloquent timeline between phases of giddy escapism and socially conscious sobriety in a period that encompassed a depression and two world wars. This means that the gilded chameleon Ms. Chenoweth becomes both a self-infatuated trilling soprano of Victor Herbert arias and a saltier chorus girl, who, though dressed like a Ziegfeld chorine-cum-show-horse, realizes that she’s tired of pure fluff. (Hence a deliciously out-of-context performance of “Sing Me a Song of Social Significance,” from the 1937 pro-union revue “Pins and Needles.”) Mr. Chamberlin, in fine form, pulls off a nifty impression of , while Ms. Chenoweth impersonates impersonating an American Indian, as Mr. Fitzgerald does Beatrice Lillie doing a shameless cartoon of a Japanese geisha. (Since ethnic humor doesn’t have the wholesome reputation it once did, quotation marks inserted here, but gently.) Torch songs, love duets, Army numbers (for both world wars, by ), ballads and double-entendre scorchers: they’re all on tap here, some familiar (Rodgers and Hart’s “Manhattan,” Schwartz and Dietz’s “Dancing in the Dark”) and some among the greatest songs you’ve never heard (a scrumptious paean to hell as a vacation paradise, Berlin’s “Pack Up Your Sins and Go to the Devil,” and a suburban housewife’s lament of disenchantment from 1952’s “Guess Who I Saw Today”). Precision, wit and polish are evident in every note, step and sequin. There’s not a routine — including a couple of sublimely silly sketches — that is merely tossed off. The design team, which includes John Lee Beatty (scenic consultant) and William Ivey Long (costumes), conveys a lush, eye-filling sense of period that never becomes a straitjacket. The orchestra, conducted by Rob Berman, and the impeccably arranged vocal harmonies provide the most savory ear candy in town, while Warren Carlyle’s choreography gracefully tips its top hat to the urbane agility of Fred and Adele Astaire, as well as to the processional undulations of statuesque professional beauties. Much of the appeal of the old revues was built on the appreciation of sui generis talents: a Brice, a Durante, a Libby Holman, an . There’s little room for such stylish idiosyncrasies in today’s big Broadway concept musicals, where performers are often asked to be cyborgs in theme park rides or human puppets. You can thus feel the pleasure rush that the stars of “Stairway” derive from claiming elegant specialty numbers as their own, using muscles that have probably been inactive for a while. So we have Ms. Jenkins slyly peddling (instead of overselling) the wicked sauciness of Eubie Blake’s “My Handy Man Ain’t Handy No More” and bringing a resonant stillness to “Supper Time,” Irving Berlin’s song about a racial lynching. Ms. Henshall burns a torch with appropriately cool heat in ballads by Blake and , while Mr. Fitzgerald demonstrates a disarming way with a marinara-sauce-accent in an Italian novelty number. Then there’s Kendrick Jones, the most exquisitely expressive young tap dancer since first wowed New York. When Mr. Jones weaves his way through a line of men dressed as soldiers, who are singing a swirling chorale by Harold Rome about returning from war, his feet tap an annotation to the lyrics with a grace that seems both casual and exacting. Mr. Jones is channeling a venerable tradition in popular entertainment. But he’ s translating it into a transcendent personal language. Something old and something new coexist, not only compatibly but also gloriously. That kind of rejuvenation beats plain old nostalgia any day. 50 Years of Revue in Review Music, lyrics and sketches by Nora Bayes, , Eubie Blake, Henry Blossom, Elisse Boyd, Bob Cole, , B. G. DeSylva, Howard Dietz, , Leo Edwards, Dorothy Fields, , Jay Gorney, Murray Grand, , E. Y. Harburg, Lorenz Hart, Victor Herbert, J. W. Johnson, , Jean Kerr, Walter Kerr, Duke Leonard, Jimmy McHugh, Blanche Merrill, Ed G. Nelson, Jack Norworth, Harry Pease, Andy Razaf, , Harold Rome, Arthur Schwartz, Paul Gerard Smith, and P. G. Wodehouse; directed by Jerry Zaks; guest music director, vocal and dance arranger, Rob Berman; conceived by Jack Viertel; set consultation by John Lee Beatty; sound by Tom Morse; costume consultation by William Ivey Long; lighting by Paul Gallo; orchestrations, Jonathan Tunick; music coordinator, Seymour Red Press; company manager, Michael Zande; production stage manager, Rolt Smith; choreography by Warren Carlyle. Presented by EncoresifiArlene Shuler, president and chief executive; Mark Litvin, senior vice president and managing director; Mr. Viertel, artistic director; Paul Gemignani, music director. At City Center, 131 West 55th Street, Manhattan; (212) 581-1212. Through Monday. Running time: 2 hours 20 minutes. , Kevin Chamberlin, Christopher Fitzgerald, Jenn Gambatese, Michael Gruber, Shonn Wiley, J. Mark McVey, Holly Cruikshank, Kendrick Jones, Capathia Jenkins and Ruthie Henshall. (1 of 35) &#x00bb; Report a Problem Post (3.6 stars, 5 votes) by David Bowie, Shows That He&#8217;d Attend Don't Trust Your Ears: This Play Is Not a Musical Line Up, Young Hopefuls (And Really, Be Young) Kitty Carlisle Hart, a New York Blend of Actress, Singer and Arts Advocate, Dies at 96 110 in the Shade 25th Annual Putnam C... Beauty and the Beast The Coast of Utopia ... The Coast of Utopia ... The Coast of Utopia ... A Moon for the Misbe... The Phantom of the O... The Year of Magical ... The Awesome 80s Prom Bad Blood - Malasang... Beauty on the Vine The Big Voice: God o... Bill W. and Dr. Bob Blue Man Group: Tube... Boys Just Wanna Have... Brits Off Broadway: ... Brits Off Broadway: ... Cronica de Una Muert... Don't Quit Your Nigh... I Love You, You're P... INTAR: Daughter of a... A Jew Grows in Brook... La Casa de Bernarda ... Make Me a Song: The ... Momma's Boyz (Los Ne... Murdered by the Mob The President and He... Tony n' Tina's Weddi... Two Gentlemen of Ver... 110 in the Shade Beauty on the Vine The Big Voice: God o... The Incredible Flying Granny Nanny The Curious Cook: The Five-Second Rule Explored, or How Dirty Is That Bologna? The Minimalist: A No-Frills Kitchen Still Cooks Highway Debris, Long an Eyesore, Grows as Hazard Cope With Squeeze Psychiatrists, Children and Drug Industry&#8217;s Role The Critical Years: Middle School Manages Distractions of Adolescence Genes Take Charge, and Diets Fall by the Wayside Fisher Is a Father First, and a Jazz Player Later Your Money: A Contrarian on Retirement Says Wait to Support Abortion Rights G.O.P. Moderates Warn Bush Iraq Must Show Gains Bush in Accord With Democrats on Trade Deals President Open to Benchmarks in Iraq Measure Gonzales Seems Confident He Will Stay, Officials Say Facebook to Offer Free Classifieds Role of F.B.I. Informer Draws Praise and Questions On Carrier in Gulf, Cheney Issues Warning to Iran Romney Works to Put Skeptics' Doubts to Rest new Broadway show Legally Blonde delivers "a nonstop sugar rush" Angela Lansbury in "Deuce" A trashy Tupperware lady hits the stage David Mamet to return to the theater of politics Forever Fab Beatles Commemorative One Says ‘9/11.’ No One Needs To. Father and Son, Just Two More Soccer Fans The Rings of Giuliani
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/12/arts/design/12aphr.html J. Paul Getty Museum - Antiquities Moves Closer to Returning an Ancient Statue to Italy 2007 LOS ANGELES, May 11 — The J. Paul Getty Museum inched a step closer to relinquishing ownership of one of its most prized artifacts, a 2,400-year-old statue of a goddess claimed by Italy, at a conference of international experts to discuss the artifact this week, its director said. statue at the center of a dispute between the J. Paul Getty Museum and the Italian government. The Getty has not reached a formal conclusion based on the conference, which was convened at the museum on Wednesday and was closed to the public. But museum officials and some of the experts who attended said their discussions buttressed what the museum says are its own suspicions that the statue, acquired by the Getty in 1988, might have been illegally excavated in southern Italy. “There was no dramatic single conclusion, no eureka moment, but it is certainly helping us narrow down the focus,” Michael Brand, the museum’s director, said in an interview. “It would be fair to say that most of the discussion focused on Sicily.” The statue’s precise provenance, like that of many antiquities, is unknown. But the Italian government asserts that it was looted in recent decades, and Mr. Brand said the Getty’s own investigation into its acquisition had revealed “problems.” The museum offered to relinquish title to the statue in November, when negotiations with Italy over the statue and 51 other artifacts broke down. It said it would study the disputed object for a year before making a final decision. At the time, the museum also unilaterally decided to return 26 of the objects. If the Getty turned up persuasive evidence that the statue came from a different archaeological source country, like Libya, or that it had been found and removed from Italy before 1939, when a ban was imposed on such exports, that could furnish a justification for keeping it. But so far no such clear evidence has emerged, Mr. Brand said. He said: “We intend to resolve this whole matter within the next six months, and we will. At some point our board of trustees has to agree to take it out of the public trust and possibly give it to someone else. We should do that very carefully.” The dispute has been part of a painful process of self-examination at an institution rocked by other scandals and disputes in the last decade. The Getty’s former antiquities curator, Marion True, remains on trial in Italy on charges of conspiring to acquire looted objects for the museum. An investigator testified at the trial last year that the goddess had been exported after an illegal excavation in Morgantina in central Sicily, at one time a richly developed part of the Greek empire. Malcolm Bell III, an archaeologist at the who attended Wednesday’s conference, said that there was so far no conclusive evidence that the statue came from Morgantina, where he conducts research, but added, “I think there’s a very strong probability that it came from Sicily.” “Until we know the find spot, we can’t say with certainty,” he said. A spokeswoman for the Italian Culture Ministry in Rome declined to comment on the meeting. The Getty said that Italy had not responded to two invitations to take part. The statue, a rare example of a cult figure considered the embodiment of a deity and used in Greek temple rituals, is viewed as the most historically significant artifact that Italy is demanding that the Getty return. The museum bought the piece for $18 million, a record for an ancient artifact at the time of its purchase. Italy, Greece and many archaeologists argue that museums like the Getty motivate looters to ransack ancient sites and middlemen to trade in illicit antiquities because of their willingness to pay huge prices to build their collections. Experts in art conservation and in soil, pollen and stone analysis convened at the recently refurbished Getty antiquities museum, a Greek-inspired villa in nearby Pacific Palisades. They spent about an hour at the villa inspecting the statue, a seven-and-a-half-foot standing figure with windswept robes carved in limestone, a placid expression on her smooth marble face. Rosario Alaimo, a professor of geochemistry at the University of Palermo, presented research suggesting that the limestone appeared to have been quarried in eastern Sicily, the Getty said. The museum said that John Twilley, a New York conservator and soil expert, presented a chemical analysis of the dirt removed from holes in the statue at the time of its acquisition, while stating that further study would be required before conclusions could be drawn. A new study of pollen remains by Pamela I. Chester, an archaeological palynologist from New Zealand, said the dirt seemed to come from an open landscape that had been extensively cultivated, rather than from virgin forest. Although the Getty has said that there is no evidence for the Italians’ claim that the statue was dug up at Morgantina, it bought the piece without clearly establishing its background. Ms. True, the former curator, purchased the statue through Robin Symes, a London-based art dealer who told the museum that it came from the collection of a Swiss supermarket magnate. “Without any doubt, that was invented by the dealer,” Mr. Bell said. “It was a much more dubious context. A person convicted by the Italians, Canavesi, seems clearly to have had it.” Renzo Canavesi, owner of a tobacco shop in Switzerland, had initially claimed that his family owned the statue from 1939 until 1986, when he said he sold it to Mr. Symes. In a 1997 museum catalog the statue was described as “the most important discovery of a Greek statue in the past decade” and “the only complete example of the most important type of sculpted figure to survive from antiquity.” The fate of 21 other objects remains unresolved. For the moment there are no negotiations with the Italian government, Mr. Brand said. He also said the museum had no intention of returning a prized bronze sculpture taken from the sea in international waters to which he said Italy had no legal claim. “From our point of view, there’s nothing more we can do about the bronze,” he said. Peter Kiefer contributed reporting from Rome. of 14) Tinkerer's Art Transforms the World, and the Getty Casting Blame for Looting In Trial of Getty Ex-Curator Bail Set in Greece for Ex-Curator of Getty Italy Digs In Its Heels in Artifacts Dispute With the Getty Getty, J Paul, Museum of 14) &#x00bb; The new Broadway show Legally Blonde delivers "a nonstop sugar rush" Angela Lansbury in "Deuce" A trashy Tupperware lady hits the stage David Mamet to return to the theater of politics NYT ESSENTIAL LIBRARY: OPERA One Says ‘9/11.’ No One Needs To. Father and Son, Just Two More Soccer Fans The Rings of Giuliani
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/12/arts/12stud.html?ex=1336622400&en=e4ebe78482a75378&ei=5088&partner=rssnyt&emc=rss Built to Last, and Lasting to Last, and Lasting Michael Hanson Hale County Animal Shelter, one of the projects created by Auburn University&#146;s Rural Studio. 2007 NEWBERN, Ala., May 6 — They used to serve the hog whole at the annual pig roast here in Hale County, in central Alabama. The architecture students who gathered to honor another year of designing and constructing buildings would slice their own fatty hunks of pork to pile on paper plates, alongside fried catfish, shredded coleslaw and hush puppies. Hanson newly designed Lions Park, another studio effort. But at this year’s celebration on May 5, as the hammering sun finally eased up, and the evening scent of wild honeysuckle settled in, the pig was carved in advance, to accommodate the large number of people who now line up at the buffet to get through dinner in time for the valediction. The change could serve as a metaphor for what has happened to the 14-year-old program, ’s Rural Studio, since its founder, Samuel Mockbee, died of leukemia five years ago, at 57. Under Mr. Mockbee and Dennis K. Ruth, then the head of Auburn’s architecture department, the program became known for building architecturally distinctive homes for the poorest of the poor, often out of scavenged, donated or discounted materials. The projects — including a chapel made of car tires, a “hay bale” house covered in stucco and another home with a tin roof like a flying wing — earned Mr. Mockbee a “genius” grant, and have become a paradigm of hands-on, do-good architecture. The students, most of them undergraduates, still design and build private homes for people below the poverty line, but they have increasingly shifted into large-scale public projects. This year those projects included dismantling, moving and reassembling a church from the 1850s, as well as building new ball fields (including a concession stand and public bathrooms), a county animal shelter and a Boys and Girls Club. The studio has not altered its core mandate: to produce socially conscious, environmentally sensitive designs for the rural poor in an area about 50 miles south of Tuscaloosa that was made famous by James Agee and Walker Evans’s Depression-era account, “Let Us Now Praise Famous Men.” And the program is determined to retain its scrappy Southern spirit. But change is inevitable: Long associated with Mr. Mockbee, a fifth-generation Mississippian, Rural Studio is now run by Andrew Freear, 41, a wisecracking architect from Yorkshire, England, who left his practice in Chicago seven years ago to work with Mr. Mockbee and took over for him after his death. Known for using unorthodox found objects like car windshields and bottles, the studio now focuses on getting donations of more conventional (and perhaps lasting) building materials. Outside engineering experts now consult on a regular basis, and an advisory board meets twice a year. A scholarship has been created to send a local student to college, and the studio is trying to build an endowment. Auburn University now underwrites the studio’s annual operating budget of $400,000. What Mr. Freear brought to the program “was a professionalism and a discipline that wasn’t always there,” said William H. Sledge, a member of the Rural Studio advisory board who grew up in the area. “He broadened it in a way that is consistent with the idea of building for people without resources.” On May 5, as the academic year ended, studio participants took part in what has become an annual ritual: a daylong tour of the program’s projects, during which students present their work to their professors and parents. A convoy of cars made its way from one site to another, past the wide-open fields with grazing cattle, and the loamy ponds that give the county its nickname, Catfish Capital of the World. The tour began with the church, an unusual project for Rural Studio second-year students more accustomed to constructing buildings than to taking them down. The mission was to disassemble St. Luke’s in Martin Station, then repair, relocate and rebuild it at its original site in Cahawba. “We’re taking it back home,” said Jason Coomes, the professor in charge of the second-year students. “It’s a little ridiculous to take 18- and 20-year-olds and put them on a project of that scope. Our goal was to let them use their own abilities and surprise us with what they do.” Every piece of the humble church — including more than 1,000 cypress floorboards and a battered metal roof — had to be tagged, removed, assessed for damage and stored before it could be moved. “That’s on the level of professional restoration work that they’re doing,” said Joe Ferruggia, a Chicago engineer who works as a Rural Studio adviser. The studio also continues its outreach program, a professional residency for students with bachelor’s degrees who design buildings for local residents. In past years, the price limit was $20,000 in labor and materials, a far cry from real-world rates. “In architecture school, the sky’s the limit — you can design whatever you dream,” said Jane Sloss, 26, an outreach student. “To have to eke out a house out of $20,000 ...” of 14) REVIEW; A Glass House Full of the Past Opens to the Present Arts Library Planned In Brooklyn Hits a Snag Room With a View of an Architect's Retired Ideas Square Feet; In Los Angeles, a Gehry-Designed Awakening of 14) &#x00bb; The Incredible Flying Granny Nanny The Curious Cook: The Five-Second Rule Explored, or How Dirty Is That Bologna? The Minimalist: A No-Frills Kitchen Still Cooks Highway Debris, Long an Eyesore, Grows as Hazard Cope With Squeeze Psychiatrists, Children and Drug Industry&#8217;s Role The Critical Years: Middle School Manages Distractions of Adolescence Genes Take Charge, and Diets Fall by the Wayside Fisher Is a Father First, and a Jazz Player Later Your Money: A Contrarian on Retirement Says Wait to Support Abortion Rights G.O.P. Moderates Warn Bush Iraq Must Show Gains Bush in Accord With Democrats on Trade Deals President Open to Benchmarks in Iraq Measure Gonzales Seems Confident He Will Stay, Officials Say Facebook to Offer Free Classifieds Role of F.B.I. Informer Draws Praise and Questions On Carrier in Gulf, Cheney Issues Warning to Iran Romney Works to Put Skeptics' Doubts to Rest new Broadway show Legally Blonde delivers "a nonstop sugar rush" Angela Lansbury in "Deuce" A trashy Tupperware lady hits the stage David Mamet to return to the theater of politics One Says ‘9/11.’ No One Needs To. Father and Son, Just Two More Soccer Fans The Rings of Giuliani
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/12/books/12veil.html Mohja Kahf - Muslim American - poet Carries Weapons; They Are Called Words Heidi Schumann writer Mohja Kahf, right, at a reading in San Francisco 2007 SAN FRANCISCO, May 11 — Mohja Kahf, an Arab-American writer, draws sharp, funny, earthy portraits of the fault line separating Muslim women from their Western counterparts. At times she captures the breach in a single title, like her poem built around respecting prayer rituals, called “My Grandmother Washes Her Feet in the Sink of the Bathroom at Sears.” Occasionally it just takes a few lines, as in “Hijab Scene #2,” a poem that reads in its entirety: “ ‘You people have such restrictive dress for women,’ she said, hobbling away in three inch heels and panty hose to finish out another pink-collar temp pool day.” Sometimes it’s a whole book, particularly her novel published last year, “The Girl in the Tangerine Scarf,” a coming-of-age tale set in Indiana, where Ms. Kahf spent much of her own childhood. The novel turned Ms. Kahf into something of an idol among Muslim American women, especially younger ones, struggling to reconcile their faith with a country often hostile toward it. “As a Muslim living in the U.S., you run into these little slices of life that are on every page of the book,” said Dina Ibrahim, a 31-year-old broadcasting professor, after Ms. Kahf read recently at the Arab Cultural and Community Center here. For example, Ms. Ibrahim, whose parents are Egyptian, recently experienced the angst of trying to explain to a salesman at Home Depot that she wanted to install a hose in her toilet. Water hoses are ubiquitous in the Arab world, where such ablutions are considered far more sanitary than toilet paper. Ms. Kahf, 39, is a professor of comparative literature at the . She believes that the growing body of Muslim American literature has reached the critical mass where it might be considered its own genre, including works like “The Autobiography of ,” Khaled Hosseini’s novel “The Kite Runner” and a current best seller, “The Reluctant Fundamentalist” by Mohsin Hamid. The books evoke the mixture of pride and shame involved in being an “other,” with characters living the tug of war between assimilating and maintaining the habits of a good Muslim. “Islam makes you this other race,” Ms. Kahf told a literature class at , noting that the genre should appeal to both American Muslims and outsiders seeking a better understanding of the minority. “I can’t not write ethnically, because my characters don’t eat pork and they do use incense.” The knowledge that her work might be one window that outsiders use to view Muslim Americans sometimes shapes her choices as a writer, she explained. In an early draft of her novel, for example, its heroine, Khadra Shamy, changed from being a devout teenager wearing black head scarves to taking the veil off entirely as an adult. In later drafts Ms. Kahf changed her mind. “People would have read it as ‘We won! She is an escaped Muslim woman!’ ” the author said. “People think that all Arab women are dying to uncover.” She ultimately decided that Khadra would remain veiled, at least along the lines that Ms. Kahf is herself — she covers her hair for public appearances, but lets it slip off in restaurants and is less than scrupulous about it on hot days. The book is rife with the lurking dangers that Muslims encounter in America. It details the fear and horror of a kindergarten girl discovering that candy cane contains “pig,” or Khadra’s frustration in middle school when the bullies tear off her head scarf repeatedly, and her teachers pretend not to notice. Ms. Kahf came to this country in 1971 from Damascus, Syria, before her fourth birthday, and like her, many immigrant Muslim children find themselves caught between hostile worlds at school and parents who are basically clueless. Several young women at the San Francisco reading said that in growing up as the only Muslim girls in their communities, they wish they had had Ms. Kahf’s book to read so they knew that they were not alone. Suzanne Shah, a 21-year-old premed student at the , Berkeley, uses Ms. Kahf’s poetry book, “E-mails from Scheherazad,” in a class she helps tutor. “It was refreshing for me to find that there is a poet out there who speaks the same language that I speak and thinks the same way I do,” Ms. Shah said. Ms. Shah, who is unveiled, said she particularly likes a poem castigating those trying to make a battleground out of Muslim women’s hair, with Muslims treating the veil as far too sacred and Westerners misconstruing taking off the veil as liberation. “It’s not war, it’s not freedom, it’s just hair,” said Ms. Shah, who points out to her students how Ms. Kahf is more observer than judge. In the poem about American women seeing her grandmother washing her feet before prayers, for example, Ms. Kahf writes, “They fluster about and flutter their hands, and I can see a clash of civilizations brewing in the Sears bathroom.” (10 (10 new Broadway show Legally Blonde delivers "a nonstop sugar rush" Angela Lansbury in "Deuce" A trashy Tupperware lady hits the stage David Mamet to return to the theater of politics One Says ‘9/11.’ No One Needs To. Father and Son, Just Two More Soccer Fans The Rings of Giuliani
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/12/arts/design/12aphr.html?ex=1336622400&en=0046d6798785b458&ei=5088&partner=rssnyt&emc=rss J. Paul Getty Museum - Antiquities Moves Closer to Returning an Ancient Statue to Italy 2007 LOS ANGELES, May 11 — The J. Paul Getty Museum inched a step closer to relinquishing ownership of one of its most prized artifacts, a 2,400-year-old statue of a goddess claimed by Italy, at a conference of international experts to discuss the artifact this week, its director said. statue at the center of a dispute between the J. Paul Getty Museum and the Italian government. The Getty has not reached a formal conclusion based on the conference, which was convened at the museum on Wednesday and was closed to the public. But museum officials and some of the experts who attended said their discussions buttressed what the museum says are its own suspicions that the statue, acquired by the Getty in 1988, might have been illegally excavated in southern Italy. “There was no dramatic single conclusion, no eureka moment, but it is certainly helping us narrow down the focus,” Michael Brand, the museum’s director, said in an interview. “It would be fair to say that most of the discussion focused on Sicily.” The statue’s precise provenance, like that of many antiquities, is unknown. But the Italian government asserts that it was looted in recent decades, and Mr. Brand said the Getty’s own investigation into its acquisition had revealed “problems.” The museum offered to relinquish title to the statue in November, when negotiations with Italy over the statue and 51 other artifacts broke down. It said it would study the disputed object for a year before making a final decision. At the time, the museum also unilaterally decided to return 26 of the objects. If the Getty turned up persuasive evidence that the statue came from a different archaeological source country, like Libya, or that it had been found and removed from Italy before 1939, when a ban was imposed on such exports, that could furnish a justification for keeping it. But so far no such clear evidence has emerged, Mr. Brand said. He said: “We intend to resolve this whole matter within the next six months, and we will. At some point our board of trustees has to agree to take it out of the public trust and possibly give it to someone else. We should do that very carefully.” The dispute has been part of a painful process of self-examination at an institution rocked by other scandals and disputes in the last decade. The Getty’s former antiquities curator, Marion True, remains on trial in Italy on charges of conspiring to acquire looted objects for the museum. An investigator testified at the trial last year that the goddess had been exported after an illegal excavation in Morgantina in central Sicily, at one time a richly developed part of the Greek empire. Malcolm Bell III, an archaeologist at the who attended Wednesday’s conference, said that there was so far no conclusive evidence that the statue came from Morgantina, where he conducts research, but added, “I think there’s a very strong probability that it came from Sicily.” “Until we know the find spot, we can’t say with certainty,” he said. A spokeswoman for the Italian Culture Ministry in Rome declined to comment on the meeting. The Getty said that Italy had not responded to two invitations to take part. The statue, a rare example of a cult figure considered the embodiment of a deity and used in Greek temple rituals, is viewed as the most historically significant artifact that Italy is demanding that the Getty return. The museum bought the piece for $18 million, a record for an ancient artifact at the time of its purchase. Italy, Greece and many archaeologists argue that museums like the Getty motivate looters to ransack ancient sites and middlemen to trade in illicit antiquities because of their willingness to pay huge prices to build their collections. Experts in art conservation and in soil, pollen and stone analysis convened at the recently refurbished Getty antiquities museum, a Greek-inspired villa in nearby Pacific Palisades. They spent about an hour at the villa inspecting the statue, a seven-and-a-half-foot standing figure with windswept robes carved in limestone, a placid expression on her smooth marble face. Rosario Alaimo, a professor of geochemistry at the University of Palermo, presented research suggesting that the limestone appeared to have been quarried in eastern Sicily, the Getty said. The museum said that John Twilley, a New York conservator and soil expert, presented a chemical analysis of the dirt removed from holes in the statue at the time of its acquisition, while stating that further study would be required before conclusions could be drawn. A new study of pollen remains by Pamela I. Chester, an archaeological palynologist from New Zealand, said the dirt seemed to come from an open landscape that had been extensively cultivated, rather than from virgin forest. Although the Getty has said that there is no evidence for the Italians’ claim that the statue was dug up at Morgantina, it bought the piece without clearly establishing its background. Ms. True, the former curator, purchased the statue through Robin Symes, a London-based art dealer who told the museum that it came from the collection of a Swiss supermarket magnate. “Without any doubt, that was invented by the dealer,” Mr. Bell said. “It was a much more dubious context. A person convicted by the Italians, Canavesi, seems clearly to have had it.” Renzo Canavesi, owner of a tobacco shop in Switzerland, had initially claimed that his family owned the statue from 1939 until 1986, when he said he sold it to Mr. Symes. In a 1997 museum catalog the statue was described as “the most important discovery of a Greek statue in the past decade” and “the only complete example of the most important type of sculpted figure to survive from antiquity.” The fate of 21 other objects remains unresolved. For the moment there are no negotiations with the Italian government, Mr. Brand said. He also said the museum had no intention of returning a prized bronze sculpture taken from the sea in international waters to which he said Italy had no legal claim. “From our point of view, there’s nothing more we can do about the bronze,” he said. Peter Kiefer contributed reporting from Rome. of 14) Tinkerer's Art Transforms the World, and the Getty Casting Blame for Looting In Trial of Getty Ex-Curator Bail Set in Greece for Ex-Curator of Getty Italy Digs In Its Heels in Artifacts Dispute With the Getty Getty, J Paul, Museum of 14) &#x00bb; The Incredible Flying Granny Nanny The Curious Cook: The Five-Second Rule Explored, or How Dirty Is That Bologna? The Minimalist: A No-Frills Kitchen Still Cooks Highway Debris, Long an Eyesore, Grows as Hazard Cope With Squeeze Psychiatrists, Children and Drug Industry&#8217;s Role The Critical Years: Middle School Manages Distractions of Adolescence Genes Take Charge, and Diets Fall by the Wayside Fisher Is a Father First, and a Jazz Player Later Your Money: A Contrarian on Retirement Says Wait to Support Abortion Rights G.O.P. Moderates Warn Bush Iraq Must Show Gains Bush in Accord With Democrats on Trade Deals President Open to Benchmarks in Iraq Measure Gonzales Seems Confident He Will Stay, Officials Say Facebook to Offer Free Classifieds Role of F.B.I. Informer Draws Praise and Questions On Carrier in Gulf, Cheney Issues Warning to Iran Romney Works to Put Skeptics' Doubts to Rest new Broadway show Legally Blonde delivers "a nonstop sugar rush" Angela Lansbury in "Deuce" A trashy Tupperware lady hits the stage David Mamet to return to the theater of politics One Says ‘9/11.’ No One Needs To. Father and Son, Just Two More Soccer Fans The Rings of Giuliani
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/12/arts/music/12OPER.html Washington National Opera - simulcast - schools - universities From Washington, Opera for the College Crowd 2007 Students wandering into some college auditoriums on Sept. 23 may receive a few unexpected lessons on subjects like the nature of Bohemian love, consumptive heroines and life in a garret. The Washington National Opera said it planned to simulcast a live matinee performance of Puccini’s “Bohème” to 14 college campuses and 2 high schools. The feed to the institutions will piggyback on an outdoor broadcast at the Washington Monument, an annual event begun two years ago. led the way with regular live and recorded broadcasts. But the has taken a different tack. The Met sends its broadcasts to movie theaters around the country, which charge $18 a ticket. The campus simulcasts will be free. Two local movie theaters will also have free showings. “We are convinced that it’s very important to try to make opera more accessible,” said , the Washington Opera’s president. “We’ve got to reach out and try to find young opera lovers.” He said the other main goal was to spark interest among donors and foundations to contribute money to the opera company. “There is a fund-raising effort behind this,” said Mr. Feinberg, who from 2001 to 2004 was the special master of the Sept. 11 Victim Compensation Fund. “Whether it will pay off, I do not know.” The overall cost of the simulcast is about $500,000, which will be provided by extra fund-raising, and will cover the expenses of the colleges and schools in showing the opera. A similar simulcast, of a new production of Verdi’s “Rigoletto,” is planned for the spring. , the Washington Opera’s general director, praised the Met general manager, Peter Gelb, for introducing the widespread simulcasts. But they took pains to set their own project apart, noting that their showings were free and aimed at attracting young people to opera. “We are so happy to make this simulcast free not only to our university partners across the country, but also to local students and anyone who wants a taste of top-quality opera,” Mr. Domingo said in a statement released by his assistant. The company named the institutions involved as Bryn Mawr, Princeton, Tulane, , Temple, Rice, the University of North Carolina , Union College, Brockton High School in Massachusetts and Lowell High School in San Francisco. Separately, the Washington Opera said it had an agreement with XM Satellite Radio to transmit old performances over a 23-week period, although XM said the contract had yet to be signed. XM’s rival, Sirius, broadcasts Met performances. of 14) The End of The Great Big American Voice MUSIC; You'll Never Guess Who's Playing At the D.M.V. MUSIC; The Juilliard Effect: Ten Years Later Bronx Journal; So Class, How Do You Make a Cello? Fatten Up a Violin of 14) &#x00bb; The new Broadway show Legally Blonde delivers "a nonstop sugar rush" Angela Lansbury in "Deuce" A trashy Tupperware lady hits the stage David Mamet to return to the theater of politics NYT ESSENTIAL LIBRARY: OPERA One Says ‘9/11.’ No One Needs To. Father and Son, Just Two More Soccer Fans The Rings of Giuliani
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/12/books/12veil.html?ex=1336622400&en=8a9326d7d442500a&ei=5088&partner=rssnyt&emc=rss Mohja Kahf - Muslim American - poet Carries Weapons; They Are Called Words Heidi Schumann writer Mohja Kahf, right, at a reading in San Francisco 2007 SAN FRANCISCO, May 11 — Mohja Kahf, an Arab-American writer, draws sharp, funny, earthy portraits of the fault line separating Muslim women from their Western counterparts. At times she captures the breach in a single title, like her poem built around respecting prayer rituals, called “My Grandmother Washes Her Feet in the Sink of the Bathroom at Sears.” Occasionally it just takes a few lines, as in “Hijab Scene #2,” a poem that reads in its entirety: “ ‘You people have such restrictive dress for women,’ she said, hobbling away in three inch heels and panty hose to finish out another pink-collar temp pool day.” Sometimes it’s a whole book, particularly her novel published last year, “The Girl in the Tangerine Scarf,” a coming-of-age tale set in Indiana, where Ms. Kahf spent much of her own childhood. The novel turned Ms. Kahf into something of an idol among Muslim American women, especially younger ones, struggling to reconcile their faith with a country often hostile toward it. “As a Muslim living in the U.S., you run into these little slices of life that are on every page of the book,” said Dina Ibrahim, a 31-year-old broadcasting professor, after Ms. Kahf read recently at the Arab Cultural and Community Center here. For example, Ms. Ibrahim, whose parents are Egyptian, recently experienced the angst of trying to explain to a salesman at Home Depot that she wanted to install a hose in her toilet. Water hoses are ubiquitous in the Arab world, where such ablutions are considered far more sanitary than toilet paper. Ms. Kahf, 39, is a professor of comparative literature at the . She believes that the growing body of Muslim American literature has reached the critical mass where it might be considered its own genre, including works like “The Autobiography of ,” Khaled Hosseini’s novel “The Kite Runner” and a current best seller, “The Reluctant Fundamentalist” by Mohsin Hamid. The books evoke the mixture of pride and shame involved in being an “other,” with characters living the tug of war between assimilating and maintaining the habits of a good Muslim. “Islam makes you this other race,” Ms. Kahf told a literature class at , noting that the genre should appeal to both American Muslims and outsiders seeking a better understanding of the minority. “I can’t not write ethnically, because my characters don’t eat pork and they do use incense.” The knowledge that her work might be one window that outsiders use to view Muslim Americans sometimes shapes her choices as a writer, she explained. In an early draft of her novel, for example, its heroine, Khadra Shamy, changed from being a devout teenager wearing black head scarves to taking the veil off entirely as an adult. In later drafts Ms. Kahf changed her mind. “People would have read it as ‘We won! She is an escaped Muslim woman!’ ” the author said. “People think that all Arab women are dying to uncover.” She ultimately decided that Khadra would remain veiled, at least along the lines that Ms. Kahf is herself — she covers her hair for public appearances, but lets it slip off in restaurants and is less than scrupulous about it on hot days. The book is rife with the lurking dangers that Muslims encounter in America. It details the fear and horror of a kindergarten girl discovering that candy cane contains “pig,” or Khadra’s frustration in middle school when the bullies tear off her head scarf repeatedly, and her teachers pretend not to notice. Ms. Kahf came to this country in 1971 from Damascus, Syria, before her fourth birthday, and like her, many immigrant Muslim children find themselves caught between hostile worlds at school and parents who are basically clueless. Several young women at the San Francisco reading said that in growing up as the only Muslim girls in their communities, they wish they had had Ms. Kahf’s book to read so they knew that they were not alone. Suzanne Shah, a 21-year-old premed student at the , Berkeley, uses Ms. Kahf’s poetry book, “E-mails from Scheherazad,” in a class she helps tutor. “It was refreshing for me to find that there is a poet out there who speaks the same language that I speak and thinks the same way I do,” Ms. Shah said. Ms. Shah, who is unveiled, said she particularly likes a poem castigating those trying to make a battleground out of Muslim women’s hair, with Muslims treating the veil as far too sacred and Westerners misconstruing taking off the veil as liberation. “It’s not war, it’s not freedom, it’s just hair,” said Ms. Shah, who points out to her students how Ms. Kahf is more observer than judge. In the poem about American women seeing her grandmother washing her feet before prayers, for example, Ms. Kahf writes, “They fluster about and flutter their hands, and I can see a clash of civilizations brewing in the Sears bathroom.” (10 (10 Incredible Flying Granny Nanny The Curious Cook: The Five-Second Rule Explored, or How Dirty Is That Bologna? The Minimalist: A No-Frills Kitchen Still Cooks Highway Debris, Long an Eyesore, Grows as Hazard Cope With Squeeze Psychiatrists, Children and Drug Industry&#8217;s Role The Critical Years: Middle School Manages Distractions of Adolescence Genes Take Charge, and Diets Fall by the Wayside Fisher Is a Father First, and a Jazz Player Later Your Money: A Contrarian on Retirement Says Wait to Support Abortion Rights G.O.P. Moderates Warn Bush Iraq Must Show Gains Bush in Accord With Democrats on Trade Deals President Open to Benchmarks in Iraq Measure Gonzales Seems Confident He Will Stay, Officials Say Facebook to Offer Free Classifieds Role of F.B.I. Informer Draws Praise and Questions On Carrier in Gulf, Cheney Issues Warning to Iran Romney Works to Put Skeptics' Doubts to Rest new Broadway show Legally Blonde delivers "a nonstop sugar rush" Angela Lansbury in "Deuce" A trashy Tupperware lady hits the stage David Mamet to return to the theater of politics One Says ‘9/11.’ No One Needs To. Father and Son, Just Two More Soccer Fans The Rings of Giuliani
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/12/arts/dance/12viol.html?ex=1336622400&en=a4b5a66c1c4c06e8&ei=5088&partner=rssnyt&emc=rss A Slap Echoing Beyond the Stage Slap Echoing Beyond the Stage 2007 At each performance of ’s new “Romeo and Juliet,” numerous members of the audience gasp aloud in shock at the moment when Lord Capulet knocks his daughter to the ground with a highly audible slap. The slap occurs onstage; then, like an echo, the gasp occurs in the auditorium. Juliet’s parents, unaware that she has already married Romeo, have come to tell her to marry Paris, and she refuses. In Lord Capulet calls his daughter “young baggage! Disobedient wretch!” and adds, “My fingers itch.” But, itch notwithstanding, he doesn’t hit her in the text or in any other “Romeo” I’ve seen in theater, ballet, opera or film. For many viewers this moment blights the choreographer ’s City Ballet production. For some, moreover, it connects to other recent presentations of violence against women onstage, especially the huge furor surrounding the graphic video of the R&B artist Akon forcefully and sexually thrusting himself against a young female dance partner (who later proved to be underage and a minister’s daughter) in front of an audience. Actually, the forms of violence employed toward women by Akon and by this Lord Capulet fall into quite separate aesthetic-moral categories. But there are reasons why Mr. Martins’s “Romeo” seems to overlap the categories, and why this slap leaves a disproportionately awkward aftertaste. Akon’s act, both spontaneous and a piece of performance, and widely seen in the last week on YouTube, was primarily sexual. I don’t condone it, but really it’s an extreme example of the kind of showy, aggressive dance presentation of male-female sex that has been around for a few decades. Pop music videos are full of it. Balletgoers saw it in the (brilliant) let’s-make-love-before-we-kill-ourselves erotic duets of Kenneth MacMillan’s three-act “Mayerling,” new for the in London in 1978 and seen on at least three tours of America; and in the heterosexual masochism dramatized by ’s “Love Songs” widely danced in America in the mid-1980s by the Joffrey Ballet. Modern-dance-goers saw it in the more intense duets of ’s “Nine Sinatra Songs” (1982), an enduringly popular work, but controversial enough in its early days for to shout from the audience, “No more rape!” Moviegoers saw a lyrical version of it in “Dirty Dancing” (1987), in those steamy contact duets in excelsis between a once-innocent young girl and her mature dance instructor. I can’t help suspecting that Akon’s teenage partner felt that she was starring in what you might call “Son of Dirty Dancing.” Any critic of the performing arts must report on such acts when they occur onstage. I think of Janacek’s invariably moving opera “Jenufa” (performed at the Met this season), in which the heroine is physically abused by Laca, leaving a permanent scar on her face, while she is emotionally abused by his half-brother Steva, who will make no public acknowledgment of his paternity of her child; I suspect that if “Jenufa” were performed as a spoken play, the way in which Jenufa settles for Laca, claiming that his violence against her is only part of his greater love, would be unacceptable. Such, though, is Janacek’s music in his finale that we more than go along with her: we find them both enthrallingly large-spirited. Then there is the Rodgers and Hammerstein musical “Carousel” (1945), still astonishing in the emotional delicacy with which it treats a story of physical abuse in marriage. Lord Capulet in the City Ballet “Romeo” is a relatively simple character. At City Ballet, however, the feeling for many in the audience is not simple. In the many ballets made for it by its founder-choreographer, , women are glorified, shown as extraordinarily free and decisive, seldom content to be dependent on a man even in a loving relationship. Robert Gottlieb, in his 2004 biography of Balanchine, recalls a remark in which Balanchine, late in his life, said that Peter Martins “had to be” his successor, because he had the right understanding of what a ballerina needed. But in 1988 Mr. Martins dramatized a Jack-the-Ripper situation in his ballet “Tanzspiel” (based, it was widely said, on the Central Park murder by Robert Chambers), in which the hero kills the heroine. For the next aspect of the gasp factor at City Ballet, you must speak of offstage matters, notably the 1992 incident in which Mr. Martins was arrested on charges of assaulting his wife, the ballerina Darci Kistler. The charges against him were dropped, and I would hesitate to raise this ghost had it not recently been resurrected by Martin Duberman’s new biography of Lincoln Kirstein, which reveals how Mr. Martins nearly lost his job, and how Kirstein, City Ballet’s co-founder, telephoned Mr. Martins “to say that if there was ever again such an incident, he’d never again speak to him.” And I don’t doubt that some people in the City Ballet audience assume that history is repeating itself when Lord Capulet hits his daughter center-stage. Just look at what happens onstage here, however. While the father strikes the child, the mother turns away in dismay and shields her eyes. After a moment of stillness in which his violence registers, she walks around him, looking ruefully into his face (as if to say, “Can’t you control yourself?”), and goes to console her daughter. This mother, Lady Capulet, who has to put up with the violence and temper of the Capulet men throughout, is played by none other than Ms. Kistler; and this “Romeo” is presented in a season dedicated to none other than Kirstein. I assume that Mr. Martins is an artist aware enough of his reputation to know what associations Lord Capulet’s gesture will provoke in the New York State Theater: not just gasps but memories. And I assume too that he means Lady Capulet’s behavior to come as some kind of reproof to male violence; that, in staging this “Romeo” in a Kirstein season, he is publicly assuring those who remember Kirstein that, though violence to women happens, it is regrettable and, in this case, a crucial part of a tragedy. But Jock Soto as Lord Capulet isn’t convincing or even lucid, so that the slap is a startling break in a performance generally marked by vague bluster. Conversely, Ms. Kistler’s reaction as Lady Capulet lacks force. Instead, my mind goes back to the end of this same scene in Frederick Ashton’s version of “Romeo” as seen in 1989, in London and New York, with the great actress-ballerina Lynn Seymour playing Juliet’s mother. As her husband swept out of the room after his furious threats at his daughter, she simply followed, helpless, in his wake, but stopped for a moment to look at both Juliet and the Nurse. Just a look, but powerfully loaded with regret and acutely timed, as if to say: “These men! — and we women — and alas!” of 14) Girl, 9, Dies After Fight With Another Girl at Her School DANCE VIEW; CHOREOGRAPHIC VIOLENCE MAY BE GETTING OUT OF HAND of 14) &#x00bb; The Incredible Flying Granny Nanny The Curious Cook: The Five-Second Rule Explored, or How Dirty Is That Bologna? The Minimalist: A No-Frills Kitchen Still Cooks Highway Debris, Long an Eyesore, Grows as Hazard Cope With Squeeze Psychiatrists, Children and Drug Industry&#8217;s Role The Critical Years: Middle School Manages Distractions of Adolescence Genes Take Charge, and Diets Fall by the Wayside Fisher Is a Father First, and a Jazz Player Later Your Money: A Contrarian on Retirement Says Wait to Support Abortion Rights G.O.P. Moderates Warn Bush Iraq Must Show Gains Bush in Accord With Democrats on Trade Deals President Open to Benchmarks in Iraq Measure Gonzales Seems Confident He Will Stay, Officials Say Facebook to Offer Free Classifieds Role of F.B.I. Informer Draws Praise and Questions On Carrier in Gulf, Cheney Issues Warning to Iran Romney Works to Put Skeptics' Doubts to Rest new Broadway show Legally Blonde delivers "a nonstop sugar rush" Angela Lansbury in "Deuce" A trashy Tupperware lady hits the stage David Mamet to return to the theater of politics One Says ‘9/11.’ No One Needs To. Father and Son, Just Two More Soccer Fans The Rings of Giuliani
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/12/arts/12stud.html Built to Last, and Lasting to Last, and Lasting Michael Hanson Hale County Animal Shelter, one of the projects created by Auburn University&#146;s Rural Studio. 2007 NEWBERN, Ala., May 6 — They used to serve the hog whole at the annual pig roast here in Hale County, in central Alabama. The architecture students who gathered to honor another year of designing and constructing buildings would slice their own fatty hunks of pork to pile on paper plates, alongside fried catfish, shredded coleslaw and hush puppies. Hanson newly designed Lions Park, another studio effort. But at this year’s celebration on May 5, as the hammering sun finally eased up, and the evening scent of wild honeysuckle settled in, the pig was carved in advance, to accommodate the large number of people who now line up at the buffet to get through dinner in time for the valediction. The change could serve as a metaphor for what has happened to the 14-year-old program, ’s Rural Studio, since its founder, Samuel Mockbee, died of leukemia five years ago, at 57. Under Mr. Mockbee and Dennis K. Ruth, then the head of Auburn’s architecture department, the program became known for building architecturally distinctive homes for the poorest of the poor, often out of scavenged, donated or discounted materials. The projects — including a chapel made of car tires, a “hay bale” house covered in stucco and another home with a tin roof like a flying wing — earned Mr. Mockbee a “genius” grant, and have become a paradigm of hands-on, do-good architecture. The students, most of them undergraduates, still design and build private homes for people below the poverty line, but they have increasingly shifted into large-scale public projects. This year those projects included dismantling, moving and reassembling a church from the 1850s, as well as building new ball fields (including a concession stand and public bathrooms), a county animal shelter and a Boys and Girls Club. The studio has not altered its core mandate: to produce socially conscious, environmentally sensitive designs for the rural poor in an area about 50 miles south of Tuscaloosa that was made famous by James Agee and Walker Evans’s Depression-era account, “Let Us Now Praise Famous Men.” And the program is determined to retain its scrappy Southern spirit. But change is inevitable: Long associated with Mr. Mockbee, a fifth-generation Mississippian, Rural Studio is now run by Andrew Freear, 41, a wisecracking architect from Yorkshire, England, who left his practice in Chicago seven years ago to work with Mr. Mockbee and took over for him after his death. Known for using unorthodox found objects like car windshields and bottles, the studio now focuses on getting donations of more conventional (and perhaps lasting) building materials. Outside engineering experts now consult on a regular basis, and an advisory board meets twice a year. A scholarship has been created to send a local student to college, and the studio is trying to build an endowment. Auburn University now underwrites the studio’s annual operating budget of $400,000. What Mr. Freear brought to the program “was a professionalism and a discipline that wasn’t always there,” said William H. Sledge, a member of the Rural Studio advisory board who grew up in the area. “He broadened it in a way that is consistent with the idea of building for people without resources.” On May 5, as the academic year ended, studio participants took part in what has become an annual ritual: a daylong tour of the program’s projects, during which students present their work to their professors and parents. A convoy of cars made its way from one site to another, past the wide-open fields with grazing cattle, and the loamy ponds that give the county its nickname, Catfish Capital of the World. The tour began with the church, an unusual project for Rural Studio second-year students more accustomed to constructing buildings than to taking them down. The mission was to disassemble St. Luke’s in Martin Station, then repair, relocate and rebuild it at its original site in Cahawba. “We’re taking it back home,” said Jason Coomes, the professor in charge of the second-year students. “It’s a little ridiculous to take 18- and 20-year-olds and put them on a project of that scope. Our goal was to let them use their own abilities and surprise us with what they do.” Every piece of the humble church — including more than 1,000 cypress floorboards and a battered metal roof — had to be tagged, removed, assessed for damage and stored before it could be moved. “That’s on the level of professional restoration work that they’re doing,” said Joe Ferruggia, a Chicago engineer who works as a Rural Studio adviser. The studio also continues its outreach program, a professional residency for students with bachelor’s degrees who design buildings for local residents. In past years, the price limit was $20,000 in labor and materials, a far cry from real-world rates. “In architecture school, the sky’s the limit — you can design whatever you dream,” said Jane Sloss, 26, an outreach student. “To have to eke out a house out of $20,000 ...” of 14) REVIEW; A Glass House Full of the Past Opens to the Present Arts Library Planned In Brooklyn Hits a Snag Room With a View of an Architect's Retired Ideas Square Feet; In Los Angeles, a Gehry-Designed Awakening of 14) &#x00bb; The new Broadway show Legally Blonde delivers "a nonstop sugar rush" Angela Lansbury in "Deuce" A trashy Tupperware lady hits the stage David Mamet to return to the theater of politics Opsail - Jigsaw Puzzle One Says ‘9/11.’ No One Needs To. Father and Son, Just Two More Soccer Fans The Rings of Giuliani
http://www.nytimes.com/pages/arts/index.html Arts to Last, and Lasting Michael Hanson Hale County Animal Shelter, one of the projects created by Auburn University&#146;s Rural Studio. Auburn University’s Rural Studio program is still about hands-on projects using any items hands can be gotten on. Getty Moves Closer to Returning an Ancient Statue to Italy The 2,400-year-old statue of the goddess Aphrodite is one of the J. Paul Getty Museum’s most prized artifacts and it might have been illegally excavated in southern Italy. Theater Review | Stairway to Paradise Mining a Rich Vein of Sequins in Revues The radiant surprise of “Stairway to Paradise,” which runs through Monday at City Center, is how much fresher it feels than contemporary Broadway blockbusters that use more recent pop songbooks. A Slap Echoing Beyond the Stage At each performance of new “Romeo and Juliet,” numerous members of the audience gasp aloud in shock at a violent moment onstage. She Carries Weapons; They Are Called Words Mohja Kakf, a poet and professor, walks the tightrope between her Arab American worlds. Live From Washington, Opera for the College Crowd By DANIEL J. WAKIN The Washington National Opera launches a plan to bring opera into the schools. Radio Hosts Lose a Sponsor After a Routine About Rape Trojan condoms is the second advertiser in a week to pull advertising from the “Opie & Anthony” show following a conversation about an imagined sexual assault of Secretary of State Condoleezza Rice. At 80, He’s Hardly Done Talking, or Performing Charles Rosen keeps his repertory fresh by continuing to “experiment in public.” Music Review | Dulce Pontes A New Style for Portugal’s Old Fado, but the Songs Are Still Full of Emotion Dulce Pontes brought quintessential Portuguese fado singing, with long-breathed swoops and tempestuous dynamic surges, to Carnegie Hall on Thursday. Music Review | Jordi Savall Soft Sounds, Subtle Shadings: What Would Have Been on Louis XIV’s iPod Viola da gamba virtuoso Jordi Savall brought music fit for the ears of kings to the Metropolitan Museum of Art on Wednesday. Aspen isn’t laughing, rebirth in Lebanon for conductor Riccardo Muti, Francis Ford Coppola’s comeback and more culture news. No Rain or Love, Till a Guy Promises Both Disillusioned Diva With Glimmers of Soul Melly Still on ‘Coram Boy’ Music Review: Bringing a Touch of Jazz Even to Familiar Pop Songs Farce": War on Terror Takes a Detour You Go to a Fight, and a Boston Pops Concert Breaks Out Puffing Away That PG Rating 'Animal, Vegetable, Miracle,' by Barbara Kingsolver: Because It’s Good for You, That’s Why Fine Art Fair: Intimate Nooks Filled With Unexpected Treasures Dance Review | Urban Bush Women: Channeling Group Dynamics Fueled by the Power of Funk Music Review | Lisa Gerrard: The Somber Sound of Nondenominational Mysticism Music Review | Anat Cohen Quartet: A Musical World Traveler Who Likes to Mix Things Up Theater Review | 'Couples': Blissful and Benighted: Dispatches From the War of the Sexes Spare Times: For Children About': The Cold Male Gaze A Sense of Purpose Takes Flight Hip Hop Project': Beats With a Meaning Salon': Cutting Hair and Cutting Remarks The Broad Scope of Broadway Revisiting the True Story of a Battered Wife’s Revenge Ex': Chasing an Old Flame, Taking No Prisoners Realism, Both Magic and Downright Mean Rule': Hey, California Girl, Don’t Mess With Grandma Inside Art: Guggenheim Foundation Takes Steps to Preserve Its Artistic Legacy Harlem’s Cultural Anchor in a Sea of Ideas Kirstein’s Lust for Art and Artists Feeling the Burn, and the Triumph, After Some Gritty Labors The Satire Is Biting, and So Are the Zombies A Loving Look at a Cinematic Tough Guy: Gangster, Hit Man, Gunslinger Radio Hosts Lose a Sponsor After a Routine About Rape A Charm School Teaching a Lot More Than Manners Nature, Nature, Burning Bright (High-Def Cameras Frame Thy Fearful Symmetry) from the past 7 days enter keyword or date e.g. April 21, 2001 A Charm School Teaching a Lot More Than Manners VH1’s fizzy “Flavor of Love Girls: Charm School Starring Mo’Nique” emphasizes strength as much as delicacy and decorum. Classic Jazz With No Frills or Preening With jazz singer Karrin Allyson, who performed last week at Birdland, there is never any nonsense and what you hear is what you get. Who uses YouTube? People like paul99503. Go to Blog » The Times's pop music critics discuss the latest albums and music events of the week. Download an MP3 Version Find your comprehensive television listings with this Longer editions of selected event listings in the New York area this week are now available online. The Week in Arts Where Are All the Black Swans? Speaking Love With Kurt and Lotte May 6 - May 12 FIND IT IN NYC MOST POPULAR - ARTS Weeks Later': The Satire Is Biting, and So Are the Zombies Music: Off the Beaten Beat Harlem&#8217;s Cultural Anchor in a Sea of Ideas Video Games: Finding Fellowship (Hairy Feet Optional) Film: A Loving Look at a Cinematic Tough Guy: Gangster, Hit Man, Gunslinger Rule': Hey, California Girl, Don&#8217;t Mess With Grandma Books of the Times: Because It&#8217;s Good for You, That&#8217;s Why Nature, Nature, Burning Bright (High-Def Cameras Frame Thy Fearful Symmetry) King of Fashion': What to Wear to a Revolution Built to Last, and Lasting Mama, Don't You Cry, A New Yellow Wiggle Will Sing McGregor Earns Minimum Wage As Iago Helsinki Braces for Eurovision Song Contest Final Imus Producer: Sharpton a 'Race - Baiter' Japan's WWII "Kamikaze" Film Sparks Talk of Peace Los Angeles Police Arrest the Game Kooper, Redding Inducted Into RockWalk The new Broadway show Legally Blonde delivers "a nonstop sugar rush" Angela Lansbury in "Deuce" A trashy Tupperware lady hits the stage David Mamet to return to the theater of politics The Coal Cart and The Towers, circa 1910 Buy, sell or research a car. Get closer to film, music, art and plays. $3.15 a week. Plan what to see, eat and do. What’s new on Broadway? Continuous coverage of business news. Post a job online today!
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/12/arts/dance/12viol.html A Slap Echoing Beyond the Stage Slap Echoing Beyond the Stage 2007 At each performance of ’s new “Romeo and Juliet,” numerous members of the audience gasp aloud in shock at the moment when Lord Capulet knocks his daughter to the ground with a highly audible slap. The slap occurs onstage; then, like an echo, the gasp occurs in the auditorium. Juliet’s parents, unaware that she has already married Romeo, have come to tell her to marry Paris, and she refuses. In Lord Capulet calls his daughter “young baggage! Disobedient wretch!” and adds, “My fingers itch.” But, itch notwithstanding, he doesn’t hit her in the text or in any other “Romeo” I’ve seen in theater, ballet, opera or film. For many viewers this moment blights the choreographer ’s City Ballet production. For some, moreover, it connects to other recent presentations of violence against women onstage, especially the huge furor surrounding the graphic video of the R&B artist Akon forcefully and sexually thrusting himself against a young female dance partner (who later proved to be underage and a minister’s daughter) in front of an audience. Actually, the forms of violence employed toward women by Akon and by this Lord Capulet fall into quite separate aesthetic-moral categories. But there are reasons why Mr. Martins’s “Romeo” seems to overlap the categories, and why this slap leaves a disproportionately awkward aftertaste. Akon’s act, both spontaneous and a piece of performance, and widely seen in the last week on YouTube, was primarily sexual. I don’t condone it, but really it’s an extreme example of the kind of showy, aggressive dance presentation of male-female sex that has been around for a few decades. Pop music videos are full of it. Balletgoers saw it in the (brilliant) let’s-make-love-before-we-kill-ourselves erotic duets of Kenneth MacMillan’s three-act “Mayerling,” new for the in London in 1978 and seen on at least three tours of America; and in the heterosexual masochism dramatized by ’s “Love Songs” widely danced in America in the mid-1980s by the Joffrey Ballet. Modern-dance-goers saw it in the more intense duets of ’s “Nine Sinatra Songs” (1982), an enduringly popular work, but controversial enough in its early days for to shout from the audience, “No more rape!” Moviegoers saw a lyrical version of it in “Dirty Dancing” (1987), in those steamy contact duets in excelsis between a once-innocent young girl and her mature dance instructor. I can’t help suspecting that Akon’s teenage partner felt that she was starring in what you might call “Son of Dirty Dancing.” Any critic of the performing arts must report on such acts when they occur onstage. I think of Janacek’s invariably moving opera “Jenufa” (performed at the Met this season), in which the heroine is physically abused by Laca, leaving a permanent scar on her face, while she is emotionally abused by his half-brother Steva, who will make no public acknowledgment of his paternity of her child; I suspect that if “Jenufa” were performed as a spoken play, the way in which Jenufa settles for Laca, claiming that his violence against her is only part of his greater love, would be unacceptable. Such, though, is Janacek’s music in his finale that we more than go along with her: we find them both enthrallingly large-spirited. Then there is the Rodgers and Hammerstein musical “Carousel” (1945), still astonishing in the emotional delicacy with which it treats a story of physical abuse in marriage. Lord Capulet in the City Ballet “Romeo” is a relatively simple character. At City Ballet, however, the feeling for many in the audience is not simple. In the many ballets made for it by its founder-choreographer, , women are glorified, shown as extraordinarily free and decisive, seldom content to be dependent on a man even in a loving relationship. Robert Gottlieb, in his 2004 biography of Balanchine, recalls a remark in which Balanchine, late in his life, said that Peter Martins “had to be” his successor, because he had the right understanding of what a ballerina needed. But in 1988 Mr. Martins dramatized a Jack-the-Ripper situation in his ballet “Tanzspiel” (based, it was widely said, on the Central Park murder by Robert Chambers), in which the hero kills the heroine. For the next aspect of the gasp factor at City Ballet, you must speak of offstage matters, notably the 1992 incident in which Mr. Martins was arrested on charges of assaulting his wife, the ballerina Darci Kistler. The charges against him were dropped, and I would hesitate to raise this ghost had it not recently been resurrected by Martin Duberman’s new biography of Lincoln Kirstein, which reveals how Mr. Martins nearly lost his job, and how Kirstein, City Ballet’s co-founder, telephoned Mr. Martins “to say that if there was ever again such an incident, he’d never again speak to him.” And I don’t doubt that some people in the City Ballet audience assume that history is repeating itself when Lord Capulet hits his daughter center-stage. Just look at what happens onstage here, however. While the father strikes the child, the mother turns away in dismay and shields her eyes. After a moment of stillness in which his violence registers, she walks around him, looking ruefully into his face (as if to say, “Can’t you control yourself?”), and goes to console her daughter. This mother, Lady Capulet, who has to put up with the violence and temper of the Capulet men throughout, is played by none other than Ms. Kistler; and this “Romeo” is presented in a season dedicated to none other than Kirstein. I assume that Mr. Martins is an artist aware enough of his reputation to know what associations Lord Capulet’s gesture will provoke in the New York State Theater: not just gasps but memories. And I assume too that he means Lady Capulet’s behavior to come as some kind of reproof to male violence; that, in staging this “Romeo” in a Kirstein season, he is publicly assuring those who remember Kirstein that, though violence to women happens, it is regrettable and, in this case, a crucial part of a tragedy. But Jock Soto as Lord Capulet isn’t convincing or even lucid, so that the slap is a startling break in a performance generally marked by vague bluster. Conversely, Ms. Kistler’s reaction as Lady Capulet lacks force. Instead, my mind goes back to the end of this same scene in Frederick Ashton’s version of “Romeo” as seen in 1989, in London and New York, with the great actress-ballerina Lynn Seymour playing Juliet’s mother. As her husband swept out of the room after his furious threats at his daughter, she simply followed, helpless, in his wake, but stopped for a moment to look at both Juliet and the Nurse. Just a look, but powerfully loaded with regret and acutely timed, as if to say: “These men! — and we women — and alas!” of 14) Girl, 9, Dies After Fight With Another Girl at Her School DANCE VIEW; CHOREOGRAPHIC VIOLENCE MAY BE GETTING OUT OF HAND of 14) &#x00bb; The new Broadway show Legally Blonde delivers "a nonstop sugar rush" Angela Lansbury in "Deuce" A trashy Tupperware lady hits the stage David Mamet to return to the theater of politics One Says ‘9/11.’ No One Needs To. Father and Son, Just Two More Soccer Fans The Rings of Giuliani
http://www.nytimes.com/pages/arts/index.html?partner=rssnyt Arts to Last, and Lasting Michael Hanson Hale County Animal Shelter, one of the projects created by Auburn University&#146;s Rural Studio. Auburn University’s Rural Studio program is still about hands-on projects using any items hands can be gotten on. Getty Moves Closer to Returning an Ancient Statue to Italy The 2,400-year-old statue of the goddess Aphrodite is one of the J. Paul Getty Museum’s most prized artifacts and it might have been illegally excavated in southern Italy. Theater Review | Stairway to Paradise Mining a Rich Vein of Sequins in Revues The radiant surprise of “Stairway to Paradise,” which runs through Monday at City Center, is how much fresher it feels than contemporary Broadway blockbusters that use more recent pop songbooks. A Slap Echoing Beyond the Stage At each performance of new “Romeo and Juliet,” numerous members of the audience gasp aloud in shock at a violent moment onstage. She Carries Weapons; They Are Called Words Mohja Kakf, a poet and professor, walks the tightrope between her Arab American worlds. Live From Washington, Opera for the College Crowd By DANIEL J. WAKIN The Washington National Opera launches a plan to bring opera into the schools. Radio Hosts Lose a Sponsor After a Routine About Rape Trojan condoms is the second advertiser in a week to pull advertising from the “Opie & Anthony” show following a conversation about an imagined sexual assault of Secretary of State Condoleezza Rice. At 80, He’s Hardly Done Talking, or Performing Charles Rosen keeps his repertory fresh by continuing to “experiment in public.” Music Review | Dulce Pontes A New Style for Portugal’s Old Fado, but the Songs Are Still Full of Emotion Dulce Pontes brought quintessential Portuguese fado singing, with long-breathed swoops and tempestuous dynamic surges, to Carnegie Hall on Thursday. Music Review | Jordi Savall Soft Sounds, Subtle Shadings: What Would Have Been on Louis XIV’s iPod Viola da gamba virtuoso Jordi Savall brought music fit for the ears of kings to the Metropolitan Museum of Art on Wednesday. Aspen isn’t laughing, rebirth in Lebanon for conductor Riccardo Muti, Francis Ford Coppola’s comeback and more culture news. No Rain or Love, Till a Guy Promises Both Disillusioned Diva With Glimmers of Soul Melly Still on ‘Coram Boy’ Music Review: Bringing a Touch of Jazz Even to Familiar Pop Songs Farce": War on Terror Takes a Detour You Go to a Fight, and a Boston Pops Concert Breaks Out Puffing Away That PG Rating 'Animal, Vegetable, Miracle,' by Barbara Kingsolver: Because It’s Good for You, That’s Why Fine Art Fair: Intimate Nooks Filled With Unexpected Treasures Dance Review | Urban Bush Women: Channeling Group Dynamics Fueled by the Power of Funk Music Review | Lisa Gerrard: The Somber Sound of Nondenominational Mysticism Music Review | Anat Cohen Quartet: A Musical World Traveler Who Likes to Mix Things Up Theater Review | 'Couples': Blissful and Benighted: Dispatches From the War of the Sexes Spare Times: For Children About': The Cold Male Gaze A Sense of Purpose Takes Flight Hip Hop Project': Beats With a Meaning Salon': Cutting Hair and Cutting Remarks The Broad Scope of Broadway Revisiting the True Story of a Battered Wife’s Revenge Ex': Chasing an Old Flame, Taking No Prisoners Realism, Both Magic and Downright Mean Rule': Hey, California Girl, Don’t Mess With Grandma Inside Art: Guggenheim Foundation Takes Steps to Preserve Its Artistic Legacy Harlem’s Cultural Anchor in a Sea of Ideas Kirstein’s Lust for Art and Artists Feeling the Burn, and the Triumph, After Some Gritty Labors The Satire Is Biting, and So Are the Zombies A Loving Look at a Cinematic Tough Guy: Gangster, Hit Man, Gunslinger Radio Hosts Lose a Sponsor After a Routine About Rape A Charm School Teaching a Lot More Than Manners Nature, Nature, Burning Bright (High-Def Cameras Frame Thy Fearful Symmetry) from the past 7 days enter keyword or date e.g. April 21, 2001 A Charm School Teaching a Lot More Than Manners VH1’s fizzy “Flavor of Love Girls: Charm School Starring Mo’Nique” emphasizes strength as much as delicacy and decorum. Classic Jazz With No Frills or Preening With jazz singer Karrin Allyson, who performed last week at Birdland, there is never any nonsense and what you hear is what you get. Who uses YouTube? People like paul99503. Go to Blog » The Times's pop music critics discuss the latest albums and music events of the week. Download an MP3 Version Find your comprehensive television listings with this Longer editions of selected event listings in the New York area this week are now available online. The Week in Arts Where Are All the Black Swans? Speaking Love With Kurt and Lotte May 6 - May 12 FIND IT IN NYC MOST POPULAR - ARTS Weeks Later': The Satire Is Biting, and So Are the Zombies Music: Off the Beaten Beat Harlem&#8217;s Cultural Anchor in a Sea of Ideas Video Games: Finding Fellowship (Hairy Feet Optional) Film: A Loving Look at a Cinematic Tough Guy: Gangster, Hit Man, Gunslinger Rule': Hey, California Girl, Don&#8217;t Mess With Grandma Books of the Times: Because It&#8217;s Good for You, That&#8217;s Why Nature, Nature, Burning Bright (High-Def Cameras Frame Thy Fearful Symmetry) King of Fashion': What to Wear to a Revolution Built to Last, and Lasting Mama, Don't You Cry, A New Yellow Wiggle Will Sing McGregor Earns Minimum Wage As Iago Helsinki Braces for Eurovision Song Contest Final Imus Producer: Sharpton a 'Race - Baiter' Japan's WWII "Kamikaze" Film Sparks Talk of Peace Los Angeles Police Arrest the Game Kooper, Redding Inducted Into RockWalk The new Broadway show Legally Blonde delivers "a nonstop sugar rush" Angela Lansbury in "Deuce" A trashy Tupperware lady hits the stage David Mamet to return to the theater of politics What’s new on Broadway? Buy, sell or rent a home. Looking to buy a new car? Get closer to film, music, art and plays. $3.15 a week. Post a job online today! Tell us your nursing story. Inspiration & lessons.
http://theater2.nytimes.com/2007/05/15/theater/reviews/15stra.html?ex=1336881600&en=ab4d91ea7e07d55f&ei=5088&partner=rssnyt&emc=rss Passing Strange - Theater - Review REVIEW | 'PASSING STRANGE' MORE ON 'Passing Strange' Look Back in Chagrin: A Rocker’s Progress 2007 A portrait of the artist as a confused young black man emerges in vivid colors in the fresh, exuberant and bitingly funny new musical “Passing Strange,” which opened last night at the . The biography of a songwriter on a wayward journey of self-discovery, this bracingly inventive show introduces an exciting new voice to contemporary musical theater, a witty wordsmith, composer and performer who goes by the single name Stew. Krulwich/The writer, composer and performer Stew in &#147;Passing Strange.&#148; Sara Krulwich/The Breaker and Eisa Davis in &#147;Passing Strange,&#148; a musical written and narrated by the singer-songwriter Stew, at the Public Theater. Stew has a cult following as a performer and recording artist, but to look at him, you’d never take him for a rock troubadour. Bald and big-bellied, with a neat goatee and quirky eyeglasses, he has an air more professorial than swoon-inducing. Narrating the story of his life in song, sometimes from a podium or a desk, he slides those glasses up his big, domed forehead to peer skeptically at the dubious antics of his fictionalized younger self, played with impish spirit by Daniel Breaker. Stew watches in sorrow, amazement and occasional embarrassment as the callow young man he once was struts and struggles, pouts and fusses his way to maturity on a voyage that takes him from the not-so-mean streets of Los Angeles to the hash bars of Amsterdam and the post-punk cabarets of Berlin. But Professor Stew can also play a mean guitar, and when necessary, he strides the stage like an evangelical preacher, or a preening rocker, to whip the audience into a froth. Part concert, with Stew leading an onstage band; part book musical with a full (and terrific) cast, “Passing Strange” defies generic categories. This is wholly appropriate, since the story being told doesn’t run in any of the familiar grooves of the African-American experience in 20th-century America. And if it does trace the classic story of the artist as a self-styled outsider at odds with mainstream culture (as personified by Mom), “Passing Strange” sets this boilerplate arc to a quirky new rhythm. Our hero-rebel grew up comfortably in black bourgeois Los Angeles, “a colored paradise where the palm trees sway,” and there’s hardly a word about the cruelties of racism in American culture in “Passing Strange.” (Hardly an earnest word, anyway. One highlight is a hilarious mock-minstrel song in which Stew lampoons the way he once capitalized on stereotypes about the black American experience to gain some street cred with German radicals.) As a teenager, Stew was a Zen Buddhist who smirked at the hats of the ladies in church, at least until one Sunday when “the organ whispered a promise,” the spirit moved him to ecstasy, and he found himself called not to God but to the making of music and the forging of a life in art. (His mother, played with wry warmth by Eisa Davis, is not pleased. “Don’t you know the difference between the sacred and the profane?” she hisses. Citing his own scripture to defend his pronouncement that “church ain’t nothin’ but rock ’n’ roll,” the young Stew stutters back, “But it was on After that epiphany, Stew joins the choir and forms a bond with its leader, the pastor’s flamboyant son Mr. Franklin (a charismatic Colman Domingo, also terrific as a ranting Berlin performance artist). In a scene both ruefully funny and tender, the young Stew gets high with Mr. Franklin as they listen to Puccini in a blue VW bug. The desolation of a life lived in compromise is brought home to him in a haze of pot smoke. Mr. Franklin worships Maria Callas, regrets his own timidity and urges the young Stew to escape to Europe and find his real spiritual home. “I mean, baby, we’re all freaks depending on the backdrop,” he shrugs. Bright-eyed with wonder, young Stew jokes that they’re both “black folks passing for black folks.” The music, composed by Stew and Heidi Rodewald (who also plays bass), is straight-ahead guitar-driven rock rather than rhythm and blues (though of course the line between them is easily blurred). As Stew searches for his own musical voice, the disparate styles referred to range from ’60s Europop to ’70s punk to ’80s electronic to Gilbert and Sullivan and . The score contains a tiny musical quote (a joke, really) from , but also a smidgen of “My Fair Lady.” Stew’s gift for smart comic wordplay would be the envy of many a rapper, but the more lyrical passages in “Passing Strange” are carefully sculptured, considered and reflective, not hot and bothered. (Occasionally, Stew does try a little too hard for poetic profundity.) The show follows the budding musician from his garage-band days in Los Angeles to coffeehouses in Amsterdam, where he indulges in the usual condiments of a rock ’n’ roll life, and from there to Berlin, where he falls in with a group of political and aesthetic radicals. “Celibacy is the only sane response to a world gone wild,” declares one new friend, a “critical theorist and postmodern pornographer.” “My porno films feature fully clothed men making business deals.” “Narrative is a capitalist plot!” is the rallying cry of another. If so, “Passing Strange” is not likely to face accusations of spreading the doctrine. As the show ambles past the two-hour mark, its episodic story line becomes a liability. Because Stew’s aesthetic and moral awakening takes place against a shifting backdrop, no other characters stick around long enough to claim a full role in the proceedings, despite perfectly pitched comic performances from the whole cast. The spectacle of watching a young man try on various emotional and artistic attitudes will strike happy chords in the hearts of ex-dreamers of youthful dreams, but colder eyes may see it as an extended exercise in musical navel-gazing. Still, engagement is sustained by the unusual combination of driving rock music and a tart satiric tone, a delicate balance that the show maintains throughout with surprising ease. Although some sequences would benefit from trimming, the director, Annie Dorsen, shapes the individual scenes smartly and effectively, with the help of the modern-dance choreographer Karole Armitage (“movement coordinator” is her credit), who keeps the energetic cast in almost constant motion when it’s center stage. (I should acknowledge that Ms. Dorsen is an acquaintance.) For all its witty puncturing of youthful pretension, and despite the sardonic attitude Stew often strikes toward his younger self, “Passing Strange” is also full of heart. It dares in its playful way to honor those big questions that have set adolescent souls yearning for centuries. How to discover and be true to your convictions, how to live a meaningful life and still pay the bills, how to find the understanding you need without throwing away the love you’re offered. Its mournful finale also acknowledges the damage that accrues in those heedless years spent asking them with such stridency, before you come to realize that learning to listen is just as important as making yourself heard. Book and lyrics by Stew; music by Stew and Heidi Rodewald; directed and created in collaboration with Annie Dorsen; sets by David Korins; costumes by Elizabeth Hope Clancy; lighting by Kevin Adams; sound by Tony Smolenski IV; movement coordinator, Karole Armitage; musical director, Ms. Rodewald; musical supervisor, Jon Spurney; production stage manager, Cynthia Cahill; general manager, Nicki Genovese; associate producers, Bill Bragin, Peter DuBois and Mandy Hackett; director of production, Ruth E. Sternberg. Presented by the , Oskar Eustis, artistic director; Mara Manus, executive director, in association with Berkeley Repertory Theater, Tony Taccone, artistic director; Susan Medak, managing director. At the Public Theater, 425 Lafayette Street, at Astor Place, East Village; (212) 967-7555. Through June 3. Running time: 2 hours 30 minutes. WITH: De’Adre Aziza (Edwina/Marianna/Sudabey), Daniel Breaker (Youth), Eisa Davis (Mother), Colman Domingo (Mr. Franklin/Joop/Mr. Venus), Chad Goodridge (Hugo/Christophe/Terry), Rebecca Naomi Jones (Sherry/Renata/Desi) and Stew (Narrator). (3 of 29) &#x00bb; Report a Problem Post (4.72 stars, 25 votes) REVIEW; Howl? Nay, Express His Lighter Purpose Rats to Riches: Buddies on a Theatrical Journey SPRING THEATER SPECIAL; For a Rare Moment, The Play's The Thing THEATER REVIEW; A Friendship Muddled By Attraction 110 in the Shade 25th Annual Putnam C... Beauty and the Beast A Moon for the Misbe... The Phantom of the O... The Year of Magical ... All I Want to Hear The Awesome 80s Prom Bad Blood - Malasang... Beauty on the Vine Bill W. and Dr. Bob Blue Man Group: Tube... Boys Just Wanna Have... Brits Off Broadway: ... Brits Off Broadway: ... Brits Off Broadway: ... Cronica de Una Muert... Don't Quit Your Nigh... I Love You, You're P... INTAR: Daughter of a... A Jew Grows in Brook... La Casa de Bernarda ... Make Me a Song: The ... Momma's Boyz (Los Ne... Murdered by the Mob Tony n' Tina's Weddi... 110 in the Shade Beauty on the Vine A Giant Takes On Physics&#8217; Biggest Questions An Amputee Sprinter: Is He Disabled or Too-Abled? Napa Valley? Bordeaux? No, but Still Wine Country The Greatest Mystery: Making a Best Seller Books: Doctors Who Wield the Pen to Heal the Profession Your Money: A Contrarian on Retirement Says Wait Sex, Drugs and Updating Your Blog The Critical Years: Middle School Manages Distractions of Adolescence Basics: In Hive or Castle, Duty Without Power Development Rises on St. Louis Area Flood Plains Agency Concludes Iran Is Stepping Up Nuclear Work Ground Zero Illnesses Clouding Giuliani's Legacy Sex, Drugs and Updating Your Blog Is It the Woman Thing, or Is It Katie Couric? Billions in Oil Missing in Iraq, U.S. Study Finds The Flight From Iraq In a New Role, Senator Clinton's Strategist in Chief Religious Groups Granted Millions for Pet Projects Obama Says He'd Roll Back Tax Cuts for the Wealthiest Army Career Behind Him, General Speaks Out on Iraq million dollar homes in Florida, Wyoming and California Also in Real Estate: U.S. Virgin Islands Forever Fab Beatles Commemorative for History: F.D.R.’s Path Winemakers Take On Brazil’s Climate High Prices for Donor Eggs Stir Concerns Two Television Specials for Bob Barker
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/15/arts/television/15bark.html?ex=1336881600&en=a9c236ea8a5e70a5&ei=5088&partner=rssnyt&emc=rss Bob Barker - TV- Column Barker, 50 (on TV), Is to Be in Two Specials &#147;Come on Down&#148;: Bob Barker, with &#147;Barker&#146;s beauties&#148; on the Thursday &#147;Price Is Right&#148; special. 2007 LOS ANGELES, May 13 — When Bob Barker got out of the Navy at the end of World War II, he thought about becoming a flight instructor. But he had heard about an opening at a radio station and thought it sounded interesting. He had also heard that the station manager liked airplanes. Barker backstage before a taping of &#147;The Price Is Right.&#148; So Mr. Barker did what any sensible job applicant would do. “I put on my naval officer’s uniform and my wings of gold and went in and talked about airplanes for about 30 or 45 minutes,” he said recently, “and I had my first job in radio.” When he is hugging grandmothers or quizzing college students or consoling anguished overbidders on the set of “The Price Is Right,” it is hard to imagine that anything as crass as ambition is what motivates Bob Barker. But nobody gets to do anything quite so public as be the host of television’s most popular game show for 35 years without setting a few goals. How he achieved many of them will become clear starting on Wednesday, when CBS will broadcast two consecutive nights of prime-time specials celebrating Mr. Barker’s retirement, the first a special edition of “The Price Is Right” and the second a retrospective of Mr. Barker’s 50 years in television. Few people in show business have come as far as Mr. Barker. When he was born, his parents were living in a tent in rural Washington. His father died when he was 6, and he grew up on the Rosebud Indian Reservation in South Dakota, where his mother was a schoolteacher. He went on to train as a Navy fighter pilot during World War II, but the war ended before he was sent to battle. Then he got that job at the radio station, and everything changed. Fast forward some 60 years, and Mr. Barker, 83, is now on the verge of retirement, having broken ’s record — five years ago — for the longest continuous performance on the same network television show and having won 17 Emmy Awards as a host and producer. He has received just about every honor the television industry has to offer, has been installed in the Television Academy Hall of Fame and works in the Bob Barker Studio at CBS Television City in Hollywood. And sometime in the next few months, CBS will show the final episode of “The Price Is Right,” featuring Mr. Barker. “I haven’t regretted the fact that I’ve announced my retirement,” Mr. Barker said in an interview recently in his home in the Hollywood Hills. “I announced it in October, and I thought by November I’d be regretting it. Now, I don’t know what it will be like when I wake up and find there’s no show. I may just pull the covers over my head and stay there.” It is unlikely, however, that even a retired Bob Barker could do anything so passive. From the moment he began working at that radio station in Springfield, Mo., he was looking for the next opportunity. Hired as a local news writer, he also began doing sportscasts. Then he filled a slot as a disc jockey. Then the host of one of the station’s regular audience-participation shows was unexpectedly absent one day, and Mr. Barker stepped in. When he arrived home that day, his wife, Dorothy Jo, who was also his high school sweetheart, told him that being the host of a show was what he should do. “She said, ‘You did that better than anything you’ve ever done,’ ” he recalled. “We set out from that moment forward to get a national show for me. She produced my shows, she helped me write them, she edited them, she did everything and anything to help me get a national show. And I’ve been doing a show for 62 years.” While “The Price Is Right” has been his longest-running show, at 35 years, people of a certain age will remember that before that there was “Truth or Consequences,” which Mr. Barker was host of for 18 years. A sort of game show in which the contestant had to answer an almost unanswerable question or face the consequences, which usually involved participation in a wacky stunt, it also often featured a “This Is Your Life” component of a reunion with a long-lost relative. Through those 50 years on television (the two shows overlapped for three years), Mr. Barker has made a specialty of giving contestants the chance to make a dream come true. His great strength, and certainly the key to his longevity, is that, whatever happens to the contestants, he is able to have them leave happy, feeling unjudged and appreciated. of 10) Much Is That Washer-Dryer?; Old and Young, 'Black, White and Brown,' Fans Line Up for Chance to 'Come On Down' of 10) &#x00bb; A Giant Takes On Physics&#8217; Biggest Questions An Amputee Sprinter: Is He Disabled or Too-Abled? Napa Valley? Bordeaux? No, but Still Wine Country The Greatest Mystery: Making a Best Seller Books: Doctors Who Wield the Pen to Heal the Profession Your Money: A Contrarian on Retirement Says Wait Sex, Drugs and Updating Your Blog The Critical Years: Middle School Manages Distractions of Adolescence Basics: In Hive or Castle, Duty Without Power Development Rises on St. Louis Area Flood Plains Agency Concludes Iran Is Stepping Up Nuclear Work Ground Zero Illnesses Clouding Giuliani's Legacy Sex, Drugs and Updating Your Blog Is It the Woman Thing, or Is It Katie Couric? Billions in Oil Missing in Iraq, U.S. Study Finds The Flight From Iraq In a New Role, Senator Clinton's Strategist in Chief Religious Groups Granted Millions for Pet Projects Obama Says He'd Roll Back Tax Cuts for the Wealthiest Army Career Behind Him, General Speaks Out on Iraq million dollar homes in Florida, Wyoming and California Also in Real Estate: U.S. Virgin Islands 50% off Times delivery. for History: F.D.R.’s Path Winemakers Take On Brazil’s Climate High Prices for Donor Eggs Stir Concerns Two Television Specials for Bob Barker
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/15/arts/design/15stor.html?ex=1336881600&en=dcacbbfd8a4984db&ei=5088&partner=rssnyt&emc=rss What&#8217;s on Sale There? Confusion, but It&#8217;s Cheap on Sale There? Confusion, but It’s Cheap Fred R. Conrad/The Store Fronts,&#148; an art installation at Maiden Lane, Lower Manhattan, created by Beth Campbell, a Brooklyn-based artist. 2007 A humble sign on the window of a new storefront in Lower Manhattan yesterday encouraged passers-by to take a trip, one that could be long or quite brief depending on the traveler: “Explore Your Inner Self.” Lisa Reynolds, a city social worker who paused in front of the window with her co-worker, Judy Speller, on their way back from lunch, quickly found that there were few ways to ignore this advice. Just a few feet inside the locked storefront lay another storefront that looked exactly like it, down to the neon, the graffiti, the lonesome potted plant in the window and the gum stains on the floor. And just inside that window was another one. And then another and another. The little yellow paper note(s) taped to the door(s) that read “Back in 5” was, it turned out, a literal description. The storefront repeats five times, like a hiccup in reality’s hard drive, a little crimp in the space-time continuum secreted away on Maiden Lane between a florist’s shop and a Dress Barn. For Ms. Reynolds, the inner exploration yesterday morning involved trying to figure out whether she was having a brain malfunction. “The more you look at it, the more confused you get,” Ms. Reynolds finally said, laughing and cupping her hands around her eyes to stare deep inside. “Is that the intention?” Not exactly, said Beth Campbell, a Brooklyn artist who created this storefront-of-storefronts over the last several weeks with the help of the and several friends and fellow artists. Ms. Campbell’s work often deals in repetition, not so much in the Warhol art-meets-advertising tradition of multiple Marilyns or soup cans but more in the spirit of science fiction that unsettles the senses: wormholes in perception, vortexes in viewing. At the Roebling Hall gallery in Brooklyn in 2000 she created two hyper-realistic women’s bedrooms, identical down to the creases in the sheets, and then connected the bedrooms by a hallway. You left one, walked into the next and wondered if you were trapped in a very specialized circle of hell, one strewn with underwear, self-help books, cigarette butts and posters of the Artist Formerly Known as Prince. One critic called it “an obsessive-compulsive’s own private nightmare.” Ms. Campbell, 35, said she was partly inspired to create the storefront — which appears to be a vague combination of travel agency and life-coaching service — by the nameless stores she sees in Greenpoint, where she lives. “They’re kind of like Fed Ex and UPS places that sell milk and Avon, and maybe you can get your taxes done there,” she said. But the idea arose more from a desire to create a public artwork that did not immediately announce itself as art, one that caught people in mid-stride and played with their expectations and their perceptions of real and recreated, copy and original. Yesterday morning when a reporter arrived, Ms. Campbell was attending to a few last details inside the store, or artwork, officially titled “Potential Store Fronts,” which will remain on view at 125 Maiden Lane through June 24. “Sorry about that,” she said, coming out of the store, which formerly sold men’s suits. “I’m really not supposed to be inside the piece.” As she stood noticing people who began to notice the store, she described the characteristic reaction: slow, skip-step, double-take and head-turn. “Which is always exciting for me,” she said. Brynn Jarosh, who works at a corporate child-care center, walked by with two toddlers in tow and did the full stop, staring deep into one of the bay windows, with a sign offering personalized lie-detector tests and another announcing, apropos of nothing in particular, “Growth, in moderately controlled conditions.” “It’s funny,” Ms. Jarosh said, “but I never ever would have thought that this was an art installation.” She paused. “I couldn’t figure out what it was, to tell the truth.” Then she added, beaming at Ms. Campbell: “I like it. Good job!” Ms. Campbell thanked her. She admits that, as she and her helpers, including her husband, neared the end of 12- and 14-hour days making the storefronts, she did sometimes become obsessive about the details of this particular job. She insisted that a thin metal strip be added to replicate one on the street that separates the sidewalk from the entryway. She figured out a way, using glue stick, to mimic perfectly the graffiti that some anonymous artist long before her had etched on the front glass. And last weekend she went back in just to replicate the blackish chewing-gum splats, those spontaneous urban art forms, in front of the door. “But maybe you shouldn’t tell anyone that,” she said, smiling. “It sounds a little crazy.” “Potential Store Fronts” will remain on view through June 24 at 125 Maiden Lane, Lower Manhattan. of 10) ATTRACTIONS; From All Rembrandt To More Recent Masters Management of City Pension Funds Criticized of 10) &#x00bb; A Giant Takes On Physics&#8217; Biggest Questions An Amputee Sprinter: Is He Disabled or Too-Abled? Napa Valley? Bordeaux? No, but Still Wine Country The Greatest Mystery: Making a Best Seller Books: Doctors Who Wield the Pen to Heal the Profession Your Money: A Contrarian on Retirement Says Wait Sex, Drugs and Updating Your Blog The Critical Years: Middle School Manages Distractions of Adolescence Basics: In Hive or Castle, Duty Without Power Development Rises on St. Louis Area Flood Plains Agency Concludes Iran Is Stepping Up Nuclear Work Ground Zero Illnesses Clouding Giuliani's Legacy Sex, Drugs and Updating Your Blog Is It the Woman Thing, or Is It Katie Couric? Billions in Oil Missing in Iraq, U.S. Study Finds The Flight From Iraq In a New Role, Senator Clinton's Strategist in Chief Religious Groups Granted Millions for Pet Projects Obama Says He'd Roll Back Tax Cuts for the Wealthiest Army Career Behind Him, General Speaks Out on Iraq million dollar homes in Florida, Wyoming and California Also in Real Estate: U.S. Virgin Islands 50% off Times delivery. for History: F.D.R.’s Path Winemakers Take On Brazil’s Climate High Prices for Donor Eggs Stir Concerns Two Television Specials for Bob Barker
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/15/arts/design/15stor.html What&#8217;s on Sale There? Confusion, but It&#8217;s Cheap on Sale There? Confusion, but It’s Cheap Fred R. Conrad/The Store Fronts,&#148; an art installation at Maiden Lane, Lower Manhattan, created by Beth Campbell, a Brooklyn-based artist. 2007 A humble sign on the window of a new storefront in Lower Manhattan yesterday encouraged passers-by to take a trip, one that could be long or quite brief depending on the traveler: “Explore Your Inner Self.” Lisa Reynolds, a city social worker who paused in front of the window with her co-worker, Judy Speller, on their way back from lunch, quickly found that there were few ways to ignore this advice. Just a few feet inside the locked storefront lay another storefront that looked exactly like it, down to the neon, the graffiti, the lonesome potted plant in the window and the gum stains on the floor. And just inside that window was another one. And then another and another. The little yellow paper note(s) taped to the door(s) that read “Back in 5” was, it turned out, a literal description. The storefront repeats five times, like a hiccup in reality’s hard drive, a little crimp in the space-time continuum secreted away on Maiden Lane between a florist’s shop and a Dress Barn. For Ms. Reynolds, the inner exploration yesterday morning involved trying to figure out whether she was having a brain malfunction. “The more you look at it, the more confused you get,” Ms. Reynolds finally said, laughing and cupping her hands around her eyes to stare deep inside. “Is that the intention?” Not exactly, said Beth Campbell, a Brooklyn artist who created this storefront-of-storefronts over the last several weeks with the help of the and several friends and fellow artists. Ms. Campbell’s work often deals in repetition, not so much in the Warhol art-meets-advertising tradition of multiple Marilyns or soup cans but more in the spirit of science fiction that unsettles the senses: wormholes in perception, vortexes in viewing. At the Roebling Hall gallery in Brooklyn in 2000 she created two hyper-realistic women’s bedrooms, identical down to the creases in the sheets, and then connected the bedrooms by a hallway. You left one, walked into the next and wondered if you were trapped in a very specialized circle of hell, one strewn with underwear, self-help books, cigarette butts and posters of the Artist Formerly Known as Prince. One critic called it “an obsessive-compulsive’s own private nightmare.” Ms. Campbell, 35, said she was partly inspired to create the storefront — which appears to be a vague combination of travel agency and life-coaching service — by the nameless stores she sees in Greenpoint, where she lives. “They’re kind of like Fed Ex and UPS places that sell milk and Avon, and maybe you can get your taxes done there,” she said. But the idea arose more from a desire to create a public artwork that did not immediately announce itself as art, one that caught people in mid-stride and played with their expectations and their perceptions of real and recreated, copy and original. Yesterday morning when a reporter arrived, Ms. Campbell was attending to a few last details inside the store, or artwork, officially titled “Potential Store Fronts,” which will remain on view at 125 Maiden Lane through June 24. “Sorry about that,” she said, coming out of the store, which formerly sold men’s suits. “I’m really not supposed to be inside the piece.” As she stood noticing people who began to notice the store, she described the characteristic reaction: slow, skip-step, double-take and head-turn. “Which is always exciting for me,” she said. Brynn Jarosh, who works at a corporate child-care center, walked by with two toddlers in tow and did the full stop, staring deep into one of the bay windows, with a sign offering personalized lie-detector tests and another announcing, apropos of nothing in particular, “Growth, in moderately controlled conditions.” “It’s funny,” Ms. Jarosh said, “but I never ever would have thought that this was an art installation.” She paused. “I couldn’t figure out what it was, to tell the truth.” Then she added, beaming at Ms. Campbell: “I like it. Good job!” Ms. Campbell thanked her. She admits that, as she and her helpers, including her husband, neared the end of 12- and 14-hour days making the storefronts, she did sometimes become obsessive about the details of this particular job. She insisted that a thin metal strip be added to replicate one on the street that separates the sidewalk from the entryway. She figured out a way, using glue stick, to mimic perfectly the graffiti that some anonymous artist long before her had etched on the front glass. And last weekend she went back in just to replicate the blackish chewing-gum splats, those spontaneous urban art forms, in front of the door. “But maybe you shouldn’t tell anyone that,” she said, smiling. “It sounds a little crazy.” “Potential Store Fronts” will remain on view through June 24 at 125 Maiden Lane, Lower Manhattan. of 10) ATTRACTIONS; From All Rembrandt To More Recent Masters Management of City Pension Funds Criticized of 10) &#x00bb; $15 million dollar homes in Florida, Wyoming and California Also in Real Estate: U.S. Virgin Islands 50% off Times delivery. for History: F.D.R.’s Path Winemakers Take On Brazil’s Climate High Prices for Donor Eggs Stir Concerns Two Television Specials for Bob Barker
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/15/arts/television/15bark.html Bob Barker - TV- Column Barker, 50 (on TV), Is to Be in Two Specials &#147;Come on Down&#148;: Bob Barker, with &#147;Barker&#146;s beauties&#148; on the Thursday &#147;Price Is Right&#148; special. 2007 LOS ANGELES, May 13 — When Bob Barker got out of the Navy at the end of World War II, he thought about becoming a flight instructor. But he had heard about an opening at a radio station and thought it sounded interesting. He had also heard that the station manager liked airplanes. Barker backstage before a taping of &#147;The Price Is Right.&#148; So Mr. Barker did what any sensible job applicant would do. “I put on my naval officer’s uniform and my wings of gold and went in and talked about airplanes for about 30 or 45 minutes,” he said recently, “and I had my first job in radio.” When he is hugging grandmothers or quizzing college students or consoling anguished overbidders on the set of “The Price Is Right,” it is hard to imagine that anything as crass as ambition is what motivates Bob Barker. But nobody gets to do anything quite so public as be the host of television’s most popular game show for 35 years without setting a few goals. How he achieved many of them will become clear starting on Wednesday, when CBS will broadcast two consecutive nights of prime-time specials celebrating Mr. Barker’s retirement, the first a special edition of “The Price Is Right” and the second a retrospective of Mr. Barker’s 50 years in television. Few people in show business have come as far as Mr. Barker. When he was born, his parents were living in a tent in rural Washington. His father died when he was 6, and he grew up on the Rosebud Indian Reservation in South Dakota, where his mother was a schoolteacher. He went on to train as a Navy fighter pilot during World War II, but the war ended before he was sent to battle. Then he got that job at the radio station, and everything changed. Fast forward some 60 years, and Mr. Barker, 83, is now on the verge of retirement, having broken ’s record — five years ago — for the longest continuous performance on the same network television show and having won 17 Emmy Awards as a host and producer. He has received just about every honor the television industry has to offer, has been installed in the Television Academy Hall of Fame and works in the Bob Barker Studio at CBS Television City in Hollywood. And sometime in the next few months, CBS will show the final episode of “The Price Is Right,” featuring Mr. Barker. “I haven’t regretted the fact that I’ve announced my retirement,” Mr. Barker said in an interview recently in his home in the Hollywood Hills. “I announced it in October, and I thought by November I’d be regretting it. Now, I don’t know what it will be like when I wake up and find there’s no show. I may just pull the covers over my head and stay there.” It is unlikely, however, that even a retired Bob Barker could do anything so passive. From the moment he began working at that radio station in Springfield, Mo., he was looking for the next opportunity. Hired as a local news writer, he also began doing sportscasts. Then he filled a slot as a disc jockey. Then the host of one of the station’s regular audience-participation shows was unexpectedly absent one day, and Mr. Barker stepped in. When he arrived home that day, his wife, Dorothy Jo, who was also his high school sweetheart, told him that being the host of a show was what he should do. “She said, ‘You did that better than anything you’ve ever done,’ ” he recalled. “We set out from that moment forward to get a national show for me. She produced my shows, she helped me write them, she edited them, she did everything and anything to help me get a national show. And I’ve been doing a show for 62 years.” While “The Price Is Right” has been his longest-running show, at 35 years, people of a certain age will remember that before that there was “Truth or Consequences,” which Mr. Barker was host of for 18 years. A sort of game show in which the contestant had to answer an almost unanswerable question or face the consequences, which usually involved participation in a wacky stunt, it also often featured a “This Is Your Life” component of a reunion with a long-lost relative. Through those 50 years on television (the two shows overlapped for three years), Mr. Barker has made a specialty of giving contestants the chance to make a dream come true. His great strength, and certainly the key to his longevity, is that, whatever happens to the contestants, he is able to have them leave happy, feeling unjudged and appreciated. of 10) Much Is That Washer-Dryer?; Old and Young, 'Black, White and Brown,' Fans Line Up for Chance to 'Come On Down' of 10) &#x00bb; $15 million dollar homes in Florida, Wyoming and California Also in Real Estate: U.S. Virgin Islands 50% off Times delivery. for History: F.D.R.’s Path Winemakers Take On Brazil’s Climate High Prices for Donor Eggs Stir Concerns Two Television Specials for Bob Barker
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/15/arts/television/15abc.html?ex=1336881600&en=f08076eb5ecebc54&ei=5088&partner=rssnyt&emc=rss ABC - NBC - New Fall Lineups ABC, Dramas Fill Out the Lineup 2007 ABC will continue to be the most aggressive of the networks with its lineup of new shows for the next television season, ordering at least 11 new series, when it officially announces its fall schedule to advertisers today. Heffernan, Times TV critic, reports from this week's TV upfronts, where the networks debut their new schedules. Video Reports by Bill Carter: That network already has more big hits than any of its competitors and is looking to add to the total by bringing in the biggest list of new contenders. According to network and studio executives who know of the shows ABC has ordered, the network will add seven new hourlong dramas and four new comedies to its lineup. Most of these will come on the air in the fall, but many will be scheduled later in the season. Most prominent of the new entries will be “Private Practice,” the spinoff of ABC’s biggest hit, “Grey’s Anatomy,” starring Kate Walsh as a doctor who leaves Seattle Grace Hospital for a wellness clinic in Los Angeles — and has further romantic and sexual adventures. That new series that is already generating the most positive talk, both inside and outside ABC, is a quirky romantic hourlong comedy-drama called “Pushing Daisies,”about a young man who discovers — to the advantage of a homicide detective — that with a touch he can both raise the dead and send them back again. His power complicates his relationship with a young woman he can love only unrequitedly. and Anna Friel play the couple, supported by Chi McBride and Following in the footsteps of “Desperate Housewives,” ABC has another new drama with a catchy title in “Dirty Sexy Money,” in which (“Six Feet Under”) plays a lawyer for a venal corrupt family. Money is also a factor in “Big Shots” (the title may change), about four rich corporate executives and their tribulations with business and women. (“The Practice”) and Joshua Malina (“The West Wing”) are among the stars. “Cashmere Mafia” is yet another series attempting to replicate the successful formula of “Sex and the City,” with a group of New York women in and out of romance. But this one was at least created by Darren Star, who also produced “Sex.” (“Ally McBeal”) is among the stars. “Women’s Murder Club” is a self-explanatory crime procedural, with Angie Harmon (“Law & Order”) playing the main investigator. The final drama is “Eli Stone,” about a lawyer who may be crazy or may be a prophet. is the star, supported by Victor Garber (“Alias.”) ABC has struggled mightily with comedy in recent years and so far is bringing back only one for a new season: “Notes From the Underbelly.” Its long-running “According to Jim” may return, but “George Lopez” has been canceled. Heading the list of new comedies is “Sam I Am,” which stars as a woman who loses her memory in an accident, learns she was a rotten person and tries to reform. “Cavemen” will star some familiar faces: the guys in the Geico car-insurance commercials who look like cavemen but otherwise dress and talk like anyone else. They will face prejudice as they try to adapt to contemporary society. “Carpoolers” is a buddy comedy about guys who drive to work together each day, as well as their home lives. Jerry O’Connell and Faith Ford (“Murphy Brown”) are among the stars. The final comedy is “Miss Guided,” about a young woman who returns to her old high school to become a guidance counselor. Judy Greer is the star. ABC is also bringing back the drama “October Road,” which had a brief run this spring, but is canceling “What About Brian.” NBC made it own schedule public yesterday, and it was, by its executive’s admission, a conservative lineup with only four new hours set for the fall. Kevin Reilly, the president of NBC Entertainment, said that adding more new series now was unwise because it is so difficult to market new shows in the fall. The key to the schedule is “Bionic Woman,” the remake of the 1970s series, which NBC has placed in the middle of the Wednesday lineup hoping, as Mr. Reilly put it, to “blast a hole” on the night. “Life,” the cop drama that follows it, is also new, meaning the network is placing two new shows in a row, a gambit with a low degree of success. The show getting the best spot on NBC’s schedule is “Journeyman,” a science fiction series that will reside on Mondays at 10, right after the biggest hit of this season, “Heroes.” The fourth new NBC drama for fall is “Chuck,” which will try to marry the comedy of “The 40-Year-Old Virgin” to a high-tech action series. It will run Tuesdays at 9. The biggest news out of NBC concerned several of its returning series. NBC wants to get the most out of these as possible, and so it is ordering 30 half-hours of its hit comedy “The Office,” 25 of its other Thursday night comedy success “My Name Is Earl” and 30 of “Heroes.” All are above the normal order of 22 for a typical show. “Heroes” will actually be a kind of hybrid of sorts because 24 of the episodes will be regular editions of “Heroes” and the other six will be a related idea called “Heroes: Origins.” At least five of the “The Office” shows will be hourlong episodes. NBC also at the last minute renewed its long-running comedy “Scrubs,” leaving it on Thursday night. That meant NBC ordered no new comedies for its fall schedule. Mr. Reilly said that given the competition on Thursdays, where all its comedies reside, it was safer to not introduce a new series. Here is the complete NBC fall schedule with the new shows in capital letters: 8 p.m. Deal or No Deal 8 p.m. The Biggest Loser (new day) 10 p.m. Law & Order: SVU 8 p.m. Deal or No Deal 9 p.m. THE BIONIC WOMAN 8 p.m. My Name Is Earl 8:30 p.m. 30 Rock (new time) 9:00 p.m. The Office (new time) 8 p.m. 1 vs. 100 / THE SINGING BEE 9 p.m. Las Vegas 10 p.m. Friday Night Lights (new day and time) 9 p.m. Drama reruns 10 p.m. Drama reruns 7 p.m. Football Night in America 8 p.m. Sunday Night Football Sunday Following Football Season 8 p.m. Law & Order (new day and time) 9 p.m. Medium (new day and time) 10 p.m. LIPSTICK JUNGLE of 10) REVIEW | 'TRAVELER'; After a Museum Is Bombed, the Real Trouble Begins ABC Sets Spring 2010 As the End For 'Lost' Rosie O'Donnell Says She Will Say Goodbye to 'The View' in June THE TV WATCH; Amid Chaos, One Notably Restrained Voice of 10) &#x00bb; A Giant Takes On Physics&#8217; Biggest Questions An Amputee Sprinter: Is He Disabled or Too-Abled? Napa Valley? Bordeaux? No, but Still Wine Country The Greatest Mystery: Making a Best Seller Books: Doctors Who Wield the Pen to Heal the Profession Your Money: A Contrarian on Retirement Says Wait Sex, Drugs and Updating Your Blog The Critical Years: Middle School Manages Distractions of Adolescence Basics: In Hive or Castle, Duty Without Power Development Rises on St. Louis Area Flood Plains Agency Concludes Iran Is Stepping Up Nuclear Work Ground Zero Illnesses Clouding Giuliani's Legacy Sex, Drugs and Updating Your Blog Is It the Woman Thing, or Is It Katie Couric? Billions in Oil Missing in Iraq, U.S. Study Finds The Flight From Iraq In a New Role, Senator Clinton's Strategist in Chief Religious Groups Granted Millions for Pet Projects Obama Says He'd Roll Back Tax Cuts for the Wealthiest Army Career Behind Him, General Speaks Out on Iraq million dollar homes in Florida, Wyoming and California Also in Real Estate: U.S. Virgin Islands 50% off Times delivery. for History: F.D.R.’s Path Winemakers Take On Brazil’s Climate High Prices for Donor Eggs Stir Concerns Two Television Specials for Bob Barker
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/15/arts/music/15vox.html?ex=1336881600&en=d76f37bfdf667153&ei=5088&partner=rssnyt&emc=rss Vox - Opera - Music Column on the Horizon: Tantalizing Glimpses of Adventurous Productions Hiroyuki Ito composer Gordon Beeferman, far right, and the librettist Charlotte Jackson, second from right, congratulated the performers of their opera &#147;The Rat Land&#148; at the Skirball Center on Saturday. 2007 has become savvy about promoting its Vox series as a hip and adventurous event. The purpose of this invaluable showcase is to present excerpts from new or unperformed operas by American composers in free concert tryouts with the City Opera Orchestra and strong casts of singers. Ito Rivera sang in an adaptation of the novel &#147;Elmer Gantry.&#148; Hiroyuki Ito Hogsed sang roles in &#147;Elegy for a Prince&#148; and &#147;The Rat Land.&#148; Hiroyuki Ito Bobick performed the title role in &#147;Elmer Gantry.&#148; “Preview the Future of Opera” was the enticing message on the poster for this spring’s Vox series, the seventh, which took place on Saturday and Sunday afternoons in the Skirball Center for the Performing Arts at . Personifying that bold operatic future was the composer Gordon Beeferman, shown on the poster looking trim and punkish. With close-cropped hair and a T-shirt exposing a left arm covered with fanciful tattoos, his is not the image most classical music lovers have when they think of an opera composer. Actually, the excerpts from “The Rat Land,” Mr. Beeferman’s opera, with a libretto by Charlotte Jackson, sounded complex and daringly modern: in a way, the brainiest score of the six performed on Saturday. (I did not hear the Sunday showcase, which offered excerpts from another six works.) Other operas heard on Saturday were far more conventional. “Elmer Gantry,” an adaptation of the 1927 Sinclair Lewis novel about a womanizing evangelical minister, with music by Robert Aldridge and a libretto by Herschel Garfein, came across as an unabashedly populist piece. The music is kinetic, vividly scored and steeped in American vernacular idioms; the storytelling is urgent. Still, from the scenes presented here, the opera seems a little too eager to please. “Elmer Gantry” is scheduled for a premiere in November at the Nashville Opera. But most of the works presented are awaiting productions or incomplete. How better to generate interest and attract producers than by performing excerpts from the scores, usually 20 minutes or so, and see what the public thinks? The six well-attended presentations on Saturday were introduced through informal and often witty video interviews with the composers and librettists. It is too soon for thorough critical assessments, of course. Still, like everyone else, I left the showcase, which lasted more than three hours, with initial impressions. “The Rat Land” tells of a dysfunctional Midwestern suburban family in the late 1980s: three troubled children, including a young girl who deifies pet rats; an invalid father with a violent temper; and a weak-willed mother who lives in denial. The claustrophobic family life is presented with bleak realism and bitterly comic flourishes. There may be too much talking in the score: whole passages of text are spoken or shouted. Still, Mr. Beeferman’s music, with its skittish melodic lines and pungent atonal harmony, is gritty, fidgety and intriguing. “Elegy for a Prince,” with music by Sergio Cervetti and a libretto by Elizabeth Esris, is freely adapted from ’s fairy tale “The Happy Prince.” In the video introduction Mr. Cervetti said that this story “needs the love that only tonal music can give it.” Maybe so. But some blandly tonal passages seemed almost mawkish, at least on first exposure. “Airline Icarus,” by the composer Brian Current and the librettist Anton Piatigorsky, is a chamber opera about thoughts, fears and attractions among a group of passengers aboard an airplane that, as in the myth of Icarus, flies too close to the sun. Turbulence during the flight is linked to emotional turbulence within the characters through punchy, swirling and gratingly astringent music. In extended passages Mr. Current uses the voices almost like instruments, producing set pieces that seem less like operatic ensembles and more like strange hybrid orchestral compositions with vocal components. It was hard to know what to make of “The Endings,” with music, libretto and video by Jenny O. Johnson. In this early stage, the 20-minute work, to quote Ms. Johnson, is a “sampling of music that I one day hope to flesh out into a full-length opera.” It tells a metaphysical story of two adolescents who fall in love during the course of a grand and vague adventure somewhere. The music is like an exercise in sustained sonorities, drones, instrumental colorings (including the exotic sounds of Tibetan bowls) and lacy, abstract, sometimes aimless vocal lines. John Zorn’s monodrama “La Machine de l’Être” seemed not an opera at all. Mr. Zorn’s answer to the challenge of finding a good story and libretto, it would appear, is to do without them completely. Though filled with restless, pungently modern and often gripping music, this 10-minute work for solo singer and orchestra, inspired by the drawings of Antonin Artaud, has no story and no text. A soprano sings vocalization syllables, interspersed with groans and screams. Keira Duffy was the brave soloist in Mr. Zorn’s work. Many of the vocal performances were impressive, including those by James Bobick as Elmer, and Jennifer Rivera as Sharon Falconer, in “Elmer Gantry,” and Scott Hogsed in both “Elegy for a Prince” and “The Rat Land.” Gerald Steichen, Brian Garman, Steven Jarvi and Marc Lowenstein were the afternoon’s assured conductors. The musicians of the City Opera Orchestra clearly relished the challenges of playing these difficult new works, and did so very well. Most of the roughly $400,000 budget for these helpful showcases, raised primarily from foundations, goes toward paying the hard-working players. of 10) Opera Prepares For New Life In Old Home MUSIC; For Opera Companies, Architecture Is Destiny DANCE REVIEW; What Becomes the Remake of a Legend Most? Rising Conductor at City Opera Joins Business Ties With Talent of 10) &#x00bb; A Giant Takes On Physics&#8217; Biggest Questions An Amputee Sprinter: Is He Disabled or Too-Abled? Napa Valley? Bordeaux? No, but Still Wine Country The Greatest Mystery: Making a Best Seller Books: Doctors Who Wield the Pen to Heal the Profession Your Money: A Contrarian on Retirement Says Wait Sex, Drugs and Updating Your Blog The Critical Years: Middle School Manages Distractions of Adolescence Basics: In Hive or Castle, Duty Without Power Development Rises on St. Louis Area Flood Plains Agency Concludes Iran Is Stepping Up Nuclear Work Ground Zero Illnesses Clouding Giuliani's Legacy Sex, Drugs and Updating Your Blog Is It the Woman Thing, or Is It Katie Couric? Billions in Oil Missing in Iraq, U.S. Study Finds The Flight From Iraq In a New Role, Senator Clinton's Strategist in Chief Religious Groups Granted Millions for Pet Projects Obama Says He'd Roll Back Tax Cuts for the Wealthiest Army Career Behind Him, General Speaks Out on Iraq million dollar homes in Florida, Wyoming and California Also in Real Estate: U.S. Virgin Islands 50% off Times delivery. NYT ESSENTIAL LIBRARY: CLASSICAL MUSIC for History: F.D.R.’s Path Winemakers Take On Brazil’s Climate High Prices for Donor Eggs Stir Concerns Two Television Specials for Bob Barker
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/15/arts/music/15vox.html Vox - Opera - Music Column on the Horizon: Tantalizing Glimpses of Adventurous Productions Hiroyuki Ito composer Gordon Beeferman, far right, and the librettist Charlotte Jackson, second from right, congratulated the performers of their opera &#147;The Rat Land&#148; at the Skirball Center on Saturday. 2007 has become savvy about promoting its Vox series as a hip and adventurous event. The purpose of this invaluable showcase is to present excerpts from new or unperformed operas by American composers in free concert tryouts with the City Opera Orchestra and strong casts of singers. Ito Rivera sang in an adaptation of the novel &#147;Elmer Gantry.&#148; Hiroyuki Ito Hogsed sang roles in &#147;Elegy for a Prince&#148; and &#147;The Rat Land.&#148; Hiroyuki Ito Bobick performed the title role in &#147;Elmer Gantry.&#148; “Preview the Future of Opera” was the enticing message on the poster for this spring’s Vox series, the seventh, which took place on Saturday and Sunday afternoons in the Skirball Center for the Performing Arts at . Personifying that bold operatic future was the composer Gordon Beeferman, shown on the poster looking trim and punkish. With close-cropped hair and a T-shirt exposing a left arm covered with fanciful tattoos, his is not the image most classical music lovers have when they think of an opera composer. Actually, the excerpts from “The Rat Land,” Mr. Beeferman’s opera, with a libretto by Charlotte Jackson, sounded complex and daringly modern: in a way, the brainiest score of the six performed on Saturday. (I did not hear the Sunday showcase, which offered excerpts from another six works.) Other operas heard on Saturday were far more conventional. “Elmer Gantry,” an adaptation of the 1927 Sinclair Lewis novel about a womanizing evangelical minister, with music by Robert Aldridge and a libretto by Herschel Garfein, came across as an unabashedly populist piece. The music is kinetic, vividly scored and steeped in American vernacular idioms; the storytelling is urgent. Still, from the scenes presented here, the opera seems a little too eager to please. “Elmer Gantry” is scheduled for a premiere in November at the Nashville Opera. But most of the works presented are awaiting productions or incomplete. How better to generate interest and attract producers than by performing excerpts from the scores, usually 20 minutes or so, and see what the public thinks? The six well-attended presentations on Saturday were introduced through informal and often witty video interviews with the composers and librettists. It is too soon for thorough critical assessments, of course. Still, like everyone else, I left the showcase, which lasted more than three hours, with initial impressions. “The Rat Land” tells of a dysfunctional Midwestern suburban family in the late 1980s: three troubled children, including a young girl who deifies pet rats; an invalid father with a violent temper; and a weak-willed mother who lives in denial. The claustrophobic family life is presented with bleak realism and bitterly comic flourishes. There may be too much talking in the score: whole passages of text are spoken or shouted. Still, Mr. Beeferman’s music, with its skittish melodic lines and pungent atonal harmony, is gritty, fidgety and intriguing. “Elegy for a Prince,” with music by Sergio Cervetti and a libretto by Elizabeth Esris, is freely adapted from ’s fairy tale “The Happy Prince.” In the video introduction Mr. Cervetti said that this story “needs the love that only tonal music can give it.” Maybe so. But some blandly tonal passages seemed almost mawkish, at least on first exposure. “Airline Icarus,” by the composer Brian Current and the librettist Anton Piatigorsky, is a chamber opera about thoughts, fears and attractions among a group of passengers aboard an airplane that, as in the myth of Icarus, flies too close to the sun. Turbulence during the flight is linked to emotional turbulence within the characters through punchy, swirling and gratingly astringent music. In extended passages Mr. Current uses the voices almost like instruments, producing set pieces that seem less like operatic ensembles and more like strange hybrid orchestral compositions with vocal components. It was hard to know what to make of “The Endings,” with music, libretto and video by Jenny O. Johnson. In this early stage, the 20-minute work, to quote Ms. Johnson, is a “sampling of music that I one day hope to flesh out into a full-length opera.” It tells a metaphysical story of two adolescents who fall in love during the course of a grand and vague adventure somewhere. The music is like an exercise in sustained sonorities, drones, instrumental colorings (including the exotic sounds of Tibetan bowls) and lacy, abstract, sometimes aimless vocal lines. John Zorn’s monodrama “La Machine de l’Être” seemed not an opera at all. Mr. Zorn’s answer to the challenge of finding a good story and libretto, it would appear, is to do without them completely. Though filled with restless, pungently modern and often gripping music, this 10-minute work for solo singer and orchestra, inspired by the drawings of Antonin Artaud, has no story and no text. A soprano sings vocalization syllables, interspersed with groans and screams. Keira Duffy was the brave soloist in Mr. Zorn’s work. Many of the vocal performances were impressive, including those by James Bobick as Elmer, and Jennifer Rivera as Sharon Falconer, in “Elmer Gantry,” and Scott Hogsed in both “Elegy for a Prince” and “The Rat Land.” Gerald Steichen, Brian Garman, Steven Jarvi and Marc Lowenstein were the afternoon’s assured conductors. The musicians of the City Opera Orchestra clearly relished the challenges of playing these difficult new works, and did so very well. Most of the roughly $400,000 budget for these helpful showcases, raised primarily from foundations, goes toward paying the hard-working players. of 10) Opera Prepares For New Life In Old Home MUSIC; For Opera Companies, Architecture Is Destiny DANCE REVIEW; What Becomes the Remake of a Legend Most? Rising Conductor at City Opera Joins Business Ties With Talent of 10) &#x00bb; $15 million dollar homes in Florida, Wyoming and California Also in Real Estate: U.S. Virgin Islands 50% off Times delivery. NYT ESSENTIAL LIBRARY: CLASSICAL MUSIC for History: F.D.R.’s Path Winemakers Take On Brazil’s Climate High Prices for Donor Eggs Stir Concerns Two Television Specials for Bob Barker
http://www.nytimes.com/pages/arts/index.html Arts Awakening’ Gets 11 Tony Nominations Sara Krulwich/The Michele, left, and Jonathan Groff in the musical &#34;Spring Awakening&#34; at the Eugene O'Neill Theater. In a season rich with contenders, “Spring Awakening,” a dark rock musical, led the field of Tony nominations. Times Topics: Tony Awards Share Your Thoughts on the Nominations For ABC, Dramas Fill Out the Lineup By BILL CARTER and JACQUES STEINBERG Already home to big hits, a network shakes up its schedule. Video: Bill Carter on NBC's New Lineup Theater Review | 'Passing Strange' Look Back in Chagrin: A Rocker’s Progress A portrait of the artist as a confused young black man emerges in vivid colors in this fresh, exuberant and bitingly funny new musical. What’s on Sale There? Confusion, but It’s Cheap A Brooklyn artist provides the perfect art experience for window shoppers. Bob Barker, 50 (on TV), Is to Be in Two Specials The host of television’s most popular game show for 35 years is now on the verge of retirement. But he has no plans to quit working. Operas on the Horizon: Tantalizing Glimpses of Adventurous Productions The City Opera’s annual series, Vox, featured excerpts from “The Rat Land,” Gordon Beeferman’s opera, which sounded complex and daringly modern. the Scene' Here Is New York: A Gallery’s Album of 25 Years of City Life An exhibition at the New York Public Library revisits the Midtown Y Photography Gallery’s 25-year history and the role it played as photography moved into the art world. Virginia Heffernan, Times TV critic, reports from this week's TV upfronts, where the networks debut their new schedules. Video: Upfront Report on NBC by Bill Carter Dance Review | Sara Rudner Movement With and Against Music, but Bracingly Sara Rudner’s work on Sunday at the Baryshnikov Arts Center involved ensembles of layered musical complexity and a wide range of enthralling duets and solos. Jacques Tourneur’s 1946 “Canyon Passage” is a western that resembles no other and remains one of the great unsung achievements of American filmmaking. Books of The Times Reviewed by RICHARD EDER Jim Crace’s futurist nightmare, in which a cruel myth leads emigrants to slave ships, is witty, graceful and haunting. Music Review | Charles Rosen A Scholar of the Master Distills Beethoven’s Details Charles Rosen’s detailed playing did justice to the broad range and daunting strangeness of Beethoven’s last three sonatas at the 92nd Street Y on Sunday. Compiled by LAWRENCE VAN GELDER A soldier’s Iraq blog becomes prize-winning book, student sues over “Brokeback Mountain,” presidential bid likely to end actor’s D.A. job and more culture news. Mexico City’s Indie Rock Plays to the World Special Section: Children’s Books No One Says ‘9/11.’ No One Needs To. Music Review | Met Orchestra: The Familiar and the New, With Gusto TV Review | 'Spying on the Home Front': Uncle Sam Has His Eye on You: Government Surveillance Today Dance Review | Ad Hoc Ballet: Strapping on the Toe Shoes to Push at Ballet’s Borders Stanley Holden, 79, a Dancer and Prominent Ballet Teacher, Is Dead A New Curator Casts a Fresh Eye on Architecture’s Past at MoMA 'The Pesthouse,' by Jim Crace: The Pesthouse Movement With and Against Music, but Bracingly College Outside the Class: Advanced Studies in Tharp A Scholar of the Master Distills Beethoven’s Details A Producer and an Ex-Prosecutor in a Trial by TV Broadway’s Year of Tepid Hits from the past 7 days enter keyword or date e.g. April 21, 2001 A look at summer festivals from Cape Cod to Monterey. Apparently, Pentagonians' constantly revising their Facebook romantic statuses and Death Cab choices on MySpace has become a threat to -- you got it -- national security. Go to Blog » The Times's pop music critics discuss the latest albums and music events of the week. Download an MP3 Version Find your comprehensive television listings with this Longer editions of selected event listings in the New York area this week are now available online. The Week in Arts Police Commissioner Turns Critic May 13 - May 19 FIND IT IN NYC MOST POPULAR - ARTS &#8216;Spring Awakening&#8217; Gets 11 Tony Nominations Who Killed Kennedy? One Man&#8217;s Answer For ABC, Dramas Fill Out the Lineup Broadway&#8217;s Year of Tepid Hits Critic’s Choice: New DVDs 2007 Tony Award Nominations &#8216;Spring Awakening&#8217; Gets 11 Tony Nominations Bob Barker, 50 (on TV), Is to Be in Two Specials What&#8217;s on Sale There? Confusion, but It&#8217;s Cheap Mama, Don't You Cry, A New Yellow Wiggle Will Sing Adds 11 New Series Bono Says G - 8 Behind on Aid to Africa NYC Photographer Sues Lohan and Her Mom `Spring Awakening' Leads Tony Nominees Paris Hilton `Distraught' Over Jail Time Smashing Pumpkins to Perform This Summer $15 million dollar homes in Florida, Wyoming and California Also in Real Estate: U.S. Virgin Islands Wright Brothers' Historic First Flight - 1903 Get plays, TV and music at home. Get The Times delivered at 50% off. Which gadget is getting all the buzz? Start your 30-day free trial of Times Reader today. Browse movie reviews from 1913. Get the latest business news Plan what to see, eat and do. Get closer to film, music, art and plays. $3.15 a week.
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/15/arts/television/15abc.html ABC - NBC - New Fall Lineups ABC, Dramas Fill Out the Lineup 2007 ABC will continue to be the most aggressive of the networks with its lineup of new shows for the next television season, ordering at least 11 new series, when it officially announces its fall schedule to advertisers today. Heffernan, Times TV critic, reports from this week's TV upfronts, where the networks debut their new schedules. Video Reports by Bill Carter: That network already has more big hits than any of its competitors and is looking to add to the total by bringing in the biggest list of new contenders. According to network and studio executives who know of the shows ABC has ordered, the network will add seven new hourlong dramas and four new comedies to its lineup. Most of these will come on the air in the fall, but many will be scheduled later in the season. Most prominent of the new entries will be “Private Practice,” the spinoff of ABC’s biggest hit, “Grey’s Anatomy,” starring Kate Walsh as a doctor who leaves Seattle Grace Hospital for a wellness clinic in Los Angeles — and has further romantic and sexual adventures. That new series that is already generating the most positive talk, both inside and outside ABC, is a quirky romantic hourlong comedy-drama called “Pushing Daisies,”about a young man who discovers — to the advantage of a homicide detective — that with a touch he can both raise the dead and send them back again. His power complicates his relationship with a young woman he can love only unrequitedly. and Anna Friel play the couple, supported by Chi McBride and Following in the footsteps of “Desperate Housewives,” ABC has another new drama with a catchy title in “Dirty Sexy Money,” in which (“Six Feet Under”) plays a lawyer for a venal corrupt family. Money is also a factor in “Big Shots” (the title may change), about four rich corporate executives and their tribulations with business and women. (“The Practice”) and Joshua Malina (“The West Wing”) are among the stars. “Cashmere Mafia” is yet another series attempting to replicate the successful formula of “Sex and the City,” with a group of New York women in and out of romance. But this one was at least created by Darren Star, who also produced “Sex.” (“Ally McBeal”) is among the stars. “Women’s Murder Club” is a self-explanatory crime procedural, with Angie Harmon (“Law & Order”) playing the main investigator. The final drama is “Eli Stone,” about a lawyer who may be crazy or may be a prophet. is the star, supported by Victor Garber (“Alias.”) ABC has struggled mightily with comedy in recent years and so far is bringing back only one for a new season: “Notes From the Underbelly.” Its long-running “According to Jim” may return, but “George Lopez” has been canceled. Heading the list of new comedies is “Sam I Am,” which stars as a woman who loses her memory in an accident, learns she was a rotten person and tries to reform. “Cavemen” will star some familiar faces: the guys in the Geico car-insurance commercials who look like cavemen but otherwise dress and talk like anyone else. They will face prejudice as they try to adapt to contemporary society. “Carpoolers” is a buddy comedy about guys who drive to work together each day, as well as their home lives. Jerry O’Connell and Faith Ford (“Murphy Brown”) are among the stars. The final comedy is “Miss Guided,” about a young woman who returns to her old high school to become a guidance counselor. Judy Greer is the star. ABC is also bringing back the drama “October Road,” which had a brief run this spring, but is canceling “What About Brian.” NBC made it own schedule public yesterday, and it was, by its executive’s admission, a conservative lineup with only four new hours set for the fall. Kevin Reilly, the president of NBC Entertainment, said that adding more new series now was unwise because it is so difficult to market new shows in the fall. The key to the schedule is “Bionic Woman,” the remake of the 1970s series, which NBC has placed in the middle of the Wednesday lineup hoping, as Mr. Reilly put it, to “blast a hole” on the night. “Life,” the cop drama that follows it, is also new, meaning the network is placing two new shows in a row, a gambit with a low degree of success. The show getting the best spot on NBC’s schedule is “Journeyman,” a science fiction series that will reside on Mondays at 10, right after the biggest hit of this season, “Heroes.” The fourth new NBC drama for fall is “Chuck,” which will try to marry the comedy of “The 40-Year-Old Virgin” to a high-tech action series. It will run Tuesdays at 9. The biggest news out of NBC concerned several of its returning series. NBC wants to get the most out of these as possible, and so it is ordering 30 half-hours of its hit comedy “The Office,” 25 of its other Thursday night comedy success “My Name Is Earl” and 30 of “Heroes.” All are above the normal order of 22 for a typical show. “Heroes” will actually be a kind of hybrid of sorts because 24 of the episodes will be regular editions of “Heroes” and the other six will be a related idea called “Heroes: Origins.” At least five of the “The Office” shows will be hourlong episodes. NBC also at the last minute renewed its long-running comedy “Scrubs,” leaving it on Thursday night. That meant NBC ordered no new comedies for its fall schedule. Mr. Reilly said that given the competition on Thursdays, where all its comedies reside, it was safer to not introduce a new series. Here is the complete NBC fall schedule with the new shows in capital letters: 8 p.m. Deal or No Deal 8 p.m. The Biggest Loser (new day) 10 p.m. Law & Order: SVU 8 p.m. Deal or No Deal 9 p.m. THE BIONIC WOMAN 8 p.m. My Name Is Earl 8:30 p.m. 30 Rock (new time) 9:00 p.m. The Office (new time) 8 p.m. 1 vs. 100 / THE SINGING BEE 9 p.m. Las Vegas 10 p.m. Friday Night Lights (new day and time) 9 p.m. Drama reruns 10 p.m. Drama reruns 7 p.m. Football Night in America 8 p.m. Sunday Night Football Sunday Following Football Season 8 p.m. Law & Order (new day and time) 9 p.m. Medium (new day and time) 10 p.m. LIPSTICK JUNGLE of 10) REVIEW | 'TRAVELER'; After a Museum Is Bombed, the Real Trouble Begins ABC Sets Spring 2010 As the End For 'Lost' Rosie O'Donnell Says She Will Say Goodbye to 'The View' in June THE TV WATCH; Amid Chaos, One Notably Restrained Voice of 10) &#x00bb; $15 million dollar homes in Florida, Wyoming and California Also in Real Estate: U.S. Virgin Islands 50% off Times delivery. for History: F.D.R.’s Path Winemakers Take On Brazil’s Climate High Prices for Donor Eggs Stir Concerns Two Television Specials for Bob Barker
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/15/theater/theaterspecial/15cnd-tony.html?ex=1336881600&en=e72ba644b218bbbb&ei=5088&partner=rssnyt&emc=rss &#8216;Spring Awakening&#8217; Gets 11 Tony Nominations Awakening’ Gets 11 Tony Nominations Sara Krulwich/The Michele, left, and Jonathan Groff in the musical &#34;Spring Awakening&#34; at the Eugene O'Neill Theater. 2007 In a season rich with contenders, “Spring Awakening,” a dark rock musical based on a 19th century German play about sexually anguished teenagers, led the field of Tony Award nominations this morning with 11, including chances at awards for best musical, director and best actor for two of its cast. special section with a complete list of nominations, reviews, multimedia features and more. Broadway’s Year of Tepid Hits Times Topics: Tony Awards Sara Krulwich/The Sheen, left, plays David Frost and Frank Langella is Richard M. Nixon in &#34;Frost/Nixon.&#34; Sara Krulwich/The F. O'Byrne, seated, in &#34;Salvage,&#34; the final part of the three-part play &#34;The Coast of Utopia&#34; at the Vivian Beaumont Theater at Lincoln Center in New York. The show moved uptown from Off Broadway, a move that originally seemed risky. But in the musical category, it is closely followed this year by another Off-Broadway transfer: “Grey Gardens,” about the eccentric Little and Big Edie Beales, which received 10 nominations, including shots at best director and acting nods for two of its performers. The other shows in the top Tony category are “Curtains,” a Kander and Ebb musical about a backstage murder in a Boston theater, and “Mary Poppins,” about, well, exactly what you think it’s about. The nominations were announced this morning by Jane Krakowski, a Tony winner herself, and at the New York Public Library for the Performing Arts in The awards ceremony will be held on June 10 at Radio City Music Hall, and broadcast live on CBS. Though the straight-play category was robust this year, there were few surprises: “The Coast of Utopia,” ’s sprawling trilogy of 19th century Russian intelligentsia, picked up a whopping 10 nominations, including best original play. Others nominated for best play are “The Little Dog Laughed,” Douglas Carter Beane’s comedy about a closeted film actor; “Frost/Nixon,” Peter Morgan’s play about the 1977 interview of by David Frost; and “Radio Golf,” the last play in ’s 10-play cycle on the black American experience in the 20th century. The major acting categories on the play side are some of the hottest races this year. Among the men, the contest is among , playing a self-aggrandizing radio D.J. in “Talk Radio”; , making a case as Henry Drummond in the revival of “Inherit the Wind”; , channeling Richard Nixon in “Frost/Nixon; Brian F. O’Byrne, channeling Alexander Herzen in “The Coast of Utopia”; and Boyd Gaines, as an avuncular lieutenant trying to hold it together in “Journey’s End.” The leading actress in a play category includes Broadway royalty — in “The Year of Magical Thinking”; as a retired tennis pro in “Deuce”; and as the dryly witty Hesione Hushabye from “Heartbreak House” — and some neophytes: Eve Best, making her Broadway debut as the lovelorn Josie Hogan in “A Moon for the Misbegotten,” and , in her breakout role as the agent Diane in “The Little Dog Laughed.” The leading actress in a musical category is strong, even though , portraying Little and Big Edie Beale in “Grey Gardens,” is considered a front runner. She has stiff competition, though, from , playing an unhappily unmarried woman in the revival of “110 in the Shade”; Laura Bell Bundy playing the blonde in “Legally Blonde”; Donna Murphy playing Lotte Lenya in “LoveMusik”; and Debra Monk playing a money hungry theater producer (insert cynical joke here) in “Curtains.” The leading actor in a musical is not a category that has attracted as much buzz, but on the other hand there is no clear frontrunner yet. The nominees include , as Bobby in John Doyle’s revival of “Company”; Michael Cerveris, as as a showbiz-smitten detective in “Curtains”; as a chimney sweep Burt in “Mary Poppins” and Jonathan Groff as the precocious Melchior in “Spring Awakening.” There’s a little déjà vu in the musical revival category: John Doyle, whose stripped-down, re-envisioned “Sweeney Todd” lost in an upset to “The Pajama Game” last year, will have another chance when his stripped-down, re-envisioned “Company” goes up against “A Chorus Line,” “The Apple Tree” and “110 in the Shade.” Mr. Doyle, who won best director of a musical category last year, is back in the category again, alongside Michael Mayer (“Spring Awakening”), Michael Greif (“Grey Gardens”) and Scott Ellis (“Curtains”). In the play revival category, “Journey’s End,” will be competing against “Talk Radio,” “Inherit the Wind” and “Translations.” David Grindley, the director of “Journey’s End” was nominated for best director of a play, along with Michael Grandage (“Frost/Nixon”), Melly Still (“Coram Boy”) and Jack O’Brien (“The Coast of Utopia”). The featured actress in a play category includes , both from “The Coast of Utopia”; Xanthe Elbrick and Jan Maxwell, both from “Coram Boy”; and The featured actor in a play category includes , both from “The Coast of Utopia”; Anthony Chisholm and John Earl Jelks, both from “Radio Golf” and Stark Sands from “Journey’s End.” On the musical side, the featured actors nominated are Brooks Ashmanskas (“ : Fame Becomes Me”), Christian Borle (“Legally Blonde”), John Cullum (“110 in the Shade”), John Gallagher, Jr. (“Spring Awakening”) and David Pittu (“LoveMusik). The featured actresses are Rebecca Luker (“Mary Poppins”), (“A Chorus Line”), Orfeh (“Legally Blonde”), Mary Louis Wilson (“Grey Gardens”) and Karen Ziemba (“Curtains”). (1 of 29) (1 of 29) &#x00bb; A Giant Takes On Physics&#8217; Biggest Questions An Amputee Sprinter: Is He Disabled or Too-Abled? Napa Valley? Bordeaux? No, but Still Wine Country The Greatest Mystery: Making a Best Seller Books: Doctors Who Wield the Pen to Heal the Profession Your Money: A Contrarian on Retirement Says Wait Sex, Drugs and Updating Your Blog The Critical Years: Middle School Manages Distractions of Adolescence Basics: In Hive or Castle, Duty Without Power Development Rises on St. Louis Area Flood Plains Agency Concludes Iran Is Stepping Up Nuclear Work Ground Zero Illnesses Clouding Giuliani's Legacy Sex, Drugs and Updating Your Blog Is It the Woman Thing, or Is It Katie Couric? Billions in Oil Missing in Iraq, U.S. Study Finds The Flight From Iraq In a New Role, Senator Clinton's Strategist in Chief Religious Groups Granted Millions for Pet Projects Obama Says He'd Roll Back Tax Cuts for the Wealthiest Army Career Behind Him, General Speaks Out on Iraq million dollar homes in Florida, Wyoming and California Also in Real Estate: U.S. Virgin Islands for History: F.D.R.’s Path Winemakers Take On Brazil’s Climate High Prices for Donor Eggs Stir Concerns Two Television Specials for Bob Barker
http://www.nytimes.com/pages/arts/index.html?partner=rssnyt Arts Awakening’ Gets 11 Tony Nominations Sara Krulwich/The Michele, left, and Jonathan Groff in the musical &#34;Spring Awakening&#34; at the Eugene O'Neill Theater. In a season rich with contenders, “Spring Awakening,” a dark rock musical, led the field of Tony nominations. Times Topics: Tony Awards Share Your Thoughts on the Nominations For ABC, Dramas Fill Out the Lineup By BILL CARTER and JACQUES STEINBERG Already home to big hits, a network shakes up its schedule. Video: Bill Carter on NBC's New Lineup Theater Review | 'Passing Strange' Look Back in Chagrin: A Rocker’s Progress A portrait of the artist as a confused young black man emerges in vivid colors in this fresh, exuberant and bitingly funny new musical. What’s on Sale There? Confusion, but It’s Cheap A Brooklyn artist provides the perfect art experience for window shoppers. Bob Barker, 50 (on TV), Is to Be in Two Specials The host of television’s most popular game show for 35 years is now on the verge of retirement. But he has no plans to quit working. Operas on the Horizon: Tantalizing Glimpses of Adventurous Productions The City Opera’s annual series, Vox, featured excerpts from “The Rat Land,” Gordon Beeferman’s opera, which sounded complex and daringly modern. the Scene' Here Is New York: A Gallery’s Album of 25 Years of City Life An exhibition at the New York Public Library revisits the Midtown Y Photography Gallery’s 25-year history and the role it played as photography moved into the art world. Virginia Heffernan, Times TV critic, reports from this week's TV upfronts, where the networks debut their new schedules. Video: Upfront Report on NBC by Bill Carter Dance Review | Sara Rudner Movement With and Against Music, but Bracingly Sara Rudner’s work on Sunday at the Baryshnikov Arts Center involved ensembles of layered musical complexity and a wide range of enthralling duets and solos. Jacques Tourneur’s 1946 “Canyon Passage” is a western that resembles no other and remains one of the great unsung achievements of American filmmaking. Books of The Times Reviewed by RICHARD EDER Jim Crace’s futurist nightmare, in which a cruel myth leads emigrants to slave ships, is witty, graceful and haunting. Music Review | Charles Rosen A Scholar of the Master Distills Beethoven’s Details Charles Rosen’s detailed playing did justice to the broad range and daunting strangeness of Beethoven’s last three sonatas at the 92nd Street Y on Sunday. Compiled by LAWRENCE VAN GELDER A soldier’s Iraq blog becomes prize-winning book, student sues over “Brokeback Mountain,” presidential bid likely to end actor’s D.A. job and more culture news. Mexico City’s Indie Rock Plays to the World Special Section: Children’s Books No One Says ‘9/11.’ No One Needs To. Music Review | Met Orchestra: The Familiar and the New, With Gusto TV Review | 'Spying on the Home Front': Uncle Sam Has His Eye on You: Government Surveillance Today Dance Review | Ad Hoc Ballet: Strapping on the Toe Shoes to Push at Ballet’s Borders Stanley Holden, 79, a Dancer and Prominent Ballet Teacher, Is Dead A New Curator Casts a Fresh Eye on Architecture’s Past at MoMA 'The Pesthouse,' by Jim Crace: The Pesthouse Movement With and Against Music, but Bracingly College Outside the Class: Advanced Studies in Tharp A Scholar of the Master Distills Beethoven’s Details A Producer and an Ex-Prosecutor in a Trial by TV Broadway’s Year of Tepid Hits from the past 7 days enter keyword or date e.g. April 21, 2001 A look at summer festivals from Cape Cod to Monterey. Apparently, Pentagonians' constantly revising their Facebook romantic statuses and Death Cab choices on MySpace has become a threat to -- you got it -- national security. Go to Blog » The Times's pop music critics discuss the latest albums and music events of the week. Download an MP3 Version Find your comprehensive television listings with this Longer editions of selected event listings in the New York area this week are now available online. The Week in Arts Police Commissioner Turns Critic May 13 - May 19 FIND IT IN NYC MOST POPULAR - ARTS &#8216;Spring Awakening&#8217; Gets 11 Tony Nominations Who Killed Kennedy? One Man&#8217;s Answer For ABC, Dramas Fill Out the Lineup Broadway&#8217;s Year of Tepid Hits Critic’s Choice: New DVDs 2007 Tony Award Nominations &#8216;Spring Awakening&#8217; Gets 11 Tony Nominations Bob Barker, 50 (on TV), Is to Be in Two Specials What&#8217;s on Sale There? Confusion, but It&#8217;s Cheap Mama, Don't You Cry, A New Yellow Wiggle Will Sing Adds 11 New Series Bono Says G - 8 Behind on Aid to Africa NYC Photographer Sues Lohan and Her Mom `Spring Awakening' Leads Tony Nominees Paris Hilton `Distraught' Over Jail Time Smashing Pumpkins to Perform This Summer $15 million dollar homes in Florida, Wyoming and California Also in Real Estate: U.S. Virgin Islands Miracle On Ice - 1980 Get plays, TV and music at home. Get The Times delivered at 50% off. Which gadget is getting all the buzz? Buy, sell or rent a home. Looking to buy a new car? Looking for a job? Get the latest business news Get closer to film, music, art and plays. $3.15 a week.
http://theater2.nytimes.com/2007/05/15/theater/reviews/15stra.html Passing Strange - Theater - Review REVIEW | 'PASSING STRANGE' MORE ON 'Passing Strange' Look Back in Chagrin: A Rocker’s Progress 2007 A portrait of the artist as a confused young black man emerges in vivid colors in the fresh, exuberant and bitingly funny new musical “Passing Strange,” which opened last night at the . The biography of a songwriter on a wayward journey of self-discovery, this bracingly inventive show introduces an exciting new voice to contemporary musical theater, a witty wordsmith, composer and performer who goes by the single name Stew. Krulwich/The writer, composer and performer Stew in &#147;Passing Strange.&#148; Sara Krulwich/The Breaker and Eisa Davis in &#147;Passing Strange,&#148; a musical written and narrated by the singer-songwriter Stew, at the Public Theater. Stew has a cult following as a performer and recording artist, but to look at him, you’d never take him for a rock troubadour. Bald and big-bellied, with a neat goatee and quirky eyeglasses, he has an air more professorial than swoon-inducing. Narrating the story of his life in song, sometimes from a podium or a desk, he slides those glasses up his big, domed forehead to peer skeptically at the dubious antics of his fictionalized younger self, played with impish spirit by Daniel Breaker. Stew watches in sorrow, amazement and occasional embarrassment as the callow young man he once was struts and struggles, pouts and fusses his way to maturity on a voyage that takes him from the not-so-mean streets of Los Angeles to the hash bars of Amsterdam and the post-punk cabarets of Berlin. But Professor Stew can also play a mean guitar, and when necessary, he strides the stage like an evangelical preacher, or a preening rocker, to whip the audience into a froth. Part concert, with Stew leading an onstage band; part book musical with a full (and terrific) cast, “Passing Strange” defies generic categories. This is wholly appropriate, since the story being told doesn’t run in any of the familiar grooves of the African-American experience in 20th-century America. And if it does trace the classic story of the artist as a self-styled outsider at odds with mainstream culture (as personified by Mom), “Passing Strange” sets this boilerplate arc to a quirky new rhythm. Our hero-rebel grew up comfortably in black bourgeois Los Angeles, “a colored paradise where the palm trees sway,” and there’s hardly a word about the cruelties of racism in American culture in “Passing Strange.” (Hardly an earnest word, anyway. One highlight is a hilarious mock-minstrel song in which Stew lampoons the way he once capitalized on stereotypes about the black American experience to gain some street cred with German radicals.) As a teenager, Stew was a Zen Buddhist who smirked at the hats of the ladies in church, at least until one Sunday when “the organ whispered a promise,” the spirit moved him to ecstasy, and he found himself called not to God but to the making of music and the forging of a life in art. (His mother, played with wry warmth by Eisa Davis, is not pleased. “Don’t you know the difference between the sacred and the profane?” she hisses. Citing his own scripture to defend his pronouncement that “church ain’t nothin’ but rock ’n’ roll,” the young Stew stutters back, “But it was on After that epiphany, Stew joins the choir and forms a bond with its leader, the pastor’s flamboyant son Mr. Franklin (a charismatic Colman Domingo, also terrific as a ranting Berlin performance artist). In a scene both ruefully funny and tender, the young Stew gets high with Mr. Franklin as they listen to Puccini in a blue VW bug. The desolation of a life lived in compromise is brought home to him in a haze of pot smoke. Mr. Franklin worships Maria Callas, regrets his own timidity and urges the young Stew to escape to Europe and find his real spiritual home. “I mean, baby, we’re all freaks depending on the backdrop,” he shrugs. Bright-eyed with wonder, young Stew jokes that they’re both “black folks passing for black folks.” The music, composed by Stew and Heidi Rodewald (who also plays bass), is straight-ahead guitar-driven rock rather than rhythm and blues (though of course the line between them is easily blurred). As Stew searches for his own musical voice, the disparate styles referred to range from ’60s Europop to ’70s punk to ’80s electronic to Gilbert and Sullivan and . The score contains a tiny musical quote (a joke, really) from , but also a smidgen of “My Fair Lady.” Stew’s gift for smart comic wordplay would be the envy of many a rapper, but the more lyrical passages in “Passing Strange” are carefully sculptured, considered and reflective, not hot and bothered. (Occasionally, Stew does try a little too hard for poetic profundity.) The show follows the budding musician from his garage-band days in Los Angeles to coffeehouses in Amsterdam, where he indulges in the usual condiments of a rock ’n’ roll life, and from there to Berlin, where he falls in with a group of political and aesthetic radicals. “Celibacy is the only sane response to a world gone wild,” declares one new friend, a “critical theorist and postmodern pornographer.” “My porno films feature fully clothed men making business deals.” “Narrative is a capitalist plot!” is the rallying cry of another. If so, “Passing Strange” is not likely to face accusations of spreading the doctrine. As the show ambles past the two-hour mark, its episodic story line becomes a liability. Because Stew’s aesthetic and moral awakening takes place against a shifting backdrop, no other characters stick around long enough to claim a full role in the proceedings, despite perfectly pitched comic performances from the whole cast. The spectacle of watching a young man try on various emotional and artistic attitudes will strike happy chords in the hearts of ex-dreamers of youthful dreams, but colder eyes may see it as an extended exercise in musical navel-gazing. Still, engagement is sustained by the unusual combination of driving rock music and a tart satiric tone, a delicate balance that the show maintains throughout with surprising ease. Although some sequences would benefit from trimming, the director, Annie Dorsen, shapes the individual scenes smartly and effectively, with the help of the modern-dance choreographer Karole Armitage (“movement coordinator” is her credit), who keeps the energetic cast in almost constant motion when it’s center stage. (I should acknowledge that Ms. Dorsen is an acquaintance.) For all its witty puncturing of youthful pretension, and despite the sardonic attitude Stew often strikes toward his younger self, “Passing Strange” is also full of heart. It dares in its playful way to honor those big questions that have set adolescent souls yearning for centuries. How to discover and be true to your convictions, how to live a meaningful life and still pay the bills, how to find the understanding you need without throwing away the love you’re offered. Its mournful finale also acknowledges the damage that accrues in those heedless years spent asking them with such stridency, before you come to realize that learning to listen is just as important as making yourself heard. Book and lyrics by Stew; music by Stew and Heidi Rodewald; directed and created in collaboration with Annie Dorsen; sets by David Korins; costumes by Elizabeth Hope Clancy; lighting by Kevin Adams; sound by Tony Smolenski IV; movement coordinator, Karole Armitage; musical director, Ms. Rodewald; musical supervisor, Jon Spurney; production stage manager, Cynthia Cahill; general manager, Nicki Genovese; associate producers, Bill Bragin, Peter DuBois and Mandy Hackett; director of production, Ruth E. Sternberg. Presented by the , Oskar Eustis, artistic director; Mara Manus, executive director, in association with Berkeley Repertory Theater, Tony Taccone, artistic director; Susan Medak, managing director. At the Public Theater, 425 Lafayette Street, at Astor Place, East Village; (212) 967-7555. Through June 3. Running time: 2 hours 30 minutes. WITH: De’Adre Aziza (Edwina/Marianna/Sudabey), Daniel Breaker (Youth), Eisa Davis (Mother), Colman Domingo (Mr. Franklin/Joop/Mr. Venus), Chad Goodridge (Hugo/Christophe/Terry), Rebecca Naomi Jones (Sherry/Renata/Desi) and Stew (Narrator). (3 of 29) &#x00bb; Report a Problem Post (4.72 stars, 25 votes) REVIEW; Howl? Nay, Express His Lighter Purpose Rats to Riches: Buddies on a Theatrical Journey SPRING THEATER SPECIAL; For a Rare Moment, The Play's The Thing THEATER REVIEW; A Friendship Muddled By Attraction 110 in the Shade 25th Annual Putnam C... Beauty and the Beast A Moon for the Misbe... The Phantom of the O... The Year of Magical ... All I Want to Hear The Awesome 80s Prom Bad Blood - Malasang... Beauty on the Vine Bill W. and Dr. Bob Blue Man Group: Tube... Boys Just Wanna Have... Brits Off Broadway: ... Brits Off Broadway: ... Brits Off Broadway: ... Cronica de Una Muert... Don't Quit Your Nigh... I Love You, You're P... INTAR: Daughter of a... A Jew Grows in Brook... La Casa de Bernarda ... Make Me a Song: The ... Momma's Boyz (Los Ne... Murdered by the Mob Tony n' Tina's Weddi... 110 in the Shade Beauty on the Vine A Giant Takes On Physics&#8217; Biggest Questions An Amputee Sprinter: Is He Disabled or Too-Abled? Napa Valley? Bordeaux? No, but Still Wine Country The Greatest Mystery: Making a Best Seller Books: Doctors Who Wield the Pen to Heal the Profession Your Money: A Contrarian on Retirement Says Wait Sex, Drugs and Updating Your Blog The Critical Years: Middle School Manages Distractions of Adolescence Basics: In Hive or Castle, Duty Without Power Development Rises on St. Louis Area Flood Plains Agency Concludes Iran Is Stepping Up Nuclear Work Ground Zero Illnesses Clouding Giuliani's Legacy Sex, Drugs and Updating Your Blog Is It the Woman Thing, or Is It Katie Couric? Billions in Oil Missing in Iraq, U.S. Study Finds The Flight From Iraq In a New Role, Senator Clinton's Strategist in Chief Religious Groups Granted Millions for Pet Projects Obama Says He'd Roll Back Tax Cuts for the Wealthiest Army Career Behind Him, General Speaks Out on Iraq million dollar homes in Florida, Wyoming and California Also in Real Estate: U.S. Virgin Islands NYT ESSENTIAL LIBRARY: CLASSICAL MUSIC for History: F.D.R.’s Path Winemakers Take On Brazil’s Climate High Prices for Donor Eggs Stir Concerns Two Television Specials for Bob Barker
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/15/theater/theaterspecial/15cnd-tony.html &#8216;Spring Awakening&#8217; Gets 11 Tony Nominations Awakening’ Gets 11 Tony Nominations Sara Krulwich/The Michele, left, and Jonathan Groff in the musical &#34;Spring Awakening&#34; at the Eugene O'Neill Theater. 2007 In a season rich with contenders, “Spring Awakening,” a dark rock musical based on a 19th century German play about sexually anguished teenagers, led the field of Tony Award nominations this morning with 11, including chances at awards for best musical, director and best actor for two of its cast. special section with a complete list of nominations, reviews, multimedia features and more. Broadway’s Year of Tepid Hits Times Topics: Tony Awards Sara Krulwich/The Sheen, left, plays David Frost and Frank Langella is Richard M. Nixon in &#34;Frost/Nixon.&#34; Sara Krulwich/The F. O'Byrne, seated, in &#34;Salvage,&#34; the final part of the three-part play &#34;The Coast of Utopia&#34; at the Vivian Beaumont Theater at Lincoln Center in New York. The show moved uptown from Off Broadway, a move that originally seemed risky. But in the musical category, it is closely followed this year by another Off-Broadway transfer: “Grey Gardens,” about the eccentric Little and Big Edie Beales, which received 10 nominations, including shots at best director and acting nods for two of its performers. The other shows in the top Tony category are “Curtains,” a Kander and Ebb musical about a backstage murder in a Boston theater, and “Mary Poppins,” about, well, exactly what you think it’s about. The nominations were announced this morning by Jane Krakowski, a Tony winner herself, and at the New York Public Library for the Performing Arts in The awards ceremony will be held on June 10 at Radio City Music Hall, and broadcast live on CBS. Though the straight-play category was robust this year, there were few surprises: “The Coast of Utopia,” ’s sprawling trilogy of 19th century Russian intelligentsia, picked up a whopping 10 nominations, including best original play. Others nominated for best play are “The Little Dog Laughed,” Douglas Carter Beane’s comedy about a closeted film actor; “Frost/Nixon,” Peter Morgan’s play about the 1977 interview of by David Frost; and “Radio Golf,” the last play in ’s 10-play cycle on the black American experience in the 20th century. The major acting categories on the play side are some of the hottest races this year. Among the men, the contest is among , playing a self-aggrandizing radio D.J. in “Talk Radio”; , making a case as Henry Drummond in the revival of “Inherit the Wind”; , channeling Richard Nixon in “Frost/Nixon; Brian F. O’Byrne, channeling Alexander Herzen in “The Coast of Utopia”; and Boyd Gaines, as an avuncular lieutenant trying to hold it together in “Journey’s End.” The leading actress in a play category includes Broadway royalty — in “The Year of Magical Thinking”; as a retired tennis pro in “Deuce”; and as the dryly witty Hesione Hushabye from “Heartbreak House” — and some neophytes: Eve Best, making her Broadway debut as the lovelorn Josie Hogan in “A Moon for the Misbegotten,” and , in her breakout role as the agent Diane in “The Little Dog Laughed.” The leading actress in a musical category is strong, even though , portraying Little and Big Edie Beale in “Grey Gardens,” is considered a front runner. She has stiff competition, though, from , playing an unhappily unmarried woman in the revival of “110 in the Shade”; Laura Bell Bundy playing the blonde in “Legally Blonde”; Donna Murphy playing Lotte Lenya in “LoveMusik”; and Debra Monk playing a money hungry theater producer (insert cynical joke here) in “Curtains.” The leading actor in a musical is not a category that has attracted as much buzz, but on the other hand there is no clear frontrunner yet. The nominees include , as Bobby in John Doyle’s revival of “Company”; Michael Cerveris, as as a showbiz-smitten detective in “Curtains”; as a chimney sweep Burt in “Mary Poppins” and Jonathan Groff as the precocious Melchior in “Spring Awakening.” There’s a little déjà vu in the musical revival category: John Doyle, whose stripped-down, re-envisioned “Sweeney Todd” lost in an upset to “The Pajama Game” last year, will have another chance when his stripped-down, re-envisioned “Company” goes up against “A Chorus Line,” “The Apple Tree” and “110 in the Shade.” Mr. Doyle, who won best director of a musical category last year, is back in the category again, alongside Michael Mayer (“Spring Awakening”), Michael Greif (“Grey Gardens”) and Scott Ellis (“Curtains”). In the play revival category, “Journey’s End,” will be competing against “Talk Radio,” “Inherit the Wind” and “Translations.” David Grindley, the director of “Journey’s End” was nominated for best director of a play, along with Michael Grandage (“Frost/Nixon”), Melly Still (“Coram Boy”) and Jack O’Brien (“The Coast of Utopia”). The featured actress in a play category includes , both from “The Coast of Utopia”; Xanthe Elbrick and Jan Maxwell, both from “Coram Boy”; and The featured actor in a play category includes , both from “The Coast of Utopia”; Anthony Chisholm and John Earl Jelks, both from “Radio Golf” and Stark Sands from “Journey’s End.” On the musical side, the featured actors nominated are Brooks Ashmanskas (“ : Fame Becomes Me”), Christian Borle (“Legally Blonde”), John Cullum (“110 in the Shade”), John Gallagher, Jr. (“Spring Awakening”) and David Pittu (“LoveMusik). The featured actresses are Rebecca Luker (“Mary Poppins”), (“A Chorus Line”), Orfeh (“Legally Blonde”), Mary Louis Wilson (“Grey Gardens”) and Karen Ziemba (“Curtains”). (1 of 29) (1 of 29) &#x00bb; $15 million dollar homes in Florida, Wyoming and California Also in Real Estate: U.S. Virgin Islands for History: F.D.R.’s Path Winemakers Take On Brazil’s Climate High Prices for Donor Eggs Stir Concerns Two Television Specials for Bob Barker
